What’s “Swan Lake” about? And what did its composer, Tchaikovsky, have in mind? Like innumerable 19th-century works, this ballet concerns infidelity: Prince Siegfried no sooner finds true love with his one-and-only, Odette, than he betrays it by swearing love for her look-alike, Odile. But this story, set in the Germany of medieval romance, is complicated by aspects of pathos, wildness, doom, tragedy, malice — all of which Tchaikovsky’s score responds to passionately. By breaking Odette’s heart, Siegfried condemns her to an eternity of turning back into swan form by day and only regaining human form, with her female companions, at night.Sooner or later, most balletgoers learn that the “Swan Lake” they admire is based on the 1895 St. Petersburg production, which — after Tchaikovsky’s death in 1893 — Marius Petipa and Lev Ivanov choreographed to a version of the score arranged by Riccardo Drigo. When you listen to Tchaikovsky’s original 1877 score (it’s the one on most audio recordings), it seems unstageable, its narrative puzzling, its dance logic awkward. Petipa, Ivanov and Drigo were superlative show doctors. By cutting, moving, revising and adding, they turned this unwieldy idea of a ballet into a theatrical classic.Yet the 1877 original was staged in Moscow, and was by no means the fiasco that used to be supposed. After its Moscow premiere, it was revived there for six of the first seven years of its existence. Recent discoveries by Sergei Konaev, principal researcher at the Institute for Art Studies in Moscow, at the old Bolshoi building there, give us a new wealth of detail about it. In particular, a rehearsal score has notes beginning in 1876, while connected materials describe original costumes, casting and more. These were announced after a symposium in Moscow last week.The musicologist Simon Morrison, a professor at Princeton University who is completing a history of the Bolshoi Ballet, attended the symposium. He wrote in an email that the discoveries’ significance pointed in many ways:“They give us full and correct descriptions of the sets and costumes, with dozens of staging cues and indications, and new details about the cacophonous final flood. They finally establish that Vladimir Petrovich Begichev (1828-91), intendant of the Moscow Imperial Theaters, was the author of the ballet’s scenario. They confirm the score was played in its original order for the original 1877 choreography by Wenzel Reisinger. They give us the name of the dancer for whom the ballet was conceived, the prima ballerina Lidiya Geyten, whom Tchaikovsky admired and who rehearsed the ballet until she decided its music was not for her. And they tell us plenty about the second Moscow staging, in 1880, by Joseph Peter Hansen.”Neither Reisinger nor Hansen was a leading light of choreography; Tchaikovsky’s chief enthusiasm for the production seems to have been for the brilliant scenic effects by the Moscow stage designer Karl Valts. That admiration was mutual. Valts wrote in his memoirs:“In the storm scene, when the lake bursts its banks and floods the whole stage, Tchaikovsky insisted that we recreate a real whirlpool — the branches and boughs of the surrounding trees were to break off, fall into the water, and be swept away by the waves.”This final flood is just one element that, since 1895, has almost invariably been omitted from “Swan Lake.” It might help to remind readers of the plot that leads (or fails to lead) to this denouement. There are four acts. In Act I, Prince Siegfried is told by his mother that it’s time to choose a bride. In the nocturnal Act II, a hunt for swans leads him and his friend Benno to the lakeside. There he meets Odette, who explains to him her swan/human conundrum and how it can be solved only by a man’s vow to love and marry her.In Act III, at a ball, Siegfried rejects various princesses as potential brides. But then he falls for Odile, who, to fool him, has magically been given Odette’s outer form, and whom he swears to love and marry. In the final scene, back at the lake, Odette is heartbroken. When Siegfried joins her, he again shows his love — but he is now forsworn.The biggest puzzle about the 1877 score has always been the famous so-called Black Swan pas de deux, the music usually used for Siegfried’s ballroom dances with Odile. Tchaikovsky wrote it for Act I — when Siegfried has not met Odile or even Odette. And what music did Tchaikovsky intend for Odile to dance in Act III?From the rehearsal score, we now understand that Siegfried simply danced this Act I pas de deux with a young woman described as the “first villager.” Yet this character, despite her momentous music, was a dead end; she does not return.As for Odile, as soon as she arrived in the Act III ballroom, she immediately took part in a complex suite of dances that the score calls the pas de six. The new discoveries confirm that Reisinger included this suite’s most surprising single item, the beautifully poignant andante con moto number. When this builds to a colossal, tragic climax, it makes the ballet’s scale seem briefly cosmic. If you listen to this number with the knowledge that Tchaikovsky intended it as part of the enchantress Odile’s dances, you find that it completely transforms our idea of her; this music is as poignant, doom-laden and vast as anything written for Odette.The score moves on to a suite of national dances from different parts of Europe. And its climax, the fifth, is the Russian dance, featuring a sensationally Gypsy-type solo violin. In 1877 it was Odile herself, after changing costume, who reappeared to perform this — and with it she evidently completed her seduction of Siegfried.It will take time to absorb and check this trove of “Swan Lake” data. The new discoveries will probably complicate rather than solve this ballet’s mysteries. The chief effort in modern times to stage the 1877 score has been a 1953 Moscow production by Vladimir Bourmeister, which has been occasionally revived and is viewable on DVD. Now, however, there is already talk of better-informed efforts to bring Tchaikovsky’s original conception to life. Though “Swan Lake” is the world’s most familiar ballet, we have much to learn about it.In the comments section of a YouTube video clip from two years ago, a user named powerofalto wrote, “One wonders, at times, whether Silas Riener is, in fact, human.” The video referred to is of a solo that Mr. Riener performed as a member of the final tribe of the Merce Cunningham Dance Company. It was a reasonable thing to wonder: The extraordinary focus and physical control Mr. Riener displays in the clip — not to mention his air time — does seem superhuman.In his own work, he has carried over the rigor but stirred in a bit more tenderness and a bit more questioning. Mr. Riener dances as if he’s searching for something. He seems to discover each move for the first time, but also with a sense of having done it before, like in a past life. His new solo show, “Blue Name,” is a compilation of small dances created over 18 months. Thankfully, it’s running for two weeks. (Wednesday, Oct. 14, through Oct. 28, Chocolate Factory Theater, chocolatefactorytheater.org.)The Jamaican novelist Marlon James won the Man Booker Prize on Tuesday for his novel “A Brief History of Seven Killings,” a raw, violent epic that uses the attempted assassination of Bob Marley in 1976 to explore Jamaican politics, gang wars and drug trafficking. Mr. James is the first Jamaican-born author to win the Man Booker, Britain’s most prestigious literary award. At a ceremony at London’s Guildhall, Mr. James said he was so certain that he would not win that he did not prepare an acceptance speech.“I’m not an easy writer to like,” he said, referring to his experimental style.The Booker judges praised Mr. James’s stylistic range and his unflinching exploration of violence, cronyism and corruption.“It’s a crime novel that moves beyond the world of crime and takes us deep into a recent history we know far too little about,” Michael Wood, the chair of the Booker judges, said when awarding the prize.Mr. James was born in Kingston, Jamaica, in 1970, and studied literature at the University of the West Indies. He worked in advertising for more than a decade, as a copywriter, art director and graphic designer. He inherited his father’s love of literature — the two of them often recited Shakespearean soliloquies to each other. He took a writing workshop in Kingston, Jamaica, and later enrolled in a writing program at Wilkes University in Pennsylvania.His first novel, “John Crow’s Devil” was published in 2005 by Akashic Books and centers on two rival preachers in a Jamaican village in 1957. His second novel, “The Book of Night Women,” published in 2009, is about a Jamaican woman named Lilith who is born into slavery on a sugar plantation in the 18th century.Mr. James spent four years working on “A Brief History of Seven Killings.” In an interview at the awards ceremony, Mr. James said he first envisioned it as a short crime novel. Instead, the story morphed into an epic tale that spans decades and continents, weaving together the stories of real-life people, among them Cuban exiles, Jamaican politicians and C.I.A. operatives.“I kept running into dead ends with the stories until a friend of mine said, ‘Why do you think it’s one story?’ ” Mr. James said. He realized that Mr. Marley, who is referred to as the Singer in the novel, was the connective cloth that held all the narrative threads together. “Funnily enough, Marley was a character in most of these stories and I didn’t even notice,” he said.Mr. James said that once he cracked the structure of the novel, he struggled with the style, which incorporates dialects and Jamaican patois, sprinkling in free verse and slipping into stream-of-consciousness. “I thought it would be considered as one of those experimental novels that no one reads,” he said.Instead, the novel, which was published in the United States by Riverhead Books in 2014, received glowing reviews. In The New York Times, Michiko Kakutani called the book “epic in every sense of that word: sweeping, mythic, over the top, colossal and dizzyingly complex.”Mr. James, who now lives in Minneapolis and teaches at Macalester College in St. Paul, said that he also wrestled with how to depict Jamaica’s violent past while he was working on the novel. “We don’t want to talk about the history, we don’t want to talk about the corruption, we don’t even want to talk about homosexuality,” he said. “I love my country to death but I also remember how much of our history is paid for in blood. Were I in Jamaica, I would not have written this novel.”Mr. James was considered something of a long shot among this year’s nominees, which included a geographically and stylistically diverse group of writers from around the world. The contest for the Booker, which was first awarded in 1969, grew more heated last year, when the prize was opened up to any novel written in English and published in Britain. Previously, the award was restricted to novelists from Britain, Ireland, Zimbabwe and the Commonwealth nations.The finalists included the Nigerian novelist Chigozie Obioma’s debut novel “The Fishermen,” which unfolds in Nigeria in the 1990s and centers on four brothers whose lives are upended by a troubling prophecy from a madman, and a novel by Anne Tyler, the Pulitzer Prize-winning American, called “A Spool of Blue Thread,” a quiet drama about a middle-class family in Baltimore.Also considered were the British novelist Tom McCarthy’s “Satin Island,” a manic, dizzying story of an anthropologist who becomes a corporate consultant and seeks to write an all-encompassing “Great Report” that sums up our era; “The Year of the Runaways,” by the British novelist Sunjeev Sahota, which follows Indian immigrants struggling in England; and “A Little Life,” a wrenching novel by the American novelist Hanya Yanagihara about four young, ambitious college friends who are building careers in New York while one wrestles with the trauma of past sexual abuse.Mr. James said he hoped the award would draw attention to the flourishing literary scene in his home country.“There’s this whole universe of really spunky creativity that’s happening,” he said. “I hope it brings more attention to what’s coming out of Jamaica and the Caribbean.”It’s been 70 years — a long time in modern dance — since José Limón, a pioneer of the form, founded his company; it’s been 43 years since his death. In his absence, the Limón Dance Company has soldiered on, and so have his dances, in his company and in other troupes around the world. The two-week José Limón International Dance Festival, which opened on Tuesday at the Joyce Theater, is one of the most extensive celebrations of his legacy in recent years, featuring 14 works performed by the company that bears his name and a diverse group of guests: sjDANCEco from California, American Repertory Ballet from New Jersey, Coreoarte from Venezuela, members of the Royal Danish Ballet and students from leading dance conservatories.But opening night was entirely in the very capable hands, or bodies, of the Limón Dance Company. (Two dancers from the Bavarian State Ballet, originally scheduled to perform “The Exiles,” couldn’t be there.) Three classics — “Mazurkas” (1957), “The Moor’s Pavane” (1949) and “Missa Brevis” (1958) — showed that while the Limón oeuvre can feel dated in its decorum, it has plenty of lasting power.“Mazurkas,” to Chopin (played live by the pianist Michael Cherry), made for a good introduction to the company’s likable dancers, who look relaxed in Limón’s concurrently grounded and soaring language. Notes of Polish folk dance (the choreographer visited Poland in 1957) weave through the solos, duets, trios and quartets, like the thigh-slapping introduced by the quick and light Durell Comedy or Roxane D’Orleans Juste’s ruggedly flourishing hands. Mr. Comedy is a particular joy to watch in both lateral and vertical feats: He can effortlessly cover large swathes of the stage, and when he’s airborne, there’s a moment when you think he might not come down.The suite progresses through a range of moods, from introspective to flirtatious, in the kind of earnest, orderly way that a Limón dance promises. Some performers seem to believe in the movement more than others, and Ms. D’Orleans Juste, who has been with the company for over 30 years, is one of the believers, a dancer who treats each step like the truth. She also brought that wisdom to “The Moor’s Pavane,” Limón’s response to Shakespeare’s “Othello,” playing the moor’s wife alongside Francisco Ruvalcaba (the moor), Mr. Comedy (his friend) and Kristen Foote (his friend’s wife). They imbued the tragedy with real intrigue, aided by Ms. Foote’s potent coquettishness and Mr. Ruvalcaba’s muscular swagger.The company was joined by members of its affiliated Professional Studies Program for “Missa Brevis,” to the Mass that Zoltan Kodaly wrote at the end of World War II. The subject here is the human spirit’s resilience in times of destruction, and it’s no joke. The triumphal work sets a lone man in black (Mr. Ruvalcaba) against a large chorus in many colors. The group, which had wonderful momentum, gives individuals something to rise from; the image of a single dancer ferried aloft, mournfully or heroically, emerges again and again. Perhaps it’s not surprising that a company steeped in such material should make it this far.Hilla Becher, the German photographer who, with her husband, Bernd, meticulously documented coal mines, steel mills and other features of the industrial landscape, straddling the worlds of archival documentation and conceptual art, died on Saturday in Düsseldorf. She was 81.The cause was a stroke, her publisher, Schirmer/Mosel Verlag, said.Over nearly five decades, the Bechers — Bernd died in 2007 at 75 — developed a signature technique. Using an 8-by-10 large-format camera, they shot factory plants, water towers, blast furnaces, gas tanks, grain solos, lime kilns and other utilitarian structures in overcast weather.Each photograph was a solo portrait — from which humans were, for the most part, absent.They then developed their prints by hand and arrayed them for display, often in geometric grids.Ordered, analytical, rigorous and unsentimental, the images were a deadpan chronicle of the built landscape, hinting at the environmental and social consequences of extracting natural resources. The Bechers’ photos illustrated the effects of industrialization, as plants and factories were shuttered, rendering them obsolete, presumably like those workers who had once toiled inside.Gabriele Conrath-Scholl, the director of Die Photographische Sammlung/SK Stiftung Kultur, a gallery in Cologne that exhibited and archived the couple’s work, described them as outsiders who deeply unsettled the art world with a seminal catalog, “Anonymous Sculptures: A Typology of Technical Buildings,” in 1970.The book gave their work its first widespread exposure in America. It was followed by shows, organized by the gallerist Ileana Sonnabend, in Paris and New York.“People were astonished that this could be art,” Ms. Conrath-Scholl said in a telephone interview on Wednesday.The Bechers’ photographic grids influenced the Minimalist and Conceptual art schools as well as artists like Ed Ruscha and Douglas Huebler, who produced images according to systematic rules.Hilla and Bernd Becher, who were themselves influenced by August Sander’s photographs of industrial Germany between the two world wars, referred to their artistic orientation as the New Objectivity.Some critics found the images too unsparing and reductive. Assessing “Europe in the Seventies: Aspects of Recent Art,” a 1977 show at the Art Institute of Chicago, the critic Hilton Kramer, writing in The New York Times, described the Bechers’ images of “preparation plants,” which are used to process coal, salt and other minerals.“From these photographic sets we are expected, I gather, to glean some intelligence about process and structure,” he wrote. “The pictures themselves are not intended to exert an aesthetic appeal, and in fact they have no aesthetic appeal. They look like the sort of pictures one sees in a real estate office.”The images were not merely documentation. The Bechers developed what they called typologies: sets of 9, 12 or 15 images of structures of the same type and construction, comparing and contrasting their shared features, establishing a visual grammar akin to the biological illustrations to which Hilla Becher compared their process.In time, most of the buildings the Bechers documented were abandoned or demolished. “Both artists regarded this situation with a heavy heart,” Ms. Conrath-Scholl said, “but as an irrefutable fact: Photography always allows us to look back, it transports the present to another point in time — and there is no reason to grieve or wax sentimental about it.”Hilla Wobeser was born on Sept. 2, 1934, in Potsdam. She began taking pictures as an adolescent, and then trained in the studio of the photographer Walter Eichgrün, photographing local structures like the Prussian palace Sanssouci.She moved to Hamburg at 20 and worked as a freelance photographer for an aerial photography company. In 1957, while working at an advertising agency in Düsseldorf, she met Bernhard Becher, known as Bernd, an art student at the Düsseldorf Art Academy, which she was then attending. Their collaboration began while they were still in school, in 1959, in the industrial Siegerland area, where Bernd was raised, and the Ruhr. They married in 1961.Traveling in a Volkswagen, they photographed sites all over Germany, and also in the Netherlands, Belgium, Luxembourg and France; they also took photos in Britain and the United States. In time, they received many accolades, and they taught a generation of German photographers, including Andreas Gursky, Candida Höfer, Thomas Ruff and Thomas Struth.Ms. Becher is survived by a son, Max, also an artist and photographer, and two grandchildren.“What we were interested in were the visual and the sculptural aspects of the structures,” Ms. Becher once said. “And because these types of purpose-built structures can’t be preserved forever, we wanted to at least hold them fast in pictures, and so we began to collect them. Photography basically means nothing more than collecting.”For full reviews of recent concerts: nytimes.com/music. A searchable guide to these and other shows is at nytimes.com/events.A Place to Bury Strangers  (Friday and Saturday) These brutish noise rockers from Brooklyn cop the psychedelic flurries of the Jesus and Mary Chain through volume levels that defy all logic and decorum. The band continues to support its fourth album, “Transfixiation.” At 8 p.m., Saint Vitus, 1120 Manhattan Avenue, at Clay Street, Greenpoint, Brooklyn, saintvitusbar.com. (Stacey Anderson)Brandi Carlile  (Friday) This singer-songwriter’s delicate falsetto lends itself to country-pop melodicism and spare acoustic backing. Her latest album, “The Firewatcher’s Daughter,” veers into more rock ‘n’ roll terrain but still has gentle, cathartic moments of balladry, most notably on the Laurel Canyon-folk-influenced single “The Eye.” At 8 p.m., Radio City Music Hall, 866-858-0008, radiocity.com. (Anderson)Frankie Cosmos (Tuesday) A former poetry student at New York University and daughter of the actors Phoebe Cates and Kevin Kline, Greta Kline constructs preternaturally poised lo-fi folk-pop with thoughtful verses and echoing vocals. She leads the group Frankie Cosmos, which released its debut, “Zentropy,” in 2014; the art set has already sought to claim her, as evidenced by a high-profile set at the Museum of Modern Art last summer. Part of the CMJ Marathon with Mega Bog, Sheer Agony and Laced. At 9 p.m., Baby’s All Right, 146 Broadway, near Bedford Avenue, Williamsburg, Brooklyn, babysallright.com. (Anderson)★ Drinks  (Saturday) The Welsh singer-songwriter Cate Le Bon and the Californian garage-rocker Tim Presley (of White Fence) coolly push their spatial confines in this new project. Ms. Le Bon’s staccato vocals, paired with Mr. Presley’s chiming guitar, craft a sly, often eruptive friction. Their album, “Hermits on Holiday,” landed in August; its title track is an off-kilter, even droll battle march. With Droor and Big Search. At 8 p.m., Baby’s All Right, 146 Broadway, near Bedford Avenue, Williamsburg, Brooklyn, babysallright.com. (Anderson)Gringo Star  (Saturday) Despite the Beatlemanic nod, this young quartet from Atlanta takes its influences from other British Invasion rockers: The labyrinthine, hazy hooks are ripped from the Kinks’ expansive greenery, and the tight guitar payoffs deliver a certain kind of Rolling Stones melodic satisfaction. Octopi-related anthems are pleasantly absent from the group’s third album, “Floating Out to See.” With Golden Animals and Las Hormiguitas. At 8 p.m., Cameo Gallery, back room of the Lovin’ Cup Café, 93 North Sixth Street, Williamsburg, Brooklyn, 718-302-1180, cameony.net. (Anderson)The Hum (Mondays through Oct. 26) This inventive weekly residency brings together female musicians across genres for collaboration. The successful first installment in April included Shilpa Ray and Teen; this time around, they’ve booked musicians from Wilsen, Balancer and Salt Cathedral, among others. At 9 p.m., Manhattan Inn, 632 Manhattan Avenue, hypnocraftpresents.com. (Andrew R. Chow)Tobias Jesso Jr. (Wednesday and Thursday) Another member of the ’70s-inflected folk-pop surge, along with Father John Misty and Patrick Watson, Mr. Jesso is fast capturing national attention for “Goon,” his debut solo album. On it, the Canadian singer-songwriter bemoans his lovelorn state over simple, crushing piano riffs, sounding like a perfectly sincere contemporary ringer for James Taylor. With Wet, as part of the CMJ Marathon. At 9 p.m., Music Hall of Williamsburg, 66 North Sixth Street, Brooklyn, 718-486-5400, musichallofwilliamsburg.com. (Anderson)★ Luna  (Friday) The hypnotizing dream-pop singer Dean Wareham packs a heavy-lidded sexuality straight from a Warhol film. He shrewdly capitalized on it two years ago when he and his wife, Britta Phillips, composed the sweetly damaged album “13 Most Beautiful... Songs for Andy Warhol’s Screen Tests.” They both should shine in this reunion of their most famous project, the gorgeous dream-pop band Luna, which thrived in the mid-1990s and reunites this fall for its first shows in a decade. With EZTV. At 9 p.m., Music Hall of Williamsburg, 66 North Sixth Street, Brooklyn, musichallofwilliamsburg.com, 718-486-5400. (Anderson)★ Holly Miranda (Thursday) In the right mood, on the right stage, the Detroit singer-songwriter Ms. Miranda will belt her absolutely debilitating cover of Etta James’s “I’d Rather Go Blind.” Most tracks from her hazy, self-titled blues-pop solo album, released this year, offer similarly gorgeous torture. As part of the CMJ Marathon, she headlines an acoustic day showcase that also includes Morningsiders, Frankie Cosmos and more. At 1 p.m., Knitting Factory, 361 Metropolitan Avenue, at Havemeyer Street, Williamsburg, Brooklyn, 347-529-6696, bk.knittingfactory.com. (Anderson)The Month in Cabaret The fall’s splashiest event is the return of the New York Cabaret Convention — now in its 26th year — to the Town Hall, the place it all began. The gala opening, on Oct. 13, is hosted by K.T. Sullivan and features Christine Andreas, Marilyn Maye, Amanda McBroom and Vivian Reed. Karen Akers and Ann Hampton Callaway are among the singers on the Oct. 14 program, titled “A Sentimental Journey: World War II Songs.” It’s followed on Oct. 15 with “Life is a Cabaret: The Songs of Kander & Ebb,” which includes performances by T. Oliver Reed, Steve Ross and Sandy Stewart. And Maureen McGovern is the biggest name in the Oct. 16 double-barreled finale, “What I Did For/Take a Chance on /Love: The Music of Vernon Duke and Marvin Hamlisch.” (At 6 p.m., 123 West 43rd Street, Manhattan, 800-982-2787, thetownhall.org.)Other notable October engagements include the jazz singer Kurt Elling swinging Sinatra standards at Café Carlyle (Oct. 13 through 17), followed by Alexa Ray Joel, Billy’s singing and songwriting daughter, on Oct. 20 through 24 and Oct. 27 through 31. (At 8:45 p.m., with an additional performance on Oct. 17 at 10:45 p.m.; 35 East 76th Street, Manhattan, 212-744-1600, thecarlyle.com.)Jarrod Spector and Kelli Barrett’s show, “This Is Dedicated: Music’s Greatest Marriages,” at Feinstein’s/54 Below, salutes married show business couples from Sonny and Cher, to Beyoncé and Jay-Z (Oct. 20 through 23). Also at that venue, on Oct. 28 through 31, Barb Jungr and John McDaniel eviscerate the songs of the Fab Four in “Come Together: The Music of the Beatles.” (At 7 p.m., 254 West 54th Street, Manhattan, 646-476-3551, 54below.com.)At Birdland, the jazz-singing gamine Karrin Allyson swings Rodgers and Hammerstein through Oct. 10. (At 8:30 and 11 p.m., 315 West 44th Street, Clinton, 212-581-3080, birdlandjazz.com.)In more dangerous avant-garde mode, Tammy Faye Starlite’s “Cabaret Marianne” pays tribute to the equally nervy Marianne Faithfull (Thursdays in October at 7:30 p.m., 178 Second Avenue, between East 11th and 12th Streets, East Village, 212-995-0900, pangeanyc.com.) And that’s just skimming the surface. (Stephen Holden)Neon Indian  (Wednesday) Tinny, eight-bit scrapes of sound fit neatly into relaxed electronic noisescapes on “Era Extraña,” the second album by Neon Indian. Heavily synthesized yet straightforward, the band is a glib update on retro-pop. It releases the album “VEGA INTL. Night School” two days after this showcase for the CMJ Festival. With Tamaryn and Hannah Cohen. At 8 p.m., Webster Hall, 125 East 11th Street, East Village, 212-353-1600, websterhall.com/events. (Anderson)★ Panda Bear  (Tuesday to Thursday) This experimental electronics auteur — who, apropos to his stage name, is a founding member of the psych-pop squad Animal Collective — came out the better end of his dance with Death on “Panda Bear Meets the Grim Reaper,” his fifth studio album. On it, the singer and multi-instrumentalist (whose real name is Noah Lennox) merged jolting synthetic paces with his band’s brand of swooning psych-folk harmonies, delivering something both agitating in pace and deeply comforting in vocals. With PC Worship and Deakin (D.J. Set). Part of the CMJ Marathon. At 9 p.m., Bowery Ballroom, 6 Delancey Street, Lower East Side, 800-745-3000, boweryballroom.com. (Anderson)Steely Dan  (Friday, Saturday, Tuesday and Wednesday) The most triumphant intellectual jazz-rockers of the 1970s, Steely Dan amassed a fervid cult following for their obsessively conceptual albums and unpredictable muses (Charlemagne, for one). Now the front men, Donald Fagen and Walter Becker, return for a retrospective residency that began earlier this week. It features sets devoted to the performance of a record in its entirety, including the much-adored “Aja” and “Gaucho.” (Also on Oct. 16 and 17.) At 8 p.m., Beacon Theater, 2124 Broadway, at 74th Street, 800-745-3000, beacontheatre.com. (Anderson)Steep Canyon Rangers  (Monday) The members of this bluegrass group from North Carolina have talent for more than sonorous harmony and breakneck fiddle instrumentals. As Steve Martin’s onetime backing band, these musicians were also world-class straight men during Mr. Martin’s festival dates. This performance will revolve around the lead vocals of Woody Platt, quite the charmer himself. At 8 p.m., Bowery Ballroom, 6 Delancey Street, Lower East Side, 800-745-3000, boweryballroom.com. (Anderson)The Zombies  (Friday) These British Invasion cadets have heard their swooning psych-pop hit, “She’s Not There,” repurposed by such tastemaking folks as Nick Cave and Neko Case, who teamed up for a cover on the “True Blood” soundtrack. The original members Rod Argent and Colin Blunstone regrouped in 2011 for the band’s 50th anniversary and released “Breathe Out, Breathe In,” their sixth album and a conversant prog-pop throwback. The group performs their pinnacle second album, “Odessey & Oracle.” At 8 p.m., New York Society for Ethical Culture, 2 West 64th Street, Manhattan, ticketfly.com. (Anderson)★ Stevie Wonder  (Wednesday) “Sir Duke” will ride again as the venerable Mr. Wonder extends his first national tour since 2009. He will perform his quintessential 1976 record, “Songs in the Key of Life,” the double album that has inspired scores of R&B; dreamers. In 2005, the Library of Congress added it to the National Recording Registry. The fortunate audiences of his recent festival performances — including sets at the Global Citizen Festival and Bonnaroo — can attest to his charisma, still broad onstage. At 8 p.m., Prudential Center, 165 Mulberry Street, Newark, 800-745-3000, prucenter.com. (Anderson)★ ‘Reconfiguration: An Evening With Other Lives’  (Friday and Saturday) The Oklahoma-bred orchestral rockers have opened for several critical pop favorites, including Bon Iver and Radiohead. Their third studio album, “Rituals,” is an expansively crafted mission statement in the vein of those ensembles. The group performs as part of the 2015 Next Wave Festival with an expanded stage show of new visuals and live video. At 7:30 p.m., Howard Gilman Opera House, Brooklyn Academy of Music, 30 Lafayette Avenue, at Ashland Place, Fort Greene, 718-636-4100, bam.org. (Anderson)★ Yo La Tengo  (Saturday) The conquering indie-rock troubadours of Hoboken, N.J., released their most recent studio album, “Stuff Like That There,” in August, which served as a chipper and unofficial sequel to their classic 1990 album “Fakebook.” The band recently celebrated its 30th anniversary together and perform acoustically at Kings Theater with the founding group guitarist Dave Schramm. With Nick Lowe. At 8 p.m., Kings Theater, 1027 Flatbush Avenue, near Tilden Avenue, Brooklyn, kingstheatre.com. (Anderson)The artist Eric Fischl remembers the time a friend waved a catalog at him to alert him that one of his paintings was up for auction for six figures in London. In reality, the work was a fake, but so convincing, Mr. Fischl said, “I thought I was losing my mind.”Brushes with forgery like that one two decades ago, and concerns about his legacy and estate, prompted Mr. Fischl to appear in London on Monday to vouch for a new authentication system that would let artists sign their works with specks of synthetic DNA.The method is being developed at the Global Center for Innovation at the State University of New York at Albany. The school said it had received $2 million in funding from the ARIS Title Insurance Corporation, which specializes in art.Two years ago, the center, known for its work in bioengineering, encryption and nanotechnology, set about developing a way to infuse paintings, sculptures and other artworks with complex molecules of DNA created in the lab.“We wanted a marker that was very hard to locate and not prone to environmental issues or tampering,” Robert J. Jones, president of SUNY Albany, said. Equally important, he added, was that artists would embrace the approach.Experts say fakes have become one of the most vexing problems in the art market. Scandals like the one involving dozens of forgeries sold through the venerable Knoedler Gallery in Manhattan before it closed in 2011 are sapping the confidence of buyers, owners and artists, they say.An objective way of marking art would be particularly attractive at a time when reliance on subjective expertise, or connoisseurship, and often-incomplete provenance, seems to be waning. Curators, artists’ foundations and independent experts now often shy away from authenticating works for fear of being sued.“There is a deep freeze in authentications,” said Colette Loll of Art Fraud Insights, who was a consultant on the project.But while automobiles, for example, have vehicle identification numbers, works by living artists enter the market without dependable standards of identification.The new approach, in its formative stage, would implant synthetic DNA, not the personal DNA of the artists, because of privacy issues and because a person’s DNA could conceivably be stolen and embedded, thus undermining the authority of such a marking protocol.The developers said the bioengineered DNA would be unique to each item and provide an encrypted link between the art and a database that would hold the consensus of authoritative information about the work. The DNA details could be read by a scanner available to anyone in the art industry wanting to verify an object.Those trying to create the new standard said they had signed up three dozen internationally recognized artists, archives, foundations and museums who want to test the technology, which could be ready as early as next year.Artists and owners would buy a kind of tag that they could use to apply the DNA. Early estimates by the developers say tags would cost about $150. Once applied, the DNA would penetrate the work at the molecular level, so removing the tag would not eliminate the item’s forensic signature.“We see it as a secure, safe and invisible solution that artists and owners can accept,” said Lawrence M. Shindell, chairman of ARIS, which is based in New York. “Our goal is to remove uncertainty from the market.”Potential buyers and sellers could also check items for DNA codes to see whether the items had been stolen. Doing so could block their resale by galleries and auctioneers and bring about their recovery, the supporters said.They said it was crucial that applying the tags have no impact on the work.Deciphering and replicating the DNA would be all but impossible, according to Mr. Shindell. He said even sophisticated counterfeiters “would leave microscopic forensic evidence” if they tried to remove or replace the DNA.Mr. Jones said SUNY took on the task as a public service and a possible revenue generator, though those details remain unclear. ARIS said it had no ownership of the technology, but would benefit from the greater transparency and confidence in a $55-billion-a-year market in which it sells insurance.“It makes a lot of sense for us to be involved given that the state of New York is one of the world’s largest art markets,” Mr. Jones said. “We hope there will be financial benefits from creating the intellectual property and the process becomes a gold standard in the industry.”Mr. Fischl said he wanted to assure fellow artists that the idea is “a no-brainer” for preventing forgeries of their work from being sold. He added that “authenticating a work from the very start can alleviate the pain and frustration people go through when they think they have something of great value and they really don’t.”“What’s not sexy about synthetic DNA?” he added.The triptych of Schubert song cycles with the great English tenor Mark Padmore was always going to be one of the main attractions of this year’s White Light Festival. With Paul Lewis as accompanist, the three-concert traversal of “Die schöne Müllerin,” (“The Lovely Mill Maiden”), “Schwanengesang” (Swan Song) and “Winterreise” (Winter Journey) was to feature a great Schubertian at the piano. But after Mr. Lewis dropped out with health problems, Mr. Padmore announced he would team up with Kristian Bezuidenhout, one of today’s leading performers on period keyboard instruments.Mr. Bezuidenhout will play a fortepiano which, with its more introverted sound palette, may prove a perfect foil for Mr. Padmore’s clear, unforced and grippingly vulnerable style of singing. It’s a rare chance to experience Schubert up close and intimate. (“Die schöne Müllerin,” Wednesday, Oct. 14; “Schwanengesang” on Thursday, Oct. 15; and “Winterreise” on Oct. 17, Alice Tully Hall; whitelightfestival.org.)Ian Hobson is not a pianist who does things by half-measures. His discography includes complete sets of Beethoven’s and Schumann’s sonatas, and his survey of Chopin’s works for piano — all of them — is in full swing. Two seasons ago, he offered New York audiences a 14-recital perusal of the entire catalog of Brahms’s chamber music for and with piano.On Tuesday at SubCulture, Mr. Hobson presented the first of six concerts in a new series titled Preludes - Études - Variations, which will be split between this Greenwich Village basement club and Merkin Concert Hall uptown. Its subject seems a perfect match for a pianist of such encyclopedic leanings. Preludes and études are musical snapshots exploring a single mood, texture or technical constraint and were often published in collections. Performed in sequence, they reveal interconnections not unlike those linking a series of variations on a theme.Chopin, Rachmaninoff and Debussy will figure prominently in this series, but Mr. Hobson will also draft in Fauré, Schumann and Szymanowski, as well as contemporary composers. On Tuesday Mr. Hobson opened and closed with Chopin.The sweet clarity of “Trois Nouvelles Études,” written for publication in a piano instruction book, contrasts with the virtuosic swagger of Chopin’s Opus 25 Études, a 12-part collection well suited to the concert stage. With his powerful sound and cleareyed command of multiple voices, Mr. Hobson offered a reading of the Opus 25 set that was varied and exciting. He also vividly characterized each of Rachmaninoff’s 10 Opus 23 Preludes, from the boozy impatience of the fifth to the noble singing voice of the concluding Largo.Mr. Hobson offered as well a persuasive and evocative first performance of Stephen Taylor’s “Variations Ascending,” a kind of evolutionary history of the world in 10 chapters, built around a musical representation of a single gene. The first, jerkily syncopated variation, for instance, represents the Cambrian explosion 500 million years ago; the aquatic blur of the second stands for the Devonian Age of Fishes; the stormy fugato of the 10th variation announces the arrival of Homo sapiens.The subject of both works in the final program of New York City Ballet repertory this season is ebullient innocence. But George Balanchine’s two-act “Harlequinade” (1965) and Jerome Robbins’s “N.Y. Export: Opus Jazz” (1958) face in fascinatingly opposite directions. The older ballet, the Robbins, seems the more present-day because its jazz music, by Robert Prince, points to a New York we still recognize, whereas Balanchine’s, taking the score and scenario of a 1900 comedy ballet (“Les Millions d’Arlequin”) by the choreographer Marius Petipa and the composer Riccardo Drigo, looks back into the primary-color never-never land of the commedia dell’arte.These works show opposite views of human nature, too. The characters of the commedia realm of “Harlequinade” — led by the extrovert lover Harlequin and his pretty Columbine — are bright, fixed, unchanging, and they deliver their dances exuberantly straight to the audience. The people of “Opus Jazz” are still unformed, raw, discovering who they are, and they play less for observers than for one another. The dance language for “Harlequinade” is scintillatingly virtuoso ballet; “Opus Jazz” is danced in sneakers, with hips bumping and shoulders shaking, with hands sometimes stretched out low (like pianists’) and sometimes with palms open and fingers splayed out to the public.The music for each is engaging. Drigo’s piquant score abounds in the 3/4 and 4/4 meters of the late 19th century, with the melody of each number picked out in a different sonority. One serenade is celebrated. (in 1922, the star tenor Beniamino Gigli made a best-selling recording of it as “Notturno d’Amore.”) A pizzicato number has special charm, as does the woodwind-and-strings fragrance of Columbine’s wonderfully affectionate second-act solo variation. And, in one piece of incidental music in Act I (largely with Harlequin alone onstage), two groups of violins play as if on charmingly different wavelengths.The Prince score for “Opus Jazz” is diverse. Saxophone, percussion, muted brass all make individual impressions. Spirits range from low to high; some sections seem to have no pulse at all, just moods hanging in the air, while in others the pulse, intense, changes and changes again.Joaquin de Luz, who led Tuesday’s cast at the David H. Koch Theater, perhaps has no better role than Harlequin. His energy, virtuosity, timing, sunniness and charm are all wonderfully vivid. At the start of one solo, every big upbeat finds him cresting at the top of another new jump; at its end, when he spins flamboyantly with one leg extended, the greatest pleasure is the brio with which his instep always rises on the beat.As Columbine, Tiler Peck plays ideally with her own brilliance. Even when turning or jumping at top speed, she has time; she can linger during a slow tempo as if in love with each passing moment, and she strikes a position on point as if to let her whole body exhale into the air.Her glittering dark eyes, bright smile and sharp face, with its dimples and multiple planes, are all ideal for this role. As soon as we see her, we know who she is — and then she lets us know that we don’t. In her Act II solo, she switches continually between playing for the public and communing with herself; she seems to discover her own heart and then open it to us.Some of the best dances — and some of the most marvelous of Rouben Ter-Arutunian’s costumes — go to the children from the School of American Ballet. In one number, they keep arriving in position (bodies leaning forward), and then Balanchine end-stops the phrase with a big exchange of arm positions: a smart punch line that makes them startlingly adult.The dancers for “Opus Jazz” — as in a number of Robbins ballets — are taken from the company’s corps and soloist ranks; each registers individually. There’s a special fascination just now in watching Justin Peck (not related to Tiler) — a dancer in his 20s but already a choreographer of note far beyond the company — in this and all his roles. His height and expansiveness make a particular impression, and here his somewhat geeky appeal is combined with a surprising naïveté. Elsewhere, you watch Georgina Pazcoguin and Harrison Coll, with their uninhibited vitality, like people you know in your own neighborhood.Ashley Laracey and Craig Hall danced the somber “Passage for Two” duet on Tuesday with marvelous hunger. This may be their first encounter — their first relationship — and this relationship may never recur. Their quality of intimate need and first-time urgency is enthralling.Last week, the former CBS News producer Mary Mapes was back on West 53rd Street at the Museum of Modern Art for the premiere of the movie “Truth.” Ms. Mapes, the author of the book that inspired this movie, got a Hollywood welcome from an adoring crowd and blew a kiss to the film’s director and screenwriter, James Vanderbilt.The warm reception was a considerably different scene from what Ms. Mapes confronted just across the street 11 years earlier, at CBS’s Midtown headquarters, where the story of “Truth” took shape.Back then, she sat in a conference room and was asked by an independent panel hired by CBS to explain how a “60 Minutes II” report that she produced had gone wrong.The movie, which opens Friday, is about Ms. Mapes’s segment that was built around documents suggesting President George W. Bush had received preferential treatment for his National Guard service in the early 1970s. But in the days following the broadcast, the documents were subjected to withering scrutiny, and within two weeks, and in the heat of the 2004 presidential election, CBS said it could not authenticate them.The story unraveled, and so did the team that produced it: CBS apologized, three producers resigned, Ms. Mapes was fired and would never return to television news. Two months after it aired, Dan Rather, the “CBS Evening News” anchor and the correspondent for the segment, announced he was retiring. Months later, “60 Minutes II” was canceled.It was one of the earliest examples of the power of the Internet and the information it makes readily available, which enabled an instant review of a fabled institution’s reporting. In the years since, the episode was, at least in some quarters, considered a settled matter — this was flawed reporting.Now the movie, which stars Cate Blanchett as Ms. Mapes and Robert Redford as Mr. Rather, will reopen a conversation about a journalistic controversy that had faded away, especially since it relies on the viewpoint of Ms. Mapes. She and Mr. Rather have long claimed their report was true, if imperfectly executed. The movie gives voice to their cause.“These guys had to live with being shut down for years and years,” Mr. Redford said at a New York Times panel discussion last week, discussing Mr. Rather and Ms. Mapes. “The idea of playing a role in a project that would open things up and give them their day in court, which I thought they well deserved, was very appealing to me.”The battle lines are clear: CBS said it could not prove the documents were real and the story was bogus as a result; Mr. Rather and Ms. Mapes maintain that no one can prove that they were forgeries. The movie relies on information that has long been in the public record.The prospect of revisiting the case was surprising to many in journalistic circles and not at all appealing to CBS. A network spokesman said in a statement that it was “astounding how little truth there is in ‘Truth.’ There are, in fact, too many distortions, evasions and baseless conspiracy theories to enumerate them all.”Andrew Heyward, the former president of CBS News, who was not portrayed kindly in Ms. Mapes’s book, said he had not seen the movie but was familiar with its story line. He expressed outrage in a telephone interview. “It takes people responsible for the worst embarrassment in the history of CBS News, and what was at the time a grievous blow to the credibility of a proud news organization, and turns them into martyrs and heroes,” he said. “Only Hollywood could come up with that.”Mr. Rather, in a brief telephone interview, said, “I just hope people see the movie and make up their own mind.”Both sides agree that the story was rushed. “60 Minutes II,” which was created in an era when networks were crazed about newsmagazines, aired on Wednesday nights. But it was facing two consecutive weeks of pre-emptions, and story executives were concerned that if they waited any later than early September it would be too close to the 2004 presidential election.The story ran only days after CBS received the documents, on Sept. 8, 2004.Shortly after the broadcast came accusations, particularly on right-wing websites, that the documents were forgeries. That spiked an initial wave of skepticism, and within two weeks CBS had lost confidence in a couple of key sources. One source, who supplied the documents, said that he lied to CBS about how he obtained them. The network found itself without a way to authenticate them.Ms. Mapes, who declined to be interviewed for this article but spoke at The New York Times panel, acknowledges mistakes in the reporting but still defends the story.“There is a tremendously strong perception that we bungled, bungled, bungled very badly,” she said at the discussion. “I think we were within the normal journalistic range of bungle.”The movie faithfully follows Ms. Mapes’s retelling, and glamorizes the often gritty act of her team’s reporting. In her book, Ms. Mapes forcefully casts Viacom, CBS’s corporate parent at the time, as a villain that buckled to pressure from the Bush administration, a theme the movie echoes at times.Mr. Vanderbilt said that he did not want to impose a specific point of view in the movie but instead wanted to simply raise questions.“As a filmmaker I’m not interested in re-prosecuting something, so much as this was a fascinating story and telling it through these characters eyes was the most interesting way in,” he said. At the center of it all, he said, “are these documents, and there is an unknowable mystery about them.”The mystery of those documents was a more significant problem for CBS.“Journalism is based not on assertion but on verification,” Mr. Heyward said. “You can’t wish facts into existence. In this case, the central facts, the documents, are in grave dispute to the point where there’s a lot of evidence that they may not have been real. And enough evidence that we apologized and said we shouldn’t have aired it.”Journalists, in general, have largely agreed with this point: If documents are a main part of the story, they must be verified.“They didn’t do the No. 1 basic thing that you’re supposed to do when you’re dealing with documents, and that is to have them checked, proved,” said Richard Wald, the former president of NBC News and a journalism professor at Columbia University. “They didn’t do it.”Mr. Rather gave credit to critics who attacked “the process” by which the story was reported.“Once again, we’re talking about the process in which it was put together and what happened in the wake of the story,” he said. “And this is a gentle, a very gentle reminder, that the story was true. The basic facts of the story were true.”If there is one thing all sides have agreed on, it is that they could not have anticipated the way the story would come undone. “It’s the first time the Internet really rose up and affected a story with the speed it did and with the power it did,’’ Mr. Vanderbilt said. “CBS and Dan and Mary were completely unprepared for that. That was only 11 years ago, and now that’s every day for us.”In the basement laundry room of an apartment building in Red Hook, Brooklyn, late on a Friday afternoon, a woman in a crisp blue dress squeezed past a neighbor stuffing clothes into the dryer.“We’re just going to be moving the piano,” she explained.With that, Erin Durant and her boyfriend and her friend with a van hauled out an upright piano and began maneuvering it up seven uneven concrete steps to the street.After much heaving-ho and delicate shoving, the piano lay on its back in the rear of a cargo van. Ms. Durant’s boyfriend paused to rub his wrist. And Ms. Durant, a singer-songwriter who has spent much of the past year lugging a 232-pound piano around New York, was off to another gig.There are easier ways to pursue a musical calling in the city, as the hordes with guitars slung across their shoulders and saxophone cases in their hands can attest. And there are electronic keyboards, more and more sophisticated, asymptotically approaching the sound of an acoustic piano.But Ms. Durant, a New Orleans transplant who moved to New York a decade ago, craves the sonic solidity and three-dimensionality of the real thing.“It kind of responds back to you,” she said the other evening before a show. “The kind of music that I play” — spare, gospel-tinged, redolent of old parlors — “is more suited to a real piano.”Ms. Durant is not the only musician who can be seen pushing a piano around the streets of New York. Colin Huggins, who has been rolling his 600-pound baby grand into Washington Square Park on weekends for years, said that at least half a dozen others had been following in his wake, though he said he had never heard of or seen a woman piloting a piano.Ms. Durant said she drew inspiration from another musician — a harpist named Shelley Burgon, who said she had learned some useful tricks hauling an 85-pound concert grand harp across the city’s clubscape.“One thing I always check on is to find out if there’s handicapped accessibility,” Ms. Burgon said. “That makes loading a harp a lot easier: ramps, elevators. Harps and the handicapped, we’re friends.”Ms. Durant used to carry around a Nord electronic keyboard, no feather itself at 50 pounds or so. Then she performed a few times at a place in Williamsburg that had a piano, the Brooklyn Rod and Gun Club. It spoiled her.“I played a show with my electric keyboard after having played a bunch of shows where they had a piano,” Ms. Durant said, “and as a performer it felt sort of lonely. I didn’t have that piano to kind of kick back at me.”She looked around and discovered a type of piano known as a Tom Thumb, popular, in the analog era, on cruise ships.Ms. Durant’s model, built by the Kawai company around 1970, has 64 keys rather than the standard 88. The top of it is only about belly high. But it still weighs about as much as 10 marching-band tubas, or a half-dozen double basses.And because Ms. Durant is not an Olympic weight lifter, transporting the piano, she said, “takes some finessing.”And friends.“Moving it is a dance of gumption, peace and determination,” one of them, Adriana Atema, said.Another, Jay Pluck, recalled, “There was a tricky moment getting it off the stage at the Mercury Lounge.”That particular Friday, the van lurched along the Brooklyn-Queens Expressway toward the evening’s destination, an old storefront in Greenpoint that was once a restaurant.There was no stage or anything like it. The musicians set up in the aisle leading to the bathroom. The piano was wedged against an ancient oven.Before the show, Ms. Durant, in her blue prairie-diner-waitress dress, served Korean-style rice bowls with tofu and pickled burdock root to the guests.Then she took her seat at the piano. Wood-warmed notes flowed out over the room. She sang, a high clear voice with curls in it. “I wanna roll down the river, I wanna take you by surprise.” That was back in June.Ms. Durant’s piano has already had several homes: a friend’s studio, a dungeonlike basement space in Williamsburg, Ms. Durant’s slightly more accessible basement in Red Hook. Over the summer, she found a ground-floor rehearsal space in Williamsburg — no more stairs. She also got her own van, and her father, a naval architect, built a wooden brace for the inside so that the piano can travel standing up.Moving it is still an adventure.On a Friday evening in mid-September, Ms. Durant and two other women were struggling to get the piano up onto a dolly on Manhattan Avenue in Greenpoint when a tall stranger approached.“Do you guys need help, or do you do this all the time?” he asked.“O.K., come on,” Ms. Durant’s friend Brie Ruais said. “Come on. You want to help?”“I kind of enjoy moving pianos for some reason,” the man said.A few minutes later, the piano was up over the curb, up over the doorstep of Troost, a cozy narrow bar with prosecco on tap.The tall helper shook Ms. Durant’s hand. “My name is Tim,” he said.After short sets by a few friends, Ms. Durant strapped on her harmonica and sat down at the little piano bench. She stroked a few autumnal chords, barely audible over the din.“I know a place where you can go,” she sang. The bar quieted down and the piano seemed to grow larger as the sound filled the front of the room.Ms. Durant glanced up and out the window at the street and the moonless night and paused for a moment. Then she set her gaze at the keys and continued to play.Museums and galleries are in Manhattan unless otherwise noted. Full reviews of recent art shows: nytimes.com/art. A searchable guide to these and many other art shows is at nytimes.com/events. Museums★ Asia Society and Museum: ‘Philippine Gold: Treasures of Forgotten Kingdoms’ (through Jan. 3) More than half a millennium before Ferdinand Magellan reached the archipelago now called the Philippines in 1521, a number of related societies thrived there. One of the few things known about them today is that they were astoundingly skillful goldsmiths. This gorgeous and historically intriguing exhibition presents nearly 120 pieces dating from the 10th through the 13th centuries, including bracelets, necklaces, pendants, collars, finger rings, bowls and a balance scale made entirely of gold. The star of the show is a gleaming, nine-pound sash made of gold beads that could be mistaken for a futuristic ammunition belt. 725 Park Avenue, at 70th Street, 212-517-2742, asiasociety.org. (Ken Johnson)★ Bronx Museum of the Arts, El Museo del Barrio and Loisaida Inc.: ’¡Presente! The Young Lords in New York’ (through Dec. 12) On July 26, 1969, a group of young Latinos stood on stage of the band shell in Tompkins Square Park, in the East Village, and declared the founding of the New York branch of a revolution-minded political party called the Young Lords. Its purpose was to gain social justice for New York’s working-class Latino population, then largely Puerto Rican and treated with contempt by the city. Most of the people on stage that day were recent college graduates well-versed in leftist political theory. To gain the trust and cooperation of the grass-roots communities — concentrated in the East Village, East Harlem and the South Bronx — they knew they needed to get their feet on the street, and they wasted no time. They cleaned up neighborhoods; battled for health care; and created spaces for art and music. Spread over three institutions, "¡Presente!” rescues a crucial episode in the city’s history and treats a vibrant political organization as both a cultural and an ideological phenomenon. Through Dec. 1 at Loisaida Inc., 710 East Ninth Street, Lower East Side, 646-757-0522, loisaida.org; through Dec. 12 at El Museo, 1230 Fifth Avenue, at 104th Street, East Harlem, 212-831-7272, elmuseo.org; through Oct. 18 at Bronx Museum, 1040 Grand Concourse, at 165th Street, Morrisania, 718-681-6000, bronxmuseum.org (Holland Cotter)Brooklyn Botanic Garden: Isamu Noguchi (through Dec. 13) The Noguchi Museum and the Brooklyn Botanic Garden are to be commended for installing such a show, in which sculpture is exposed to the elements (and the wandering visitors). But this exhibition of 18 of the Japanese-American artist’s sculptures parceled throughout the garden can be frustrating, as you attempt to locate his works on a specially provided map. The showcase of the exhibition is an installation of several Noguchi sculptures inside the Japanese Hill-and-Pond Garden, a marriage of modern and traditional forms, and there are works just below the Native Flora Garden that offer moments of successful communion with art and curated nature. 990 Washington Avenue, at Eastern Parkway, Prospect Heights, 718-623-7200, bbg.org. (Martha Schwendener)★ Brooklyn Historical Society: ‘Personal Correspondence: Photography and Letter Writing in Civil War Brooklyn’ (through spring 2016) Symbolically, the Civil War ended when Robert E. Lee surrendered to Ulysses S. Grant in the spring of 1865. For many people who lived through it, though, the war never ended at all, and it lives on in letters sent to and from the battlefield. Thousands of these ended up half-forgotten in attics and bureau drawers; a small stash comes to light in this exhibition that consists of just one little room with a lot in it — including letters, Civil War souvenirs and explanatory texts — with everything as readily accessible as if in a well-packed suitcase. 128 Pierrepont Street, near Clinton Street, Brooklyn Heights, 718-222-4111, brooklynhistory.org. (Cotter)Brooklyn Museum: ‘Impressionism and the Caribbean: Francisco Oller and His Transatlantic World’ (through Jan. 3) Francisco Oller (1833-1917) was the most celebrated Puerto Rican artist of the 19th century. For most of his career he was a facile imitator sojourning in Madrid and in Paris, where he hung out with Impressionist painters like Pissarro, Monet and Cézanne. But it wasn’t until after settling down in San Juan around age 60 that he came into his own, producing haunting landscapes and some mysteriously powerful still-life paintings that can plausibly be called great. This show presents 40 paintings by Oller and 45 works by other artists, including his European and American contemporaries and his Puerto Rican predecessors. 200 Eastern Parkway, at Prospect Park, 718-638-5000, brooklynmuseum.org. (Johnson)Brooklyn Museum: ‘Zanele Muholi: Isibonelo/Evidence’ (through Nov. 1) Describing herself as a “visual activist,” the South African photographer Zanele Muholi is dedicated to increasing the visibility of black lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender and intersex people with notable international success. Her stark black-and-white photographs often respond to the violence inflicted on those groups. But the exhibition also includes colorful photographs of same-sex weddings that are radiant, both with African sunshine and irrepressible joy. 200 Eastern Parkway, at Prospect Park, 718-638-5000, brooklynmuseum.org. (Schwendener)The Cloisters: ‘Treasures and Talismans: Rings From the Griffin Collection’ (through Oct. 18) In its most basic form as a small hoop made of anything that can be turned into a circle, the finger ring is the simplest, least encumbering kind of jewelry. Yet, as shown by this absorbing exhibition, a ring can be a miniature sculpture of marvelous complexity, skill and imagination. The show features more than 60 rings made in Europe from late Ancient Roman times to the Renaissance, and it’s amplified by two dozen paintings and sculptural objects related to ring making and customs. 99 Margaret Corbin Drive, Fort Tryon Park, Washington Heights, 212-923-3700, metmuseum.org. (Johnson)★ Cooper Hewitt Smithsonian Design Museum (continuing) The stately doors of the 1902 Andrew Carnegie mansion, home to the Cooper Hewitt, are open again after an overhaul and expansion of the premises. Historic house and modern museum have always made an awkward fit, a standoff between preservation and innovation, and the problem remains, but the renovation has brought a wide-open new gallery space, a cafe and a raft of be-your-own-designer digital enhancements. Best of all, more of the museum’s vast permanent collection is now on view, including an Op Art weaving, miniature spiral staircases, ballistic face masks and a dainty enameled 18th-century version of a Swiss knife. Like design itself, this institution is built on tumult and friction, and you feel it. 2 East 91st Street, at Fifth Avenue, 212-849-8400, cooperhewitt.org. (Cotter)★ Jewish Museum: ‘The Power of Pictures: Early Soviet Photography, Early Soviet Film’ (through Feb. 7) Revolutions sell utopias; that’s their job. Art, if it behaves itself and sticks to the right script, can be an important part of the promotional package. That’s the basic tale told by this exhibition of photographs and vintage films of the 1920s and ’30s, but with a question added: What happens to art when the script is drastically revised? Russia was an experiment in progress in the heady years following the 1917 revolution, and avant-garde art, free-spirited by definition, was officially embraced. When Joseph Stalin came to power art became government-dictated propaganda and its makers, often under threat, towed the line. Remarkably, the show presents a dozen films — some familiar, some not — full-length, on a rotating schedule of four a day, in a small viewing theater built into one of the Jewish Museum’s galleries. 1109 Fifth Avenue, at 92nd Street, 212-423-3200, thejewishmuseum.org. (Cotter)Metropolitan Museum of Art: ‘The Roof Garden Commission: Pierre Huyghe’ (through Nov. 1) This outdoor rooftop exhibition is about time. The main attraction is a massive fish tank containing a curious assortment of objects, animate and inanimate. As if by magic, a boulder of lava floats in the water, its top rising a bit above the surface. A couple of inches below is a mound of sand around which are swimming little brown eel-like lampreys and bright orange Triops cancriformis, or tadpole shrimp, two species thought not to have evolved in millions of years. Elsewhere on the roof, a boulder of Manhattan schist, the material that forms the bedrock for many New York City skyscrapers, represents geological duration. 212-535-7710, metmuseum.org. (Johnson)Metropolitan Museum of Art: ‘Grand Illusions: Staged Photography from the Met Collection’ (through Jan. 18) With 40 works, this small, choice exhibition forms a freewheeling survey of the ways and means of staged photography — the arranging objects or people for the camera — and the many needs and sensibilities it has served. Its smart installation jumps between past and present, commercial and fine, pre- and postmodern, and is peppered with surprises by artists well-known and not. 212-535-7710, metmuseum.org. (Roberta Smith)★ Metropolitan Museum of Art: ‘Kongo: Power and Majesty’ (through Jan. 3) For centuries the West assumed that African art had no history, because none had been found written down. But this tight, intense show, beautifully designed, with a stirring catalog, demonstrates otherwise. It begins in the 15th century when the rulers of Kongo peoples in Central Africa were sending luxury textiles to European courts and receiving gifts in return. It continues through the devastations of the slave trade, shifting from art made for pleasure and profit to art made to save lives and souls. It concludes with 15 sensational, just under life-size sculptures that were last-ditch responses to the slow-motion emergency of colonialism. 212-535-7710, metmuseum.org. (Cotter)★ Metropolitan Museum of Art: ‘Paintings by George Stubbs from the Yale Center for British Art’ (through Nov. 8) A rare sighting in New York: eight paintings by the inimitable English painter George Stubbs (1724-1806). They include two of his best racehorse pictures, with their stunning precision of anatomy, portraiture, landscape space and interspecies psychology. Four other paintings follow two men through a day of shooting small game and the fifth shows the gentle killing of a wounded doe at a hunt’s end. 212-535-7710, metmuseum.org. (Smith)★ Metropolitan Museum of Art: ‘Reimagining Modernism: 1900-1950’ (continuing) One of the greatest encyclopedic museums in the world fulfills its mission a little more with an ambitious reinstallation of works of early European modernism with their American counterparts for the first time in nearly 30 years. Objects of design and paintings by a few self-taught artists further the integration. It is quite a sight, with interesting rotations and fine-tunings to come. 212-535-7710, metmuseum.org. (Smith)Morbid Anatomy Museum: ‘Opus Hypnagogia: Sacred Spaces of the Visionary and Vernacular’ (through Oct. 18) Coined in the 19th century, the word hypnagogia refers to the transition period between wakefulness and sleep, when, while still conscious, you may find yourself seeing images, having thoughts or hearing things that make little logical sense. This disorganized but fascinating show presents a wildly eclectic selection of more than 50 paintings, drawings and sculptures, including voodoo ritual objects, antique illustrated mystical books and recent works of offbeat fantasy by contemporary artists, all or some of which might have been inspired by hypnagogic experiences. 424 Third Avenue, at Seventh Street, Gowanus, Brooklyn, morbidanatomymuseum.org, 347-799-1017. (Johnson)★ Morgan Library & Museum: ‘Ernest Hemingway: Between Two Wars’  (through Jan. 31) Mounted on walls that have been painted tropical blue to suggest Hemingway’s years in Key West and in Cuba, this show takes him all the way from high school to roughly 1950 with photographs, handwritten first-drafts and personal correspondence. But the largest and most interesting section focuses on the ’20s, Hemingway’s Paris years, and reveals a writer we might have been in danger of forgetting: Hemingway before he became Hemingway. 225 Madison Avenue, at 36th Street, 212-685-0008, themorgan.org. (Charles McGrath)Museum of Modern Art: ‘Scenes for a New Heritage: Contemporary Art from the Collection’ (through April 10) MoMA’s latest installation of works from its permanent collection fills the second-floor contemporary galleries with videos, installations, sculptures, drawings, prints and photographs produced by more than 30 artists during the past three decades. It’s an uneven, haphazard selection, but leaving artistic quality aside, its unusually optimistic-sounding title inadvertently raises a large and intriguing question: At a time when contemporary art seems to be spinning its wheels, what could a new heritage be? 212-708-9400, moma.org. (Johnson)Museum of Modern Art: ‘Design and Violence’ (continuing) Described on the museum’s website as a “curatorial experiment,” “Design and Violence” was and is an exhibition that exists almost entirely on the Internet. The show includes pictures, descriptions, essays and discussions about design objects used for violent purposes, including the AK-47 rifle, animal slaughter systems, bullets, plastic handcuffs and graphics depicting everything from refugee migration to incarceration demographics to violent video games. It’s a heavy and heady gathering of information that leans at times toward a symposium rather than an exhibition, but remains grounded in innovative objects that have made — or could make — a cultural impact. Online at designandviolence.moma.org; 212-708-9400. (Schwendener)Museum of Modern Art: ‘Endless House: Intersections of Art and Architecture’ (through March 6) This scattered but enjoyable exhibition, drawn from the museum’s art collection as much as its design holdings, focuses on the single-family home as a place of experimentation and regeneration; of conflict as well as dreams. Its highlight is a series of drawings and photographs by Frederick Kiesler, the Austrian-American polymath whose Endless House — never completed — fused fine art, architecture, furniture and lighting design into a bulbous, unstable whole. Several artists here echo Kiesler’s theme of the house as a reflection of the psychology of its inhabitants. None is more powerful than Rachel Whiteread’s sober image, made with white correction fluid, of a dwelling in East London: a preparatory drawing for a now lost sculpture crafted by filling the house with liquid concrete. 212-708-9400, moma.org. (Jason Farago)★ Museum of Modern Art: ‘Picasso Sculpture’ (through Feb. 7) Nearly a work of art in its own right, this magnificent show redefines Picasso’s achievement with the first full view here in 50 years of his astoundingly varied forays into sculpture. His materials, not his female loves, become the muses, and are different each time out. The basic plotline: After introducing sculptural abstraction and space, he spent about 50 years counting the ways that the figure was far from finished. 212-708-9400, moma.org. (Smith)★ Museum of Modern Art: ‘Transmissions: Art in Eastern Europe and Latin America, 1960-1980’ (through Jan. 3) Visiting this big, spirited group show is like walking into a party of intriguing strangers. For every person you recognize, there are 10 you don’t know. One topic everyone’s talking about, at different intensities, is the anti-institutional politics that swept Europe and the Americas in the 1960s, and almost everyone speaks the language of Conceptualism. A product of an in-house research initiative called Contemporary and Modern Art Perspectives, or C-MAP, intended to expand MoMA’s narrow Paris-New York view of modernism, the show is very much the beginning rather than the end of a learning curve. But with curators exploring material new to them — just steps ahead of their audience — the show has a refreshing buzz of surprise as it takes the museum in a realistic new directions. 212-708-9400, moma.org. (Cotter)Museum of the City of New York: ‘Activist New York’  (continuing) With a focus on activist tactics from the 17th century to the present, this exhibition — designed by the firm Pentagram — is a room-size onslaught of sensory stimulation, complete with videos, graphics and text. Told through 14 “moments” in New York activism, it includes a facsimile of the Flushing Remonstrance (1657), a petition for religious tolerance given to Peter Stuyvesant, director-general of the settlement, as well as contemporaneous objects, like a Dutch tobacco box, a Bible and “Meet the Activists” kiosks adjacent to each display, which identify activist groups working in the present. Fifth Avenue at 103rd Street, 212-534-1672, mcny.org. (Schwendener)Museum of the City of New York: ‘Folk City: New York and the Folk Music Revival’ (through Jan. 10) Handwritten Bob Dylan lyrics, well-strummed guitars from Lead Belly, Judy Collins and Odetta, concert posters, Sing Out! magazines, video from a raucous protest over banning folk singers from Washington Square, the street sign from Gerdes Folk City and plenty of songs on headphones evoke idealism and ambition in “Folk City.” The exhibition explores how New York City became a magnet for and a champion of rural styles and then the center of a pop-folk movement, from leftist “people’s music” efforts in the 1930s and ’40s, and the Red Scare reaction, to the civil rights rallies, coffeehouses and hootenannies of the folk revival at its peak. The tangle of tradition and change, earnestness and pop machinations are on view, along with the makings of a legacy that roots matter and a song can change the world. Fifth Avenue at 103rd Street, 212-534-1672, mcny.org. (Jon Pareles)★ Neue Galerie: ‘Berlin Metropolis: 1918-1933’ (through Jan. 4) Another outstanding museum exhibition joins New York’s autumn roster with this ambitious, expertly designed and organized account of the rich cultural ferment of the fragile Weimar Republic. With many loans from Germany, it musters an egalitarian array of mediums into a poignant, detailed view of the tragic cost — less in human life than in immeasurable human potential land achievement — of Hitler’s devastating rise and rule and the shattering of a great city. 1048 Fifth Avenue, at 86th Street, 212-628-6200, neuegalerie.org. (Smith)★ New-York Historical Society: ‘Freedom Journey 1965: Photographs of the Selma to Montgomery March by Stephen Somerstein’ (through Oct. 25) Almost 50 years ago, the picture editor of a campus newspaper at City College of New York assigned himself a breaking story: covering what promised to be a massive march in Alabama, led by the Rev. Dr. Martin Luther King Jr., to demand free and clear voting rights for African-Americans. On short notice the editor, Stephen Somerstein, grabbed his cameras, climbed on a bus and headed south. The 55 pictures of black leaders and everyday people in this show, installed in a hallway and small gallery, are some that he shot that day. The image of Dr. King’s head seen in monumental silhouette that has become a virtual logo of the film “Selma” is based on a Somerstein original. 170 Central Park West, at 77th Street, 212-873-3400, nyhistory.org. (Cotter)★ Studio Museum in Harlem: ‘Everything, Everyday: Artists in Residence 2014-15’ (through Oct. 25) During their residency year, these three artists have worked in assemblage mode, using both physical and psychological matter as their raw materials. Eric Mack has worked out a hybrid of painting and sculpture from distressed clothing, rope, pegboards, packing blankets and pigment to create a threatening-to-fall- apart dance of heavy and light. Lauren Halsey’s “Kingdom Splurge,” a mirrored grotto lined with pastel-tinted boulders and beauty shop ads, is a Afro-futuristic Emerald City. Sadie Barnette, in a series of meticulous graphite drawings, spins out a complex, first-names-only family tree and pieces together her own past from memorabilia related to her father. 144 West 125th Street, Harlem, 212-864-4500, studiomuseum.org. (Cotter)★ Studio Museum in Harlem: ‘Stanley Whitney: Dance the Orange’ (through Oct. 25) This well-chosen show of works from the past decade surveys the maturation of a late-blooming abstract painter who has revived the modernist grid with a distinctive combination of freehand geometry and bold color (the full spectrum) and altogether an unprecedented sense of improvisation and, complexity. The work sustains multiple readings both in terms of the history of modernism and Mr. Whitney’s African-American heritage. 144 West 125th Street, Harlem, 212-864-4500, studiomuseum.org. (Smith)Galleries: Uptown‘Portraiture Now: Staging the Self’ (through Oct. 17) This exhibition, organized by the National Portrait Gallery in Washington in collaboration with the Smithsonian Latino Center, reimagines portraiture in creative ways through the works of six contemporary Latino artists from the United States. Carlee Fernandez’s delightfully weird self-portraits from 2006 show her communing with her (old, white, male) influences. Rachelle Mozman’s subtly dramatic photographs feature her mother playing different roles, from a uniformed maid to an upper-class woman being served. And Karen Miranda Rivadeneira’s photographs are lush and poetic, capturing herself and family members in wild and beautiful landscapes. Unfortunately, some of the work feels like it reinforces stereotypical roles for young Latinos — but the women manage to stretch out and be poetic, playful or pensive. Americas Society, 680 Park Avenue, between 68th and 69th Streets, 212-249-8950, as-coa.org/visual-arts. (Schwendener)★ ‘Swedish Wooden Toys’ (through Jan. 17) This presentation of more than 300 playthings from the late 16th to the early 21st centuries will be catnip for anyone into antique toys. The show features diminutive vehicles of all kinds from old-time wagons, trains and fully-rigged sailboats, to futuristic cars and a rocket ship. There are naturalistic and anthropomorphic animals, weapons, puzzles, games, dollhouses and architectural construction kits. While many of these items were produced by big manufacturers like BRIO and Playsam, many others are one-of-a-kind wonders like a miniature baking set from around 1900 that includes rolling pins, spatulas and other implements all lovingly carved from wood and fitting into a tray just eight inches long. Bard Graduate Center Gallery, 18 West 86th Street, Manhattan, 212-501-3011, bgc.bard.edu. (Johnson)Galleries: 57th StreetJohn O’Reilly: ‘Montages 1968-2015’; Susan Jane Walp: ‘Paintings on Paper’ (through Oct. 17) One solo reviews the career of one of our greatest living artist of mysterious, erudite, confounding photomontages and shows him, at 85, moving into new territory. The other presents the latest oil-on-paper still lifes — a tangerine, a tea bowl, three zinnias — of a miniaturist exploring light and infinite ways to render edges without lines. Tibor de Nagy Gallery, 724 Fifth Avenue, at 57th Street, 212-262-5050, tibordenagy.com. (Smith)Galleries: Chelsea★ ‘Dia 15 VI 13 545 West 22 Street Dream House’ (through Oct. 24) This terrific show restages a famous sound and light installation by La Monte Young and Marian Zazeela, a work whose origins date to the 1960s. On entering the dimly lit gallery, you are immediately enveloped by an intensely powerful sound, a roaring, droning, pulsing noise with such a deep bass that you feel it in your body as well as in your ears. At the far end of the space is a work by Jung Hee Choi, a slowly changing hallucinogenic projection on a perforated black screen. Prepare to have your consciousness altered. Dia: Chelsea, 545 West 22nd Street, Chelsea, 212-989-5566, diacenter.org. (Johnson)Keltie Ferris: ‘Paintings and Body Prints’ (through Oct. 17) Ms. Ferris’s new paintings are aggressive and emphatic but also spectral and expansive, remaking the digital in supremely analog form. What read from afar (or in photographs) as pixels are, close up, thick rectangles of paint applied with a flat-ended brush that recall the pointillism of Seurat and Signac. Ms. Ferris also melds the geometry of digital media with Native American patterns, Bauhaus weaving and the ethereality of visionary painters like Lee Mullican and Chris Martin. Body prints, in which she pressed her torso, thighs, hands, feet and face against the surface have historical echoes, too. Titles are simple but vivid, underscoring the precision and force of these paintings, but the aggression here is more utopian than destructive, a record of what it takes to make great and vital painting. Mitchell-Innes & Nash, 534 West 26th Street, Chelsea, 212-744-7400, miandn.com. (Schwendener)Mark Grotjahn: ‘Painted Sculpture’ (through Oct. 29) This talented painter’s pitting of modernist abstraction and Expressionism against the crucial influences of African art is best when he pits oil paint against bronze, in this case casts of cardboard boxes for flat-screen TVs. The conceptual and inspirational stratagems are several (see the titles). The results are preposterously gorgeous and not a little perverse. Anton Kern Gallery, 532 West 20th Street, 212-367-9663, antonkerngallery.com. (Smith)★ ‘Japanese Propaganda Kimonos, 1905-1941’ (through Oct. 17) Celebrating Japanese military might, the garments in this fascinating show bear lively compositions reflecting international styles like Art Deco and Depression Moderne. In patchwork patterns and suavely muted colors, they depict fighter planes, battleships, antiaircraft artillery, aerial landscapes, maps and cute child soldiers. Edward Thorp, 210 11th Avenue, at 24th Street, Chelsea, 212-691-6565, edwardthorpgallery.com. (Johnson)★ Mike Kelley (through Oct. 24) Illuminated variations on the miniaturized and bottled, Kryptonian city of Kandor that Superman kept in his Arctic Fortress of Solitude lead to a major installation called “Kandor 10B (Exploded Fortress of Solitude).” A dark, bunkerlike construction with a walk-in, cavernous interior, it’s accompanied by a 24-minute video showing the sadomasochistic activities of some zany, fancifully costumed people within and around the “Exploded Fortress.” Produced in 2011, the year before Mr. Kelley’s suicide, the two works together exude a caustic spirit of misanthropic comedy. Hauser & Wirth, 511 West 18th Street, 212-790-3900, hauserwirth.com. (Johnson)★ Ron Nagle: ‘Five O’Clock Shadow’ (through Oct. 24) This large and stunning exhibition of the bonsai-size sculptures of Mr. Nagle — whose chief medium is glazed clay — shows off his inventive way of contrasting colors, forms and textures in ways both seductive and slightly that evoke food, furniture, body parts, spindly succulents and oozing drips of blood, chocolate, motor oil or just glaze. It should challenge some museum to do the full-dress retrospective he deserves. Matthew Marks Gallery, 522 West 22nd Street, Chelsea, 212-243-0200, matthewmarks.com. (Smith)Rachel Perry Welty (through Oct. 17) A photographer tackles nonmechanical reproduction — one hand’s ability to copy the other — in a series of large diptych drawings whose bilateral arrangements cascading multicolor lines suggest attenuated Morris Louis pours or cross sections of agate stones. Other obsessive delights await in this strange and beautiful show, including flight-of-the-bumblebee motifs rendered in sliced-up fruit stickers. Yancey Richardson Gallery, 525 West 22nd Street, Chelsea, 646-230-9610, yanceyrichardson.com. (Smith) Galleries: Other★ ‘Double Standard: Ed Ruscha & Mason Williams 1956-1971’ (through Oct. 18) A life-size, photographic silkscreen depicting a Greyhound bus graces a wall in this new gallery. It was created in 1967 by Mason Williams, who, the following year, would win three Grammy Awards for his guitar instrumental “Classical Gas.” Mr. Williams and the Pop-Conceptualist Ed Ruscha, close friends since they were fourth-grade classmates in Oklahoma City, collaborated on numerous zany projects during the ’60s. Along with copious archival materials, the photographs, books, prints and drawings in this exhibition reveal a mutually inciting relationship comparable in some ways to that between Picasso and Braque. Alden Projects, 34 Orchard Street, between Hester and Canal Streets, Lower East Side, 212-229-2453, aldenprojects.com. (Johnson)★ David Nelson (through Oct. 24) The New York artist David Nelson (1960-2013) was primarily a painter until 1993, when his longtime partner David Knudsvig, also an artist, died of AIDS. In the years that followed Mr. Nelson began to work in distinctive forms of sculpture and photography before moving back to painting again. This survey, organized by Joseph Berger, director of 80WSE, and Nancy Brooks Brody, is a loving tribute and a very beautiful thing. 80WSE, New York University, 80 Washington Square East, Greenwich Village, steinhardt.nyu.edu/80wse, 212-998-5747. (Cotter)Eduardo Paolozzi: ‘House of Expectations’ (through Nov. 1) In the best Pop Art tradition — that is, blurring the boundary between art and life — the three Eduardo Paolozzi sculptures from the 1960s and ’70s here actually did time as playground equipment, before being stripped of paint and becoming sculpture again. Accompanying the sculptures are screen prints from two series: the bright, hallucinogenic “Z.E.E.P. (Zero Energy Experimental Pile)” series, made from Paolozzi collages from 1969 to 1970, which include images that illustrate Cold War fears and manias; and the muted and pastel “Calcium Light Night” (1974-6) series, which responds to musical compositions by Charles Ives, but also mirrors the repeating curves and mechanical patterns of the sculptures. Clearing, 396 Johnson Avenue, at Morgan Avenue, Bushwick, Brooklyn, 718-456-0396, c-l-e-a-r-i-n-g.com. (Schwendener)Public ArtJeppe Hein: ‘Please Touch the Art’ (through early 2016) People with small children likely will enjoy Mr. Hein’s three-part show. If it’s a hot day, the kids will rush to be drenched by “Appearing Rooms,” which has water spouting up unpredictably from a square platform of metal grating. Youngsters as well as grown-ups also may be fascinating by the perceptually confounding “Mirror Labyrinth NY,” which consists of mirror-surfaced planks of stainless steel in varying heights planted in the grass in a spiral formation. Meanwhile, guardians can rest on one of 16 fanciful, shocking orange park benches while their young charges clamber about on the furniture’s surrealistically altered parts. Brooklyn Bridge Park, 334 Furman Street, Fulton Ferry, Brooklyn, publicartfund.org. (Johnson)Out Of Town★ Lynda Benglis: ‘Water Sources’ (through Nov. 8) The most compelling temporary exhibition at Storm King Art Center in recent years focuses on a heretofore unfamiliar but important dimension of Ms. Benglis’s distinguished career: creating working fountains. The show’s main attraction is a quartet of gorgeous fountains rising from temporary, circular pools embedded in the lawn outside the center’s home building. Two of them have abstract forms suggesting psychic monsters surging up from unconscious depths. The others feature flower shapes stacked into majestic columns. 1 Museum Road, New Windsor, N.Y., 845-534-3115, stormking.org. (Johnson)‘Donald Blumberg Photographs: Selections From the Master Sets’ (through Nov. 22) In his early days shooting on the streets of New York, Mr. Blumberg discovered that parishioners walking out of the gaping door of St. Patrick’s Cathedral appeared to be emerging from deep, empty space. His resulting photographs, shot from 1965 to 1967, reduce St. Pat’s to a sea of black, and turn the worshipers into highly detailed, if physically awkward, specimens in the void. Soon after, Mr. Blumberg’s gaze shifted from the street to his television screen, arranging images of Lyndon Johnson or Richard Nixon into conceptually sophisticated mosaics. Now 80, he is still shooting his TV, and though he continues to keep one eye on politics, the other is gazing at the inanities of home shopping and televangelism. Yale University Art Gallery, 1111 Chapel Street, New Haven, 203-432-0600, artgallery.yale.edu. (Jason Farago)Elaine Lustig Cohen (through Oct. 19) The paintings of Elaine Lustig Cohen expand on the complicated legacy of Philip Johnson, the influential architect who also commissioned Ms. Lustig Cohen, an award-winning graphic designer, to create catalogs and signage for his buildings and other projects. The 10 paintings here, from the 1960s and ’70s, show the influence of her design work. They are geometric, hard-edged and abstract, with compositions that radiate from their centers and palettes dominated by secondary colors — particularly orange and brown in the 1970s. While the paintings might pale a little compared to other masters of geometric abstraction, they show painting and graphic design on an interesting continuum. The Glass House, 199 Elm Street, New Canaan, Conn. The show is included in tours of the Glass House, for which tickets must be purchased in advance; 866-811-4111, theglasshouse.org. (Schwendener)Dia:Beacon: Robert Irwin: ‘Excursus: Homage to the Square³’ (continuing) A walk-in maze with walls of white scrim lit by color-filtered fluorescent tubes, Mr. Irwin’s “Excursus: Homage to the Square³” had its debut in 1998 at the Dia Center for the Arts in Chelsea. It was so popular that the curators elected to keep it on view a year longer than its originally planned run. It’s reincarnation here is similarly transporting, if not as thoroughly as the original was. But to experience it at Dia:Beacon along Minimalist works by other artists that encourage heightened perceptual attention to the here and now is as spiritually calming as it is historically illuminating. 3 Beekman Street, Beacon, 845-440-0100, diaart.org. (Johnson)★ ‘Elaine de Kooning Portrayed’ (through Oct. 31) While she is probably best known for having been Willem de Kooning’s wife, Elaine de Kooning had an interesting life and career of her own. Indeed, if an enterprising filmmaker wanted to make a romantic biopic evoking the New York artworld from the rise of its bohemian avant-garde in the 1930s and ’40s through the pluralist era of the ’70s and ’80s, he or she could not find a more suitable subject than Ms. de Kooning. Adding up to a collective portrait, this show’s 18 paintings and drawings include four outstanding self-portraits by the artist herself along with works by Mr. de Kooning, Fairfield Porter, Hedda Sterne and Alex Katz. Pollock-Krasner House and Study Center, 830 Springs-Fireplace Road, East Hampton, N.Y., 631-324-4929, sb.cc.stonybrook.edu/pkhouse. (Johnson)★ ‘Enigmas: The Art of Bada Shanren (1626-1705)’ (through Jan. 3) Beginning next January, the Freer Gallery of Art in Washington will go dark for a year and a half while it’s 1923 building gets an overhaul. Its Chinese painting collection will be especially missed. And as if intent on leaving a potent memory of it, the museum has served up a sparkler of final show, centered on a charismatic 17th-century superstar whose life encompassed dramatic shifts of fortune, and whose art holds mysteries yet to be understood. 1050 Independence Avenue SW, 202-633-1000, asia.si.edu. (Cotter)★ Museum of Fine Arts Boston: ‘Made in the Americas: The New World Discovers Asia’ (through Feb. 15) One of the great gifts that multiculturalist thinking gave us was freedom from the tyranny of purity. Simply put, there’s no such thing, at least not in art. Everything is a mix, and this has always been true. Globalism, which we take to be so 21st century, is as old as the hills. In this smallish show those hills encompass the Andes, the Alps, the Appalachians and Mount Fuji between the early 16th to the late 18th century. The main setting includes large swaths of North, Central and South America being colonized by various European powers, all of which had lucrative commercial links to Asia, and they were bringing Asia with them to the New World. The result: some of the most brilliant American art ever. 465 Huntington Avenue, Boston, 617-267-9300, mfa.org. (Cotter)★ National Museum of African Art: ‘Conversations: African and African American Artists in Dialogue’  (through Jan. 24) For its 50th anniversary, this museum has brilliantly thread together work from two sources: its own holdings in African material and the Camille O. and William H. Cosby Jr. collection of African-American art. The Cosby collection, weighted toward canonical figures like Romare Bearden and Charles White, will bring in the crowds, but it is the curators and museum itself, which is in a period of renaissance, that have made the show rise well above predictability. Smithsonian Institution, 950 Independence Avenue SW, Washington, 202-633-4600, africa.si.edu. (Cotter)Parrish Art Museum: Andreas Gursky: ‘Landscapes’ (through Oct. 18) When this German artist’s immense photographs first began appearing in New York galleries in the 1990s they were terrifically exciting for their sheer size and for their implicit commentaries on capitalist globalization. Now they have about them the stale air of white elephants. Uninitiated viewers, however, might thrill to the strenuously spectacular prints in this 19-piece show, which includes a dismally dystopian, aerial view of cattle in a muddy, Colorado stockyard and a futuristic image of the gleaming, gold-hued interior of a huge gas tank on a transport ship in the Persian Gulf. 279 Montauk Highway, Water Mill, N.Y., 631-283-2118, parrishart.org. (Johnson)★ Wadsworth Atheneum Museum of Art (ongoing) The skilled refurbishing of the Atheneum’s storied Morgan Memorial Building reveals as never before the museum’s splendors. The Great Hall is triple-hung with European paintings encircled by a spirited art-historical Cliff Notes from Egypt to Florence. On the second floor the fabulous Cabinet of Art and Curiosities leads to even more often outstanding paintings — Baroque to Modernism — accompanied by an array of decorative objects, especially porcelains. 600 Main Street, Hartford, Conn., 860-278-2670, thewadsworth.org. (Smith)Last ChanceRoland Flexner and Japanese Bronzes of the Edo Period (closes on Sunday) Go for the four unusual bronze flower vases from the 18th and 19th centuries and their startling fusions of natural and geometric forms. Stay for the 18 drawings — small tondos made by blowing ink onto paper through a straw, that conjure nature’s infinity, molten bronze and views through microscopes. An inspired pairing. Sargent’s Daughters, 179 East Broadway, at Canal Street, Lower East Side, 917-463-3901, sargentsdaughters.com. (Smith)★ Guggenheim Museum: ‘Doris Salcedo’ (closes on Monday) Politically speaking, you don’t have to be a house to be haunted. All you need to be is someone who keeps an eye on the news; who pays attention to loss through violence; and feels a personal stake in that loss, as if it were happening to people you know and care about, to people who live in your home. The artist Doris Salcedo was born in Bogota, Colombia, in 1958, and came of age in an era when civic murder was a way of life in her country. For some 30 years, she has made such memories the essence of a witnessing art which includes the dozens of austere but viscerally animated sculptures and installations that fill all four floors of the Guggenheim’s Tower Level galleries in this career retrospective. 1071 Fifth Avenue, at 89th Street, 212-423-3500, guggenheim.org. (Cotter)Alicia McCarthy (closes on Sunday) This talented artist has become quite an abstract painter, all while using mostly colored pencils. Her art has always been appealing but her latest works are more rigorous than cute. They combine handmade quirkiness and a personal, slightly visionary, jewel-colored geometry with an echoing perceptual subtlety. What you see is what you see until it isn’t. Sometimes the illusions amount to gently Op Art-like trompe l’oeil. Jack Hanley, 327 Broome Street, between Bowery and Chrystie Street, Lower East Side, 646-918-6824, jackhanley.com. (Smith)Museum of the City of New York: ‘Everything Is Design: The Work of Paul Rand’  (closes on Tuesday) You may not know the name Paul Rand (1914-96), the immensely influential advertising art director, illustrator and graphic designer, but it’s a safe bet you’re familiar with some of his works. After shaking up American advertising and book cover design in the 1940s and ’50s, he created logos for UPS, IBM, Westinghouse and other American corporations. His admirers called him “the Picasso of graphic design.” This show tracks his six-decade career with 150 examples of vintage magazines, book covers, three-dimensional containers, children’s books and books by Mr. Rand about principles of design. Fifth Avenue at 103rd Street, 212-534-1672, mcny.org. (Johnson)Adrián Villar Rojas: ‘Two Suns’  (closes on Saturday) This fast-rising site-oriented sculptor gives festivalism a good name. Here he transforms two spaces into environments that evocatively conjure different sites, including possibly, the gallery’s own past as a showroom; contrasts kinds of available light; adds a wonderful sense of artisanal time underfoot and surprises us with one of the pinnacles of western sculpture, profoundly altered. Marian Goodman Gallery, 24 West 57th Street, Manhattan, 212-977-7160, mariangoodman.com. (Smith)★ ‘September Spring’ (closes on Saturday) This lovely performance-based show conceived by the artist Sam Falls and executed by a dance duo, Jessie Gold and Elizabeth Hart, known as Hart of Gold, is a memorial to the poet and musician Jamie Kanzler, who used the nom de plume September Spring. The show’s centerpiece is a repeated, 17-minute-long piece of choreography in which Ms. Gold and Ms. Hart basically dance into being a series of abstract paintings, which are then displayed in the gallery. Performances ended last week, at which time a total of 24 paintings were finished, corresponding to the years of Mr. Kanzler’s brief life. The Kitchen, 512 West 19th Street, Chelsea, 212-255-5793, thekitchen.org. (Cotter)Frank Stella: ‘Shape as Form’ (closes on Saturday) With 10 works spanning 40 years, this show is the perfect refresher for the bends-producing career of postwar American art’s least predictable figure — the subject great of a retrospective opening late next month at the Whitney Museum. Go for the Irregular Polygon painting and a Polish Village relief from the 1960s, stay for “Mosport 4.75x” (1982) from the Circuits series. Paul Kasmin, 293 10th Avenue, at 27th Street, 212-563-4474, paulkasmingallery.com. (Smith)Larry Rosen, the music producer and digital-audio entrepreneur who was best known as a founder of the pop-jazz record label GRP, died on Friday at his home in Park Ridge, N.J. He was 75.The cause was brain cancer, his publicist, Sheryl Feuerstein, said.Mr. Rosen and the keyboardist Dave Grusin started the GRP label (the initials stood for Grusin-Rosen Productions) in 1978, under the aegis of Arista Records. Almost from the start, much of the label’s music dovetailed with the successful radio format known as contemporary jazz — or, popularly, smooth jazz, although Mr. Rosen did not care for that term.A typical GRP release might have the funk and optimism of Brazilian pop, as well as jazz harmonies and a generally chilled-out disposition; it proposed a lush, sweet listening experience.“Recordings sounded like what the guys played in the club the night before,” Mr. Rosen said of jazz in the mid-1970s, in a 2012 interview for the website Jazz Monthly. By contrast, he explained, what he and Mr. Grusin sought was to “paint pictures with music.”Born in the Bronx on March 25, 1940, Mr. Rosen began his music career as a drummer. He attended the Manhattan School of Music and played with the Newport Youth Band, an incubator of young jazz talent founded by the trombonist Marshall Brown. He joined the singer Andy Williams’s touring ensemble in 1960 and remained with it until 1966; it was with that group that he met Mr. Grusin, who was playing piano.He later built a home studio and wrote commercial jingles in New York before beginning his record-producing career on the singer Jon Lucien’s 1973 album “Rashida,” for which Mr. Grusin wrote arrangements. Soon after that, the pair began working as an independent production team on records by the guitarists Earl Klugh and Lee Ritenour, the violinist Noel Pointer and others.GRP — which operated as a joint-label venture with Arista until 1982, when it went independent — had early success with a range of jazz and pop performers, including the jazz trumpeter Tom Browne and the pop singer Angela Bofill.The company’s roster eventually came to include performers on a spectrum from pop to jazz-fusion to straight-ahead jazz, including the flutist Dave Valentin; the singers Patti Austin, Diane Schuur and Diana Krall; the bands Spyro Gyra, the Yellowjackets and the Brecker Brothers; and the pianists Chick Corea, Ramsey Lewis, Kenny Kirkland and Mr. Grusin himself, whose “Mountain Dance,” released in 1980, was one of the earliest digitally recorded nonclassical albums.Mr. Rosen lived in Park Ridge and in Fisher Island, Fla. He is survived by his wife, Hazel; his mother, Vivian Rosen; his son, J. J.; his daughter, Sandra Honigman; his sister, Susan Zelinka; and four grandchildren.GRP was an early proponent of digital recording and released its entire catalog on CD. One of its commercial bull’s-eyes was “In a Digital Mood,” a 1983 album of numbers from the Glenn Miller band’s repertoire recorded digitally, so listeners could hear new details in old music. It was certified gold in 1991.In 1987 the label signed a distribution agreement with MCA, and three years later MCA bought GRP for a reported $40 million. After the sale, GRP took charge of the parent company’s other jazz-label holdings, including Impulse and Decca. Mr. Rosen and Mr. Grusin stayed on until leaving the company in 1995.Soon after that, the two men started a new company, N2K Encoded Music, which in addition to operating as a record label (releasing albums by the trumpeter Arturo Sandoval and the vocalist Jane Monheit, among others) hosted a group of online communities for various musical genres and the online store Music Boulevard. In 1999, N2K merged with CD Now, an early online music retailer.In 2006, Mr. Rosen produced “Legends of Jazz With Ramsey Lewis,” a 13-part PBS series of half-hour jazz shows. In recent years he became involved in the jazz performance business, starting Jazz Roots, a concert program for various performing arts centers around the country, which began in Miami and spread to Dallas, Atlanta and elsewhere.Raury“All We Need”(Columbia)Pharrell Williams and Kanye West have done untold work over the last decade and a half toward expanding hip-hop’s purview, helping to reconcile the political questioning and sociocultural searching of the 1980s with the manic excess and shameless posturing of the 1990s. Thanks to them, thoughtfulness and ostentation finally went hand in hand — one didn’t have to trade one revolution for the other.The arrival of Raury may mark the beginning of the inevitable reversal of that movement.A hip-hop-generation shaman with an alert sense of musical history and a fearless humility, Raury isn’t interested in rejecting the hard-fought innovations of the generations just above him, but rather has mainlined them so thoroughly that he’s able to remold them.“All We Need,” his second album, is full of confidently expressed delicateness. This is folk music refracted through hip-hop sensibilities, an aesthetic that suggests that not all the post-rap tributaries have been explored yet.From the beginning of this album, Raury is earnest and aggrieved — he begins by lamenting consumerism and income inequality, in a voice that’s part tense rapping and part wistful singing. Then he swings toward songs about emotional connections, be it the wide-eyed “Mama”; or “Love Is Not a Four Letter Word,” an aggrieved spoken rant aimed at a woman who has let him down; or “Woodcrest Manor II,” about a friendship riven by time and mistrust.Throughout, Raury is backed by a mélange of space-soul and soft rock produced largely by Malay, who cut his teeth refining his brand of earthy romanticism with Frank Ocean. This Woodstock-era approach feels like the logical result of the last generation of hip-hop outsiders subjected to several years’ erosion by the elements — think Andre 3000’s “Prototype,” or the scrappier songs on the first N.E.R.D. album, or the way early records by A Tribe Called Quest had a palpable air hiss to them.Even as Raury oozes naturalist, hippieish energy, he manages to remain playful — not humorous, but almost childlike. He sees the flaws of the world around him and raises his hand, volunteering to make the first change. He’s the type of artist who, when he performed on “The Late Show With Stephen Colbert” the same night Donald Trump was a guest, wore a shirt with Trump’s name crossed out. The ostentation he grew up around could be deafening, so instead, Raury has taken what was handed to him and, from it, made his own Walden Pond.There is an undeniable dramatic power in watching characters age over the course of a play. It’s usually accomplished onstage by a shift in posture, some makeup, perhaps a wig. But in the Britain- and Berlin-based company Gob Squad’s latest adventurous project, “Before Your Very Eyes,” child actors will not only pretend to be young, middle-age and older adults, bridging an entire lifetime: Audiences will also see videos of younger versions of these performers.Created over the course of two years through improvisation with a cast of seven children, ages 9 to 14, from the New York area, this show takes place behind one-way mirrors, giving the impression that the audience is studying these maturing lives as part of an experiment. This show, which sounds like theater’s answer to Richard Linklater’s “Boyhood,” was first done in a Belgian production in 2012. (Performances start on Saturday, Oct. 17, Public Theater, publictheater.org.)Ahead of the release next month of “In Jackson Heights,” Frederick Wiseman’s ninth documentary filmed in and around New York City, the Museum of the Moving Image has begun a weekend series, through Nov. 7, of his groundbreaking cinéma-vérité chronicles about local institutions and subcultures.On Sunday, Oct. 11, “Welfare” (1975) — Mr. Wiseman’s nearly three-hour take on a bureaucratic system that humbles all who come near it — focuses on a single welfare office in Manhattan, those who seek help and the government workers who try to steer them through an endless, frustrating maze of regulations.On Saturday, “Racetrack” (1985) looks at the routines and layers of the horse economy — from stablehands to restaurant workers to veterinarians to trainers, riders, track rats and owners — that relies on Belmont Park and the thoroughbreds that compete there. Like all of Mr. Wiseman’s films, these immersive works impart an understanding and appreciation of life experiences without overarching narration or plotline. We watch, therefore we learn. (movingimage.us.)For his new film, “Bridge of Spies,” the director Steven Spielberg returned to what for him has been an inexhaustible source of inspiration: American history. His hero this time isn’t a totemic national figure, as in his 2012 film, “Lincoln,” but instead is someone whose name is barely known: James Donovan, played by Tom Hanks. A Bronx-born lawyer who defended a vilified Soviet spy, Rudolf Abel (Mark Rylance), during the Cold War’s peak, Mr. Donovan later negotiated to swap Mr. Abel for both the American U-2 spy plane pilot Francis Gary Powers, who had been shot down over the Soviet Union, and an American graduate student who had been detained in East Berlin.Mr. Spielberg — an engaged, thoughtful and kindly presence — sat down in TriBeCa recently to talk about how the post-9/11 world informs his new film, what Hollywood could be doing for women and minorities and why he feels he was born decades too late. Here are excerpts from the conversation:Q. Did you see commonalities with “Bridge of Spies” and “Lincoln” in terms of the story lines?A. Both men are highly principled, and both men basically have a mission. Lincoln’s mission was going to change the way we look at each other, and Donovan’s mission was to basically bring somebody home. In a sense, Lincoln and Donovan are uncompromising figures in history, one completely obscure and the other almost ineffably famous.Donovan was especially resolute in the idea that this man deserves every defense. Is there nostalgia here to a kind of belief and principle? I was thinking of prisoners in Guantánamo. Was that in your mind when you were making the film?So many things were in my mind in the contemporary world. Drone missions. Guantánamo Bay. Cyberhacking, because cyberhacking is a form of spying. At the very beginning of technological spycraft in the late ’50s, with the U-2 overflights, our fear was that the Sputnik was a spy satellite, which it turned out of course not to be, and there was also great suspicion and fear of nuclear holocaust. I grew up in that era. The stakes were very, very high. And yet today, there is much more dread and fear of who’s looking over our shoulders. There was a specific enemy, the Soviet Union, in the 1950s and ’60s. Today we don’t know our enemy. The enemy doesn’t have a specific face.For you, is there solace looking at heroic people in history? Is it a comfort compared with what’s happening in the world now?Here’s the thing. It’s a little harder today. Donovan could work in tremendous secrecy at a time when there was no social media. Today it’d be a lot harder to find a man that would stand up for his principles and suffer the slings and arrows of the haters on social media. Donovan had it bad: They shot a bullet through the window of his apartment in the late ’50s. Imagine the amount of hurt that would have been brought to bear on Donovan’s family had this entire incident occurred in this day and age.How did you find out about this story?A British playwright named Matt Charman presented me with this incredible story about the spy swap. I’m a big fan of the spy genre. Even though this film was more of an intellectual spy drama, a little more about the art of negotiation and conversation, there was still spycraft that really got me excited. I’m a huge fan of “The Quiller Memorandum,” “The Ipcress File,” The Spy Who Came In From the Cold.” Even “Our Man Flint,” “Dr. No,” and “FromRussia With Love.”I’m going to jump out to some general queries. In terms of the film industry, do you feel it’s in a healthy state?The film business has always been competitive with television, and in the early age of television, some of the greatest writers worked in television. Paddy Chayefsky, Stirling Silliphant, Rod Serling. Then television became very formulaic. But something has happened in the last seven or eight years. Some of the greatest writing today is for television. Look at series like “Transparent,” “Bloodline,” “Wolf Hall” and “Downton Abbey.” A wonderful series I’m hooked on, “Homeland.”Television has allowed the audience to take bigger risks on where they’re spending money when they go to the movies. Because if they can get something like that in a movie theater, where that particular story is only playing in a movie theater, it might get more people out to the movies.So the filmmakers can take more of a risk?Yes, the studios can take more of a risk and allow filmmakers to tell stories that are self-contained and don’t even promise a sequel. I think television has helped the independent cinema and that the independent cinema has inspired long-form television. This is the second golden age of television, absolutely.Women’s point of view has been a huge topic lately. Do you feel someone in your position has a responsibility to cultivate young women filmmakers?I’ve cultivated women in film ever since I decided to make my secretary my producer and form my company, Amblin. I’m much more comfortable in the company of women. I’m talking about women in creative capacities, not administrative. The first movie I ever greenlit for DreamWorks was a film called “The Peacemaker,” and Mimi Leder directed it. Women are very much in executive positions all over the film industry today — the head of Universal, head of Fox 2000. The former head of Sony. What I don’t understand is the lack of diversity and color in the executive ranks of motion-picture companies, and that is something I think we have to look carefully at and have to ask why.And also director positions. Why do you think that is?I think there needs to be an infusion of more women directing and more men and women of color directing.How do we do that?We do that by continuing to look at movies that everybody is making whether they’re on YouTube or Vine. You have to just be open to it, and you have to search for it. You have to go out to see where the talent is and basically cultivate the talent.You’ve clarified your comments about superhero movies, which you’ve said will have a finite life span compared with westerns. Are there superhero movies you like?I wasn’t giving the thumbs down to the genre, ’cause I go to all the movies. My favorite of all the superhero movies are the “Iron Man” movies. I love Tim Burton’s Batman films and then — jump-cut way into the future — everything Chris Nolan has touched in Batman, because of the darkness, of what would motivate a character like that, a very rich character, to do the kind of public service work he does.And “Iron Man” because …There’s a lot of Joseph Campbell in the “Iron Man” movies. We all want to fly. And we know we can’t fly without wings, except in our dreams. I used to dream about flying in a bodysuit, and when “Iron Man” came along, I went: “They wrote this for me. This is my wish fulfillment.”With “E.T.” and “Close Encounters of the Third Kind,” you looked out beyond the world. Now you’re mining history.I always said to myself if I ever achieve a success where I can decide what to do independently, I wanted to tell stories that are meaningful to me about people that did great things.I also have an imagination — if it sits around too long, I get afraid it’s going to become a little jaded, so I fluctuate between stories based on true events and movies that are much more a product of my overactive imagination. Or at least Roald Dahl’s, which is my next movie, “Big Friendly Giant.” With Mark Rylance playing the big friendly giant.I didn’t know it was Mark Rylance as Abel; he was so deep in the character.Thanks to “Twelfth Night” and “Richard III” [on Broadway], I was able to get a big dose of Mark Rylance a couple of years ago. He was my first choice. Tom [Hanks] has played American figureheads in the past, and he’s very representative of our core values of what we believe to be great American leadership. This was a special assignment for Tom, because he’s badass in this story. He was dogged in his pursuit of justice.You seem to draw great performances out of people.Working with Daniel Day-Lewis brought me up many, many notches. I just dogged Daniel Day-Lewis, and after 10 years he finally said yes to play Abraham Lincoln. It really raised my game. I really believe I did some of my best work on “Lincoln,” principally because of this one actor.What is it that he does that caused these new light bulbs to go off?You can’t describe it. I try to go back in time to figure out how did Howard Hawks get that performance out of Montgomery Clift and John Wayne in “Red River”?I really feel I was well suited to working 70 years ago. I would have been a good workhorse, under contract and assigned stories, and I would have thrived.I spend more of my time looking at movies from 70, 60 years ago than I do watching movies that are made now. Clint Eastwood and I are very close friends, and we talk about this all the time. He wishes he could go back and experience what it would have been like to have Darryl Zanuck or Harry Cohn or Louis B. Mayer go through a go-between and hand you your assignment, then you read it and say: “You know something? I hate it, but I can fix it.”Chatting with a friend the other day, I unwittingly revealed something that neither of us had known: He’d been lied to by a mutual acquaintance. It was a small logistical thing — no adultery, no criminality — but as I tried to obfuscate my way out, I was struck by a sickening sense of having walked into a situation, dangerously ignorant of all the facts, hampered by a blindfold I hadn’t realized I was wearing.The characters in Simon Mawer’s latest spy thriller, “Tightrope,” set in the gray, exhausted, murky days of post-World War II England, spend a lot of time in tense encounters that pivot on the issue of who knows what, and who’s telling the truth about it. Jaded, wary, questioning their roles in a world they fought so hard for but now barely recognize, they find that the most precious weapon they have is information — how to deploy it, how to manipulate it, how to extract it.The author, an experienced British literary novelist whose elegant “The Glass Room” was a Man Booker Prize finalist in 2009, brings a fine sense of story, an intriguing plot and a lovely way with a sentence to “Tightrope.” If it never reaches the sheer ingeniousness of, say, John le Carré’s best work (what does, really?), that’s because Mr. Mawer hasn’t set about building elaborate le Carré-like labyrinths that trap and crush his operatives. Mr. Mawer seems more concerned with how character shapes destiny than vice versa.The book’s protagonist, Marian Sutro, is a veteran of a perilous program that parachuted women into occupied France to help the Resistance during the war. After a short chapter that introduces her as an old woman (the narrator is a younger man who’s long been obsessed with her), we’re catapulted back half a century, to the Northolt air base in England. Emaciated, traumatized, looking as haunted as a figure in a Munch painting, Marian disembarks slowly from a plane and begins what will be a long journey home. She’s been betrayed by a fellow operative and imprisoned in a German concentration camp; she has returned a burnt-out case.What happened to her? “Tightrope” begins two years after the end of its predecessor, “Trapeze,” which left Marian in a terrifying Nancy Drew-style predicament on the last page. People who’ve read the previous book — you don’t have to, but it helps — have spent this interim period worrying about whether she’d survive, and how she would cope with what was to come.Now we find out, through the author’s graceful use of flashbacks, as Marian tries to return to some semblance of normal life in England, with its dowdy clothes and its rationed food and its general impoverished gloom. Through various debriefings as well as through her own memories, we learn how difficult the intervening years have been — at one point, she was subjected to the Gestapo’s version of waterboarding — and who among her old friends, enemies and lovers didn’t make it out of the first book alive.Back in England, she falls into a romance with, and eventually an indifferent marriage to, a man named Alan who was far more attractive in his old job (Royal Air Force pilot) than in his new one (regional sales manager for a tire company). Up pops Major Fawley, a mysterious figure from the past who gave Marian a top-secret, off-the-grid task in her previous mission and who insists on behaving just as cryptically now. When she asks him whom he works for, he doesn’t exactly say, “I’d have to kill you if I told you,” but comes close: “I’m afraid I can’t really tell you that.”One war is over; a second one is beginning. The United States is poised to test the hydrogen bomb. Marian’s brother, Ned, is a physicist, so we’re treated to some interesting inside information about the bomb program. And then, from the vantage point of her new job, in a lefty pro-peace group that turns out to be financed by the Soviet Union, Marian is recruited as a spy against the Russians.But as Major Fawley tries to reel her in, she’s playing the angles, remembering her unarmed-combat training. “They taught you that the first move was always to draw your opponent towards you,” Mr. Mawer writes. “It brings him off balance, gives him a false sense of security.” She duly re-enters the intelligence world, but with her fingers crossed behind her back, sliding in “as smooth as an eel.”And so begins a time of betrayal, double-bluffing and double-crossing, involving sex, blackmail, secrets and a Soviet spy masquerading as a journalist, whom Marian might be in love with for real. We’re not sure who’s playing whom. “Spying,” she observes, “is so like adultery.”The book proceeds at a leisurely pace, and Mr. Mawer’s decision to appoint an awed admirer of Marian as narrator doesn’t always work. But “Tightrope” is full of satisfying twists, and we can’t help cheering for its tough, resourceful heroine.She started “Trapeze” as a weak, naïve girl ashamed about her lack of sexual experience; she ends “Tightrope” as a coolly ruthless seductress, a woman who easily betrays and dissembles, a spy capable of planning and orchestrating a small rogue operation of her own. And she’s learned how to talk her way out of trouble.“Romance at short notice was her specialty,” Saki wrote of the heroine in his short story “The Open Window”; Marian, too, has discovered the usefulness of quick improvisation. She spins a fake story for a sinister official at the Soviet Embassy; she tells a different fake story to Major Fawley; she persuades the besotted narrator to help her carry out a plan that neither side is going to like. Even when she’s drugged and spirited away for questioning by a lover she had thought she could trust (not the Soviet journalist; do keep up), she holds on, never breaks.She knows exactly what to say, what to keep in reserve and how to recover when she’s caught in a lie. “Lies are your most precious resource,” she notes. “Use them sparingly.”Jeffrey Foucault“Salt as Wolves” (Blueblade Records)On “Salt as Wolves,” the singer-songwriter-producer Jeffrey Foucault sings in a rich, textured, word-smearing voice about subjects of burned-out middle age: love, lying, regret, highways, hauntings, escape, aloneness, forgiveness, the value of a simple thing, the void without it. In a writerly surge in the song “Des Moines,” about a musician’s unremarkable night on the road, he remembers “the goner’d streets and dying/sunset buildings/cut with shade.” Mr. Foucault, who comes from Wisconsin and lives in western Massachusetts, is only 39. He’s a bit too good.Behind him slithers the guitarist Bo Ramsey, with his warm, amplifier-tremolo pulsations; the unobtrusive, Zen-like bassist Jeremy Moses Curtis; the drummer Billy Conway, making wet, slow beats with brushes; and the shadow harmonies of the singer Caitlin Canty. The music flexes and rustles. It’s got open space. It implies simplicity and free will.No way. This is some of the least simple and free music in the world. “Salt as Wolves” — his fifth album of original songs, and its title derived from Iago’s speech in Act III of “Othello” — is immaculately tailored within a certain tradition. (That tradition descends from the musical language of 1950s single-chord blues and three-chord country, as routed later through Townes Van Zandt and the bardic post-folk line that followed him.) It is aesthetically informed up to the eyes. It sounds casual, but it can grow oppressive quickly.At worst, he’s laconic until he’s philosophical, and philosophical until he’s mythical. He invokes the silent watches of the night in pre-electronic American consciousness and uses laden images to do it — “a heart like a hurricane lamp,” “shepherd of cigarettes and gasoline.” But he doesn’t have to go all the way there. Sometimes his songs run right up to the edge of the grandiose and hold still, and that’s when he’s best.“Des Moines,” close to perfection, does that. “I Love You (And You Are a Fool)” makes its case quickly and clearly. And “Take Your Time,” neither haunted nor mythic, flushes out some of the record’s mannered feeling. “Walk away there’s no rush,” he sings, surprisingly. “Everything is going to be just fine.”Jean Dubuffet believed that art by self-taught and so-called outsider artists possessed an authenticity and creative imagination that was missing from professional art and from modern life in general. He called the work he favored “Art Brut,” collected it in great quantities and donated his accumulation of 4,000 examples to the city of Lausanne, Switzerland, in 1971.“Art Brut in America: The Incursion of Jean Dubuffet,” which opens Tuesday, Oct. 13, at the American Folk Art Museum, will present nearly 200 drawings, paintings, carvings, manuscripts and other forms from that collection, including pieces by autodidacts like Adolf Wölfli, Madge Gill and Augustin Lesage as well as works by artists who are less well known. The show is conceptually anchored by two events: a speech that Dubuffet gave in Chicago in 1951 in which he passionately advocated art by people “uncontaminated by artistic culture”; and a decade-long exhibition of 1,200 pieces from his collection, starting in 1952, at the East Hampton mansion of his friend the artist Alfonso Ossorio. (Through Jan. 10, folkartmuseum.org.)The phrase “pure dance” is widely used when speaking of plotless choreography, yet dance is seldom so pure as Frederick Ashton’s “Monotones I and II.” This masterpiece is dance without climax, without bravura, without speed. No other work has gone so far in its idiom of unbroken poetic adagio and flowing lines, suggesting impersonal rituals of movement in unbounded space.Ashton’s perfect pair of dances joins the repertory of American Ballet Theater on Wednesday, Oct. 21, at the company’s gala at the David H. Koch Theater, when it will be sandwiched between the New York premiere of Mark Morris’s “After You” and the revival of Twyla Tharp’s “The Brahms-Haydn Variations” (2000). It’s the latest in a long series of Ashton ballets (three of them evening-length works) and divertissements that Ballet Theater has presented; in 1974, its artistic director, Kevin McKenzie, danced in the first Joffrey Ballet staging of “Monotones” himself.“Monotones” has two halves, I and II; each is a trio, set to a different threesome of musical items by Erik Satie. Since Ashton, then the director of the Royal Ballet of London, made the one you see first (two women and one man, in green costumes, to Satie’s “Trois Gnossiennes”) in 1966, a year after the other (two men and one woman, in white costumes, to “Trois Gymnopédies”), there’s been constant confusion about which should be called I and which II. Instead, people call them by either the title of their music or the color of their costumes.Intensely sensuous orchestral arrangements — by John Lanchbery, Claude Debussy and Roland-Manuel — are used to give Satie’s piano score the scale for big theaters. And Ashton precedes them with Satie’s “Prelude d’Eginhard” (in Lanchbery’s orchestration) as an overture.About Ashton’s composition for “Gymnopédies,” Arlene Croce wrote in 1974 “the continuity of his line is that of a master draftsman whose pen never leaves the paper.” This line fortuitously echoes a compliment made by Matisse to Ashton in 1939 after watching him create another ballet: “Your choreography unwinds like a chain.” (“Votre chorégraphie se déroule comme une chaîne.”)And perhaps to this day, no ballet has ever gone further than “Monotones” in establishing parity between men and women. Ashton (1904-88) had just entered his 60s when he made the “white” trio, while the world was well into the 1960s, when the fashion for long hair for men and androgynous clothing created a new label: unisex. In ballet, Rudolf Nureyev, devoting most of his time to the Royal Ballet, was giving new dance splendor to the male roles in the traditional ballets. (This movement was nicknamed Princes’ Lib.) Ashton — always responsive both to his own inner femininity and to aspects of male beauty — caught and rode this unisex wave in his choreography.In both halves of “Monotones” — even though his women dance on point, and the men lift them — he showed men and women sharing the same adagio steps, creating the same shapes and lines. Male-female partnering occurs, too, but even here a soloist amplifies a couple: In “Gymnopédies,” there are many moments when one man, sometimes dancing on the other side of the stage, shows the same elongated hand-to-toe line, executes the same rich turn and/or arrives in the same sculptural shape that the woman makes (on point) while partnered by the other man. The close harmony between the three in both trios is nonpareil.A further 1960s touch was that the three dancers of “Gymnopédies,” dressed in white, moved with the slowness that evoked recent film imagery of astronauts walking in outer space. Men had not yet walked on the moon, and yet “Gymnopédies” anticipated the look of Neil Armstrong and Buzz Aldrin so well that within a few years Ashton – mistakenly – told an interviewer that his choreography was influenced by the time “when you Americans were all landing on the moon.”Plotless these two trios may be; yet they abound in incidents. In 1984, interviewing Ashton just before his 80th birthday, I asked him about a moment in the second one, when the three dancers are seated on the floor. He singled out a gesture all three make when, leaning forward, they arch their arms behind them like wings. “Well, you see,” he said, “Goldie the golden eagle had just escaped from London Zoo.”The escape of Goldie the golden eagle in February-March 1965 had been a much-publicized event when I was 9 years old; for days and days, we English schoolboys at boarding school hoped to spot Goldie in a tree near us until he was recaptured. And it was just like Ashton, with his ready sense of humor, to take a chance event and plant it in his choreography. Those “wings” in the “white” trio were his nod to Goldie. Almost 30 years after that interview, I found, in the New York Public Library Dance Division, a widely forgotten film of him rehearsing the three dancers; at the start of Satie’s second Gymnopédie, Ashton calls out “Goldie! Goldie! Goldie!”He was a charming, witty, naughty man — treating his dancers like friends and making work fun. It was in character for him to light on a current story like the one of Goldie and turn it into choreography. In the opening image of “Gymnopédies,” the woman lies on the floor with her legs in a 180-degree split, her torso bent forward to one leg. Then the two men, keeping her on that position, lift her till her legs make a vertical line, in which they rotate her. Ashton had come to rehearsals saying he had a dream of “a chicken on a spit.”But his multitrack mind also moved along lines he did not share with his dancers. Throughout, “Monotones” was addressing dance tradition and the variety of dance classicism, both ancient and modern. The eagle’s-wings image had occurred in choreography before; the title figure of George Balanchine’s “Apollo” (1928), the most influential ballet of the century, begins his second solo by spreading his arms behind him: “These are the wings of the eagle,” Balanchine told at least one dancer when coaching it. Goldie the Golden Eagle had rung an Apollonian bell in Ashton’s mind.He had seen “Apollo” first when it was young with the Diaghilev Ballet in the late 1920s; at the time of “Monotones,” he was negotiating for the Royal Ballet’s first production of it (which followed in 1966). When he made the “Gnossiennes” trio, he created other echoes of Apollo’s configurations with his three muses; and that “chicken on a spit” opening to “Gymnopédies” (the woman’s hyperextension was unprecedented in Ashton’s choreography) is almost certainly a nod to the new feats seen in Balanchine’s radical “Agon” (1957).Balanchine, Ashton’s exact contemporary, was the choreographer he admired most. It was good for world ballet that the two men worked on opposite sides of the Atlantic, exciting for New York that Ashton and his Royal Ballet had their greatest successes in the Royal’s long biennial (or more frequent) seasons at the Metropolitan Opera House. In “The Dream” (1964), Ashton had his 16 fairies quote a key step of Balanchine’s “Concerto Barocco” (hop on point, hop again, then step sideways off point). In “Gymnopédies,” he quoted “Barocco” more subtly: He had the two men slide the woman, her feet together, at a low angle along the floor until, arriving, she suddenly rose into a vertical position.The breadth of repertory that Ballet Theater and other companies demonstrate today is one first exemplified by Ashton’s Royal Ballet in the 1960s. Like many others, he felt that the Royal Ballet under his directorship had the broadest range of repertory in the world — pure dance and dance drama, new works and old. And his own works, “Monotones” not least, were often the binding thread: Their classical vocabulary connected to the language of “Giselle” and “Swan Lake”, to the 20th-century classicism of Michel Fokine, Bronislava Nijinska and Balanchine, and to the latest works of John Cranko and Kenneth MacMillan (both of whose ballets abound in Ashtonisms). The great Diaghilev ballerina Tamara Karsavina told him, “You are a link in the chain”; Nijinska told him, “Tu es mon fils” (“You are my son”).Now his ballets make links in other repertories. Keep looking at “Monotones,” and you also find references to the Shades scene of Marius Petipa’s “La Bayadère,” Fokine (Ashton makes a marvelous variation on “Les Sylphides” in one moment of “Trois Gnossiennes”), Nijinska and Merce Cunningham (in “Gnossiennes,” one woman lies on the man’s back in a classic image of Cunningham weight-taking: Though she is not lifted, she’s moved by him as she lies there). When Ashton made “Monotones,” his Royal Ballet was the only Western troupe dancing “La Bayadère”; American Ballet Theater became the second. And Cunningham’s “Duets (1980), in which weight-taking recurs, has been an item in Ballet Theater’s repertory since 1982.“Monotones” was once the ultimate statement of the adagio beauties of British ballet style; but American and other ballet companies have been dancing it since the 1970s. There are many reasons, as it joins Ballet Theater repertory, it should look right at home.Salsa’s old heroes get momentous receptions on New York stages: In some cases, the force of the welcome drives the show. The “Noche de Salseros in Concert,” on Oct. 17 at Lehman Center for the Performing Arts in the Bronx, could be one of those nights. The clear-voiced Charlie Aponte was one of three singers with El Gran Combo, the definitive band of Puerto Rican salsa, from 1973 until last year. These days he still sings the old, hard-driving salsa — the evidence is a new record, “Una Nueva Historia” — but you’ll be able to take his measure more directly. The singer José Alberto, known as El Canario, broke through in the late ’70s with the band Tipica 73, and became a solo star by the ’80s; he’s a virtuoso who can shift vocal tones between soft and burnished to hard and slicing. (His recent record, “No Quiero Llanto,” recorded partly in Cuba, pays tribute to the early ’50s Cuban singing duo Los Compadres.) Domingo Quiñones, a romantic salsa singer who came to prominence in the ’90s, joins them. (8 p.m., lehmancenter.org.)A Previn-Stoppard Duo …As someone who has lately come around to the delicate pleasures of André Previn’s operatic adaptation of “A Streetcar Named Desire,” I’m intrigued by his disclosure, in a sweet interview with Frank J. Oteri of NewMusicBox, that he’s collaborating on a one-act with Tom Stoppard.… And a Week of Memorable SolosOn Tuesday, at Artists Space Books & Talks, the veteran experimental musician Malcolm Goldstein pays tribute to Ornette Coleman, who died in June.Also on Tuesday, at Roulette, is a bevy of new solo-piano works, in honor of Terry Riley’s 80th birthday, back in June.Also on Tuesday (what a day!), at SubCulture, there’s the first in a series of explorations of the prelude, étude and variation, by the pianist Ian Hobson.Another piano concert comes on Thursday, when the young British virtuoso Benjamin Grosvenor makes his Carnegie Hall recital debut. To prepare, read Michael White’s profile of this thoughtful prodigy, from this weekend’s Arts & Leisure.This Cover Looks Like That CoverThe musicologist (and New York Times contributor) Micaela Baranello noticed something about the weirdly cheesy packaging of an important new “Aida” recording. (I haven’t finished it yet, but it’s thus far quite good, if more immaculately crafted than viscerally affecting.)Some Larger GroupsLast month, when he highlighted a flurry of upcoming performances of Telemann works, the Times critic James R. Oestreich included the American Classical Orchestra’s rare presentation, on Tuesday, of the sacred oratorio “Der Tag des Gerichts” (“The Day of Judgment”) at St. Ignatius of Antioch Church.Thursday brings the Orpheus Chamber Orchestra to Carnegie with a program that includes Wolfgang Rihm’s new Duo Concerto for violin and cello. “Dialogue becomes monologue,” William Robin wrote in our Arts & Leisure pages. “The cello and violin are intimately intertwined into a single voice, never playing alone as individuals for more than a few measures as the orchestra flickers around them.”A Composer’s Special Day …He seems not to have been the most happy or pleasant of men, but the Czech composer Jan Dismas Zelenka, baptized on Oct. 16, 1679, created a shining body of work, full of lively rhythms that he may well have learned from Bohemian folk music.Particularly treasurable are the masses he wrote late in his life, apparently for his private devotion rather than for public performance. Here’s a sensitive, nuanced recording of the “Missa dei Patris” by the Virtuosi Saxoniae under Ludwig Güttler:… And a Singer’sThe great baritone Rolando Panerai, born on Oct. 17, 1924, is happily still with us. The website Parterre Box has posted a 1959 Salzburg Festival performance of Mozart’s “Così Fan Tutte” featuring Mr. Panerai alongside a dreamy cast (Irmgard Seefried, Christa Ludwig and Nicolai Gedda) under Karl Böhm. And here, from a 1950s film, is his chilling, wounded yet poised and elegant rendition of “Eri tu” from Verdi’s “Un Ballo in Maschera”:Bravo, Mr. Panerai! Do you have any favorite clips of his work? Any performances you’re especially looking forward to? Let me know in the comments, or email zach.woolfe@nytimes.com, or tweet @zwoolfe. Happy listening!Onassis Cultural Center NY Festival Family DayThis weekend the Onassis Cultural Center NY will show a lot of love to someone who’s famous for loving only himself: Narcissus.According to Greek mythology, this gorgeous youth was so enamored of his reflection in a pond that he wasted away while gazing at it. The original narcissist, he may seem an unlikely inspiration for a festival — Narcissus Now: The Myth Reimagined, which began on Thursday — but the newly renovated center in Midtown Manhattan is embracing his story as it celebrates its own new look.“Our lives today focus on social media and the selfie,” said Tamar MacKay, co-curator of the Festival Family Day on Sunday. The festival is “using the myth as a metaphor.” At the same time, the Onassis center, devoted to Hellenic culture, is doing what Narcissus didn’t care to: examining the relationship between the self and the wider world.“What was very exciting about looking at the myth for the Family Day is that there’s so much that can relate to kids,” Ms. MacKay said. Tiny visitors can join Maria Hanley for “Mirror Dance,” a movement workshop for ages 3 through 5 in which they’ll frolic to their reflections. Children 5 and over can enjoy “Tell It Again,” an interactive exploration of the myth led by Efi Latifi, and “Narcissus and Echo,” a workshop in which they’ll collaborate with the musician Benjamin Weiner to give the story a digital soundscape. (Echo, a nymph, futilely loved Narcissus.)The day even connects Narcissus to science. In “Narcissus & Space,” the filmmakers Sharon Shattuck and Ian Cheney will show their animated short “Moon Mirrors,” above, which investigates a project that began with the Apollo moon landings: the placement of special mirror arrays, called retroreflectors, on the moon’s surface. When scientists aim lasers at the mirrors, they reflect the light precisely, providing invaluable data on the moon’s position. Jeffrey Hoffman, an M.I.T. professor and former NASA astronaut, will answer children’s questions.“We’ll have a demonstration with a retroreflector, and kids will act as the assistants,” Ms. MacKay said.Sunday will feature drop-in activities, too, including creating a Greek mythology comic; using recycled materials to build a “Reflectopolis,” or shining city; and making a paper flower (the narcissus, of course).The free festival is also a chance to reflect on the myth’s positive side. As Ms. MacKay put it, “Narcissus is able to blossom into this beautiful flower that represents spring and a new beginning.”(From 9 a.m. to 3 p.m., Olympic Tower, 645 Fifth Avenue, at 51st Street. Schedule: onassisfestivalny.org.)For Children‘Alice in Wonderland’ (Saturday and Sunday) Literally Alive Theater, which adapts books into children’s productions, has followed the White Rabbit to Greenwich Village, where it has revived this musical — using video projections and over 30 instruments — based on Alice’s adventures. Written by Michael Sgouros and Brenda Bell, the show is preceded by a workshop in which young theatergoers learn about Lewis Carroll’s work and make a story-related craft to take home. (Through Nov. 8.) Saturday at 11 a.m. and 3 p.m.; Sunday at 11 a.m.; workshop one hour before the performance. Players Theater, 115 Macdougal Street, at Minetta Lane, 212-352-3101, literallyalive.com.‘Archaeology Zone: Discovering Treasures From Playgrounds to Palaces’ (Continuing) Children will step into the shoes of an explorer like Indiana Jones in this permanent exhibition at the Jewish Museum, but the adventures will be purely scholarly. Still, there is plenty of excitement in analyzing Middle Eastern artifacts like a jar handle, a clay jug and a bangle and figuring out the purpose behind ancient pieces like a Greek helmet and a bull-shaped vessel. This interactive show, for ages 3 to 10, also includes a recreated room from the Ottoman period (around 1900) where young archaeologists can dress in costume and portray early-20th-century immigrants to Palestine. 1109 Fifth Avenue, at 92nd Street, 212-423-3200, thejewishmuseum.org.‘Brooklyn Sewers: What’s Up Down There?’ (Through May 29) When it comes to subterranean infrastructure projects, New York City’s subway system seems to get all the attention. But a group of teenage curators at the Brooklyn Historical Society would like to introduce you to another underground marvel: Brooklyn’s sewer system, one of the city’s oldest and most extensive infrastructure projects. This exhibition explores engineering conundrums and courtroom battles and tells the story of the sewer system through photographs, drawings and maps. 128 Pierrepont Street, near Clinton Street, Brooklyn Heights, 718-222-4111, brooklynhistory.org.‘Connected Worlds’ (continuing) Human choices and actions have an impact on the world’s ecosystems, but people usually can’t see the effects as they happen. That isn’t true in this new permanent exhibition in the renovated Great Hall of the New York Hall of Science. Consisting of huge screens (one is 38 feet tall), the show depicts six interconnected environments with a shared water supply. With the help of technology that responds to gestures, “Connected Worlds” allows children to use simple motions to plant, harvest, cut trees, create clouds and make other changes in the projected landscapes — and see how the native flora and fauna fare. 47-01 111th Street, Flushing Meadows-Corona Park, Queens, 718-699-0005, nysci.org.Family Programs at the Museum of the City of New York (Saturday through Monday) Workshops at the museum, for ages 6 through 12, usually combine looking, learning and making. On Saturday “Print Power” will encourage young participants to make a statement. After drawing inspiration from the museum shows “Activist New York” and “Everything Is Design: The Work of Paul Rand,” they’ll create graphic posters to express their own ideas. On Sunday “Finger Knitting Fun” will include instruction in this craft and exposure to the ways New Yorkers have used it. (Yarn will be provided.) And Columbus Day will be all about collage, as young visitors learn about the crops the Lenape Indians harvested here centuries ago and then make their own mosaics, using materials like corn. From 11 a.m. to 2 p.m., 1220 Fifth Avenue, at 103rd Street, 212-534-1972, mcny.org.‘Fashion Academy, the Musical’ (Saturday through Monday) Vital Theater Company’s latest show for children 7 and older focuses on a middle-schooler, MacKenzie Williams, known as Mickey. When her colorful and completely original style doesn’t go over well at her new school, Fashion Academy of Brooklyn, she decides to make over not only her wardrobe, but also herself. Based on the book “Fashion Academy,” by the mother-daughter team of Sheryl Berk and Carrie Berk, this adaptation, by the elder Ms. Berk and Sabrina Chap, asks whether Mickey’s new persona, Kenzie, is really worth the sacrifice. (Through Oct. 31.) At 3:30 p.m., Marjorie S. Deane Little Theater, 10 West 64th Street, Manhattan, 212-579-0528, vitaltheatre.org.‘Flight School, the Musical’ (Saturday through Monday) If you want to fly, and you’re a bird, you should be all set, right? Well, not if you happen to be a penguin. That’s the challenge confronting the little hero of this new musical from Vital Theater Company, adapted from “Flight School,” a picture book by Lita Judge. With a script by Cara Lustik, lyrics by Joshua H. Cohen and a score by David Mallamud, the show, recommended for ages 2 through 7, chronicles Penguin’s determination to remove the technical obstacles between him and the sky. (Through Oct. 31.) At 1 p.m., Marjorie S. Deane Little Theater, 10 West 64th Street, Manhattan, 212-579-0528, vitaltheatre.org.‘Cooking With Frida’ (Through Nov. 1) The New York Botanical Garden is honoring the Mexican artist Frida Kahlo (1907-1954) in its exhibition “Frida Kahlo: Art, Garden, Life,” and it offers programs to introduce its youngest visitors to this famous Latina. In this one, at the Ruth Rea Howell Family Garden, children can explore the raw ingredients of Mexican cuisine and enjoy cooking demonstrations inspired by Kahlo’s entertaining. This holiday weekend, Saturday through Monday, the Howell garden will also offer “Dig! Plant! Grow!,” a program from 1:30 to 5:30 p.m. that will focus on the crops known as “the three sisters”: corn, beans and squash. Children will learn about them and make corn husk dolls to take home. “Cooking With Frida” workshops are on Wednesdays, Saturdays and Sundays at 2 and 4 p.m.; Bronx River Parkway (Exit 7W) and Fordham Road, the Bronx, 718-817-8700, nybg.org.‘Frolic!’ at the Children’s Museum of Manhattan (Through Dec. 31) You’re never too young to rock — and this space proves it. A new pop-up installation at the museum, “Frolic!” uses rock music and a themed décor to stimulate sensory play and learning in visitors ages 5 and under. In addition to a stage, a pretend ticket booth and ’70s-style props — including a Volkswagen mini-van to climb into — the 1,500-square-foot area has programs of workshops and live performances to help little ones get into the groove. The Tisch Building, 212 West 83rd Street, 212-721-1223, cmom.org.‘The Gazillion Bubble Show: The Next Generation’  (Friday through Sunday) Children love bubbles, and this interactive show promises not just a gazillion but also some of the largest ever blown, along with light effects and lasers. The stars are the members of the Yang family: Fan and Ana Yang and their son Deni and others, who rotate as M.C.s for the production. Audience members may even find themselves in bubbles of their own. (The run is open-ended.) Fridays at 7 p.m.; Saturdays at 11 a.m. and 2 and 4:30 p.m.; Sundays at noon and 3 p.m.; 340 West 50th Street, Clinton, 212-239-6200, gazillionbubbleshow.com.General Mischief Dance Theater: ‘Up and Away — Dances for All Hours’ (Sunday) What child could resist a company with a name like this? General Mischief aims to lure all generations with dance that incorporates games, playfulness and humor. This weekend it presents the world premiere of ‘Up and Away,’ which includes a collaboration with the actor and artist Kevin Reese, who has designed a mobile that the company will assemble and raise overhead during the performance. Among the program’s other pieces is “Suite Shel,” a series of dances inspired by Shel Silverstein’s poetry. At 1 and 6 p.m., Goldman-Sonnenfeldt Family Auditorium, JCC in Manhattan, 334 Amsterdam Avenue, at 76th Street, 212-714-4694, brownpapertickets.com.‘Gone Batty!’ Live Bat Encounter (Saturday through Monday) Bats may be malevolent symbols in fiction, but they’re strictly benevolent in real-world ecosystems, something the New York Botanical Garden will demonstrate in this program. Children can see a variety of species close-up, including the endangered Rodrigues bat and the magnificent Malayan flying fox, and learn about the key role these creatures play in pollination, particularly in Mexico. At 1 and 3 p.m., Bronx River Parkway (Exit 7W) and Fordham Road, the Bronx, 718-817-8700, nybg.org.‘Hansel and Gretel’s Halloween Adventure’ (Friday through Sunday, and Tuesday through Thursday) This pair already know how to deal with a witch, and they have encounters with many more fantastical creatures in this puppet musical at the Swedish Cottage Marionette Theater. Geared to ages 3 through 9 (and appropriately tame), the show is a sequel to the theater’s original “Hansel and Gretel,” introduces characters like mermaids, cute monsters, charming vampires and valiant pirates. (Through Oct. 31.) Weekdays, except Mondays, at 10:30 a.m. and noon, with an extra performance on Wednesdays (and on Halloween) at 2:30 p.m.; weekends at 1 p.m. (This Sunday’s show is sold out.) At 79th Street and the West Drive, Central Park, 212-988-9093, cityparksfoundation.org/arts. Reservations required.‘The Hunger Games: The Exhibition’ (Through Jan. 3) What enterprising 12- or 13-year-old wouldn’t like to foment a little rebellion? Such a visitor can do so vicariously at this attraction at Discovery Times Square, stepping into the role of Katniss Everdeen, the teenage heroine of “The Hunger Games” and the ultimate leader of the resistance against her nation’s totalitarian government. Based on the Lionsgate film adaptations of Suzanne Collins’s novels, the show includes costumes and artifacts from the movies, as well as re-creations of Katniss’s journey and interactive, role-playing elements like a gamesmaker’s table and a chance to learn and practice stunt choreography. 226 West 44th Street, Manhattan, 866-987-9692, discoverytsx.com, thehungergamesexhibition.com.‘If You Lived Here, You’d Be Home’ (Through Jan. 17) Maps present facts, but they can also engage the imagination. This new exhibition at the Children’s Museum of the Arts explores the intersection of cartography and art, showing work that expands upon, redefines or simply refers to maps. Among the eight artists represented are Matthew Cusik, who makes collages from map fragments; Joyce Kosloff, who layers images and textured paint onto maps; Loren Munk, who adds plaques of color and information to street maps; and Nikki Rosato, who subtracts from maps, cutting away all but roads and rivers. In the museum’s Cynthia C. Wainwright Gallery, 103 Charlton Street, between Hudson and Greenwich Streets, South Village, 212-274-0986, cmany.org.‘Jean-Michel Cousteau’s Secret Ocean’ (Friday through Thursday) Ever encounter a goby or a blenny? How about a Christmas tree worm? These small marine species, often unnoticed and uncelebrated, are among the stars of this new Imax movie at the American Museum of Natural History. Filmed by Jean-Michel Cousteau, son of the ocean explorer Jacques Cousteau, and Holly Lohuis, a marine biologist, the film captures 30 species that are among the tiniest to inhabit the seas. (Through Jan. 10.) Hourly from 10:30 a.m. to 4:30 p.m., with 2-D screenings at 11:30 a.m. and 4:30 p.m.; all other screenings are 3-D. Central Park West and 79th Street, 212-769-5200, amnh.org.‘LARD: Life’s a Real Dream’ (Saturday) This show about LARD, the concept, has nothing to do with lard, the substance. An acronym for “Life’s a Real Dream,” “LARD” is the title of a rollicking musical production starring Lard Dog, who also happens not to be a dog. The alter ego of the multimedia artist Steven Erdman, Lard is a gregarious out-of-this-world character who has flown in from the planet Belopio on a giant pretzel. He and his Band of Shy perform this hourlong entertainment, which includes cartoon graphics and a pretzel toss. (Through Jan. 2.) Saturdays at 11 a.m., 13th Street Repertory Theater, 50 West 13th Street, Greenwich Village, houseoflard.com.Alison Faith Levy and Her Big Time Tot Rock Band (Sunday) This San Francisco singer has gone from children’s music to adult music and back again. A former member of the kids’ pop group the Sippy Cups, she detoured into the grown-up duo McCabe & Mrs. Miller before returning to her young fans with the albums “World of Wonder” and “The Start of Things.” This concert, for ages 3 through 8, is her New York City debut with her new band. At 11:30 a.m., the Jewish Museum, 1109 Fifth Avenue, at 92nd Street, 212-423-3200, thejewishmuseum.org.‘The Lion, the Witch and the Wardrobe’  (Saturday) If the children of the Pevensie family could travel to the magical land of Narnia through something as simple as a wardrobe, why shouldn’t two hard-working actors be able to play them and all the characters found there? That’s what Chris Boerner and Erin Layton, who recently stepped into the roles, are attempting in the Off Broadway Family Theater’s first production, le Clanché du Rand’s adaptation of C. S. Lewis’s classic novel. (The run is open-ended and continues on Saturdays.) At 11 a.m., St. Luke’s Theater, 308 West 46th Street, Clinton, 212-239-6200, narniaoffbroadway.com.Music in Motion (Saturday) That motion is the gentle rocking of a boat for this series of family neighborhood concerts presented by Bargemusic, the floating barge at the foot of the Brooklyn Bridge. As always, the material — announced just before the performance — is chamber music, but these programs differ in important ways from the regular Bargemusic fare: With unreserved seating, they last only an hour, include a post-show question-and-answer session with the musicians and are free. (Through Nov. 28.) At 4 p.m. (doors open at 3:45), Fulton Ferry Landing, next to the Brooklyn Bridge, Brooklyn, 800-838-3006, bargemusic.org.‘NYC & Me: A Little Bite of the Big Apple’ (Through Jan. 18) There’s one place where little citizens can safely run loose on the streets of New York: the Children’s Museum of Manhattan. This new interactive 3,000-square-foot gallery is a city microcosm for small visitors, allowing them to pretend to be taxi drivers, bus drivers, construction workers, street performers and, most impressively, the mayor. Activities include directing traffic, erecting a skyscraper, “ice skating” in their socks and investigating urban tales on the steps of the New York Public Library. The Tisch Building, 212 West 83rd Street, 212-721-1223, cmom.org.‘One Wild Ride’ This would seem to be an apt title, since one of the stories in this hourlong show is about a subway car with extraordinary powers. But an even wilder ride may be provided by the young audience members themselves, who will be involved, along with the adult cast, in an adventure of their own choosing. The presenting company, BKBXKids!, is a division of Broken Box Mime Theater, and will do this production with a talking M.C. After each performance, the cast will also give a children’s workshop in mime after each show. (Through Oct. 24.) Saturdays at 2 p.m., Here, 145 Avenue of the Americas, at Dominick Street, South Village, 866-811-4111, brokenboxmime.com.¡Pueblo Harlem! Hispanic Heritage Celebration (Saturday) The heritage honored here is one that can be heard loud and clear: jazz. A free daylong festival devoted to family, community and the arts, this event will feature performances by young people helping to get other young people into the groove — the Fat Afro Latin Jazz Cats — as well as a workshop in Brazilian rhythms led by the Griot Youth Ensemble. Classes in Afro-Cuban folkloric dance are on the menu, too. From 11 a.m. to 6:30 p.m., Harlem School of the Arts, 645 St. Nicholas Avenue, near 141st Street, Hamilton Heights, afrolatinjazz.org.‘Robin Hood’ (Saturday and Sunday) Merry Men will make for merry children in this production, which has opened the season at the New Victory Theater. Written by Greg Banks and performed by Seattle Children’s Theater, this staging incorporates a lot of swordplay and fast costume changes, as four actors portray all the roles in the Robin Hood legend. Running about an hour and 40 minutes (with one intermission) and geared to theatergoers 7 and older, the show, closing this weekend, focuses on the many ways Robin and his fellows — and Maid Marian — consistently outsmart the evil prince and the Sheriff of Nottingham, all in the name of helping the poor. Saturday at 2 and 7 p.m.; Sunday at noon and 5 p.m.; 209 West 42nd Street, Manhattan, 646-223-3010, newvictory.org.‘Skeletons ... A Day of the Dead Bedtime Story’ (Saturday) According to Mexican tradition, the spirits of deceased loved ones are revived on the Day of the Dead, a holiday that is joyous rather than ghoulish. In this production from Teatro Sea, the Latino children’s theater, Jimmy is in mourning for his grandfather, who actually comes back to life for one night. Written by Richard Marino, the company’s managing director, “Skeletons” portrays the comical adventures that result when Grandpa and other departed relatives try to help Jimmy get on with his life. (Through Nov. 1.) At 3 p.m., Los Kabayitos Puppet and Children’s Theater, Clemente Soto Vélez Cultural Center, 107 Suffolk Street, at Rivington Street, Lower East Side, 212-529-1545, teatrosea.org.‘Sleepy Hollow’ (Friday through Sunday) Ichabod Crane and the Headless Horseman are off and riding again in this musical revival from Be Bold! Productions. Inspired by Washington Irving’s “The Legend of Sleepy Hollow” and recommended for theatergoers older than 9, this show, by Michael Sgouros and Brenda Bell, focuses on the love triangle and the mystery inherent in Irving’s tale. It also explores a darkness beyond the story’s fearsome woods: that of the human heart. Fridays and Saturdays at 7 p.m. (no show on Oct. 31); Sundays at 2 p.m.; Players Theater, 115 Macdougal Street, at Minetta Lane, Greenwich Village, 866-811-4111, hollowthemusical.com.Sunday Story Time in Mr. Morgan’s Library (Sunday) That Mr. Morgan is none other than Pierpont (1837-1913), whose library is now a cozy museum. Children ages 3 through 6 are invited there on Sundays to hear about Alice’s amazing trip to Wonderland and what she found there. The program relates to the museum’s show “Alice: 150 Years of Wonderland,” which includes the book’s original manuscript, along with illustrations and other vintage objects that young visitors can see in a brief visit after the story. (Through Oct. 11.) From 3 to 4 p.m., 225 Madison Avenue, at 36th Street, 212-685-0008, themorgan.org.‘A Taste of Magic’ (Friday and Saturday) Would you like a side of sleight of hand with that burger? This show, developed by Magnets, a collective of local magicians, brings wizardry to the dinner table. Taking place at various Manhattan restaurants, the presentation includes acts like mind-reading and card tricks, which professionals perform close-up for guests; there’s also a cabaret-style show. And the admission price includes a full meal. (Through Nov. 24.) Friday at 8 p.m., Ben & Jack’s Steakhouse, 225 Fifth Avenue, between 28th and 29th Streets. Saturday at 6:30 p.m., Docks Oyster Bar & Seafood Grill, 633 Third Avenue, at 40th Street. Information and registration: atasteofmagicnyc.com.‘The Velveteen Rabbit’ (Saturday and Sunday) There’s a long fictional tradition of toys wanting, or trying, to become real, but few such tales are more poignant than Margery Williams Bianco’s story “The Velveteen Rabbit,” in which a beloved stuffed animal undergoes a magical transformation. Atlantic for Kids, the children’s theater division of the Atlantic Theater Company, is the latest troupe to adapt the book for the stage. This musical version, by Cormac Bluestone and Anya Saffir, is directed toward children 3 to 9 and features many young alumni of the Atlantic Acting School. (Through Nov. 1.) Saturdays and Sundays at 10:30 a.m., Linda Gross Theater, 336 West 20th Street, Chelsea, 866-811-4111, atlantictheater.org.‘A Voyage Through Jewish History’  (Continuing) This journey involves not just miles, but years. In this permanent interactive exhibition at the Jewish Children’s Museum, young visitors can travel from Abraham and Sarah’s tent to the Western Wall in contemporary Jerusalem and beyond. Activities along the way include giving water to Rebecca’s camels, playing the strings on David’s harp (a high-tech version with beams of light that emit sounds when struck) and taking part in the exodus from Egypt. 792 Eastern Parkway, at Kingston Avenue, Crown Heights, Brooklyn, 718-907-8833, jcm.museum.Wings Over Wave Hill Weekend (Saturday through Monday) Wave Hill, the Bronx garden, is inviting families to spend the Columbus Day Weekend with some proud residents who inhabited these shores long before Christopher Columbus set foot on them. They are raptors, or birds of prey, which visitors will be able to see up-close at 1 p.m. on Monday, when Brian Bradley, of the organization Skyhunters in Flight, will do a falconry demonstration. Recommended for children 8 and older, the program will show off the prowess of hawks, owls and falcons. On both Saturday and Sunday, from 10 a.m. to 1 p.m., children can also take part in the garden’s drop-in family art project, “Sailing the Sky,” first watching for migratory hawks as the birds journey above the Hudson River and then making either a hawk glider or a feathery windsock. In addition, the garden will offer two bird-watching walks: At 8 a.m. on Saturday and at 9:30 a.m. on Sunday, children 10 and older are invited to accompany adults on tours through the garden and woodlands led by the naturalist and bird expert Gabriel Willow. (Registration is required for the Saturday walk and recommended for the Sunday one.) Also on Sunday, at 1 p.m., the naturalist Gabriel Willow will lead a family nature walk for ages 6 and older, starting at the Perkins Visitor Center. West 249th Street and Independence Avenue, Riverdale, the Bronx, 718-549-3200, wavehill.org.The King James Bible is the most widely read work in English literature, a masterpiece of translation whose stately cadences and transcendent phrases have long been seen, even by secular readers, as having emerged from a kind of collective divine inspiration.But now, in an unassuming notebook held in an archive at the University of Cambridge, an American scholar has found what he says is an important new clue to the earthly processes behind that masterpiece: the earliest known draft, and the only one definitively written in the hand of one of the roughly four dozen translators who worked on it.The notebook, which dates from 1604 to 1608, was discovered by Jeffrey Alan Miller, an assistant professor of English at Montclair State University in New Jersey, who announced his research on Wednesday in an article in The Times Literary Supplement.While the notebook has yet to be examined by other scholars, experts who have reviewed Professor Miller’s research called it perhaps the most significant archival find relating to the King James Bible in decades.David Norton, an emeritus professor at the Victoria University of Wellington in New Zealand and the author of several books about the King James Bible, called it “a major discovery” — if not quite equal to finding a draft of one of Shakespeare’s plays, “getting on up there.”Gordon Campbell, a fellow in Renaissance studies at the University of Leicester and a consultant for the planned Museum of the Bible in Washington, said the new manuscript shed fresh light on how the King James translators actually did their work, as opposed to how they had been told to do it.Studying the creation of the King James Bible “is like working with a jigsaw puzzle where 90 percent of the pieces are missing,” Mr. Campbell said. “You can arrange the surviving pieces as you wish, but then you find something new and you realize you put it together the wrong way.”The King James Bible, published in 1611, was produced by six teams of translators, known as “companies,” in London, Oxford and Cambridge, who were charged with creating an authorized version that would support the Church of England against the Puritan influence seen in some earlier translations. Along with Shakespeare’s First Folio of 1623, it is one of the most influential books in the history of English and the wellspring of common phrases like “salt of the earth,” “drop in the bucket” and “fight the good fight,” to name only a few.While some records of the committee that supervised the overall translation survive, only three manuscripts of the text itself have been known to exist until now. The Bodleian Library at Oxford owns nearly complete drafts of the Old Testament and the Gospels, in the form of corrected pages of the Bishops’ Bible, a 16th-century translation that the King James teams used as a base text. Lambeth Palace Library in London has a partial draft of the New Testament epistles.Professor Miller discovered the manuscript last fall, when he was in the archives at Sidney Sussex College in Cambridge, researching an essay about Samuel Ward, one of the King James translators and, later, the college’s master. He was hoping to find an unknown letter, which he did.“I thought that would be my great discovery,” he recalled.But he also came across an unassuming notebook about the size of a modern paperback, wrapped in a stained piece of waste vellum and filled with some 70 pages of Ward’s nearly indecipherable handwriting.The notebook had been cataloged in the 1980s as a “verse-by-verse biblical commentary” with “Greek word studies, and some Hebrew notes.” But as Professor Miller tried to puzzle out which passages of the Bible it concerned, he realized what it was: a draft of parts of the King James Version of the Apocrypha, a disputed section of the Bible that is left out of many editions, particularly in the United States.“There was a kind of thunderstruck, leap-out-of-bathtub moment,” Professor Miller said. “But then comes the more laborious process of making sure you are 100 percent correct.”The draft, Professor Miller argues, dates from between 1604, when the King James Bible was commissioned, and 1608, when the six teams were asked to send their work to the general committee for review. Unlike the other surviving drafts, which scholars date to later parts of the process, it shows an individual translator’s initial puzzling over aspects of the Greek text of the Apocrypha, indicating the reasoning behind his translation choices, with reference to Hebrew and Latin as well.“You can actually see the way Greek, Latin and Hebrew are all feeding into what will become the most widely read work of English literature of all time,” Professor Miller said. “It gets you so close to the thought process, it’s incredible.”The draft, he argues, also complicates one long-cherished aspect of the “mythos,” as he put it, surrounding the King James: that it was a collaborative project through and through.The companies were charged with doing their work as a group, rather than subdividing it by assigning individual books to individual translators, as was the case with the Bishops’ Bible. But the Ward notebook, Professor Miller said, suggests “beyond a reasonable doubt” that at least some of the companies ignored the instructions and divided up the work among individuals, at least initially.Further, he said, the notebook contains a complete draft for the book of the Apocrypha known as 1 Esdras, but then, after a run of blank pages, only a partial manuscript for the book known as the Wisdom of Solomon, suggesting that Ward picked up the slack for another translator.“Some of them, being typical academics, either fell down on the job or just decided not to do it,” Professor Miller said, with a laugh. “It really testifies to the human element of this kind of great undertaking.”In recent years, scholars have chipped away at the idea of Shakespeare’s plays as the product of an isolated genius, emphasizing instead the intensely collaborative nature of Elizabethan theater. Professor Miller said that the origins of the other great monument of 17th-century English literature is due for a similar reconsideration.“There’s a strong desire to see the King James Bible as a uniform object, and a belief that it’s great because of its collaborative nature,” Professor Miller said.“It was incredibly collaborative,” he continued. “But it was done in a much more complicated, nuanced, and at times individualistic way than we’ve ever really had good evidence to believe.”Pop music is dominated almost exclusively by the female star — Beyoncé, Rihanna, Katy Perry, Taylor Swift, Miley Cyrus, Lady Gaga and, as always, Madonna. Engaging in a frantic, complex game — crossing over many genres to keep up with the current caldron of hip-hop, electronic music and R&B; signing sponsorship deals to make up for the lack of album sales; performing live everywhere from sheikhs’ parties to worldwide arenas — these women are the pop business now, and they’re not feeling particularly shy about telling us that. Their primary message has become one of being the woman you actually have to be behind the scenes to succeed today: powerful, outspoken and in control.Nicki Minaj is the world’s biggest female hip-hop star, a top pop star and the first woman to achieve success in both genres. Like Beyoncé, who performed recently in Central Park with the words ‘‘boss’’ and ‘‘hustler’’ flashing on screens behind her, along with a grainy video in which she smashed a vacuum and a sewing machine, Minaj has become expert at modeling the ways that women can wield power in the industry. But she has also drawn attention to the ways in which power can be embodied by a woman standing up for herself and speaking her own mind. Minaj’s behavior isn’t exclusive to her tracks; she also exhibits it in the national telenovela that she, like the rest of these women, to a greater or lesser degree, is running about herself, feeding the public information about her paramours, ex-paramours, peccadilloes and beefs, all of it delivered in social media’s short, sharp bursts.Perhaps you recall the three-act revenge drama that played out on various screens last month, as Minaj faced off against two major powers: Swift, the 25-year-old golden girl who may be the richest woman in music, and who spends time wholesomely baking cookies at her TriBeCa spread with a rotating cast of B.F.F.s; and Cyrus, the ex-Disney star who, more than five years ago, was extolling the virtues of purity rings but is now America’s pre-eminent ‘‘bad girl.’’ She first recreated herself as a pornified star who wore gold grilles on her teeth and introduced the mainstream to ‘‘twerking,’’ a dance originating in black circles in the South that involves shaking your buttocks, and more recently rebranded herself a ‘‘happy hippie’’ and ‘‘genderqueer,’’ neither male nor female.Pop stars today travel around with a small entourage, conducting their business from a mobile phone in the back of a climate-controlled luxury vehicle. And you can imagine these women in their cars when the nominations for MTV’s Video Music Awards, which long ago stopped judging musical quality and moved on to assessing the size of empires, were announced earlier this summer. The list did not include a nod in the top award category for Minaj’s wild video for ‘‘Anaconda,’’ a song that samples Sir Mix-a-Lot’s ‘‘Baby Got Back,’’ from 1992. The video features Minaj flipping the script to be the baby who has back, refusing to let her co-star, Drake, touch her buttocks and, somewhat frighteningly (for men) cutting up a banana that’s a clear metaphor for the snake in their pants.You can picture Minaj in her Maybach as she considered this particular affront and then used it to make a larger point. ‘‘If I was a different ‘kind’ of artist, ‘Anaconda’ would be nominated,’’ she tweeted, followed by ‘‘If your video celebrates women with very slim bodies, you will be nominated,’’ and ‘‘I’m not always confident. Just tired. Black women influence pop culture so much but are rarely rewarded for it.’’ (For the record, Beyoncé was nominated for the award in question, for a video in which she dances around in underwear and, inexplicably, a sweatshirt with the word ‘‘KALE.’’)Swift, the good girl, herself nominated for a video featuring semiclad, slender women, jumped in next: ‘‘I’ve done nothing but love & support you. It’s unlike you to pit women against each other. Maybe one of the men took your slot.’’ (She quickly encountered media pushback and called Minaj to apologize.) But the free spirit Cyrus had something to say, too: A few weeks later, in this newspaper, she criticized Minaj’s comments as lacking an ‘‘open heart’’ and ‘‘love,’’ adding that she didn’t respect Minaj’s statement ‘‘because of the anger that came with it,’’ calling it ‘‘not very polite’’ and continuing, ‘‘Nicki Minaj is not too kind.’’Soon, our characters gathered in the V.M.A. Thunderdome, where things that are not quite true are staged in a crude, middle-school-esque pageant, with players jockeying for time. And indeed, Swift and Minaj, having reached a truce, opened the show together. But later, as Minaj slinked onstage in a revealing dress that closely resembled gold filigree on a china cup to accept her award — for Best Hip-Hop Video, which is not as important as Video of the Year: ‘‘I saw [Cyrus] just looking at me, with her face screwed up, and I thought, What the!’’ she told me in mid-September, in the Trump hotel in Columbus Circle, while visiting New York for Fashion Week. Onstage, Minaj next did something exceedingly rare in the commercial music world. She addressed Cyrus with real venom — ‘‘This bitch that had a lot to say about me the other day in the press’’ — and pointed at her with a manicured finger: ‘‘Miley, what’s good?’’ MTV cut Minaj’s mike, but you could see her lips forming the words, ‘‘Don’t play with me, bitch.’’A month later, the episode was still bothering Minaj. Addressing Cyrus, she told me: ‘‘The fact that you feel upset about me speaking on something that affects black women makes me feel like you have some big balls. You’re in videos with black men, and you’re bringing out black women on your stages, but you don’t want to know how black women feel about something that’s so important? Come on, you can’t want the good without the bad. If you want to enjoy our culture and our lifestyle, bond with us, dance with us, have fun with us, twerk with us, rap with us, then you should also want to know what affects us, what is bothering us, what we feel is unfair to us. You shouldn’t not want to know that.’’Minaj stands a bit over five feet tall, and as she padded around barefoot in her hotel suite, there was a tangle of shoes and outfits collected nearby that she had considered but rejected for Fashion Week. Outfits carefully sewn to the measurements of a six-foot-tall model with hipbones like handlebars don’t fit a shapely-all-over woman, and Minaj, like Kim Kardashian, favors garments with spandex in them. In the last 24 hours, she had poured herself into a nude mesh Alexander Wang dress that the most party-hearty 19-year-old would choose only as a beach cover-up; changed to a fire-engine-red two-piece zip-up suit for Wang’s after-party; danced at Jay-Z’s 40/40 Club in the Flatiron district for hours; hit the recording studio with her boyfriend, the Philadelphia rapper Meek Mill; then, finally, crawled into bed in the hotel on the Upper West Side at 7 a.m. She woke up at 3:30 p.m., changing into purple leggings and an oversize black T-shirt, though remnants of the night’s ensembles remained — her hair swept up in a gun moll’s bouffant, a smidge shorter than Amy Winehouse wore hers; several diamond stud earrings crawled up her right ear like a series of buttons on the back of a Victorian gown.Minaj may have had a fair amount of influence over the fact that pop stars are constantly telling us they’re bosses, or they’re bitches, or they’re ‘‘boss bitches,’’ which seems like a contradiction, or redundant, but is said without a trace of irony. A unique figure who draws 10-year-old girls as fans with her Technicolor wigs, sophisticated mimicry and playful attitude, Minaj also assumes a persona as aggressive, dis-happy and vulgar as any man in hip-hop. She electrifies tracks merely by appearing on them, from Kanye West’s ‘‘Monster’’ in 2010 (‘‘First things first, I’ll eat your brains,’’ she explains) to the electronic dance music artist David Guetta’s ‘‘Hey Mama,’’ with a video featuring her gyrating in a desert scene resembling Burning Man. She’s also the first woman to rise to the very top of the rap game not only as a star but also as a business entity. ‘‘My wrists look like I am a jewel thief/But that’s just cuz I am a boss bitch/Now macaroni cheese and grill my swordfish,’’ she says in a song entitled, appropriately enough, ‘‘Boss Ass Bitch.’’There’s nothing new about female artists struggling with issues of power and control, but we’re far today from the 1990s, when Queen Latifah proclaimed ‘‘every time I hear a brother call a girl a bitch or a ho/Trying to make a sister feel low/You know all that gots to go.’’ ‘‘Bitch,’’ in music, used to be an insult, a sneer, and it still can be. But female empowerment is a trend, and the word has been reclaimed — by Minaj, in many a track; by Rihanna, in ‘‘Bitch Better Have My Money’’; and triumphantly by Madonna, in her recent track ‘‘Bitch, I’m Madonna.’’ This is good for business and either good for women or not good for women at all.In another era, Minaj’s sexuality, expressed semi-parodically — pretending she’s a Barbie doll; glorifying women dressed as prostitutes and set in red-light-district windows — might have given feminists pause. But in the 2010s, we have entered a different world in pop culture, one in which sexual repression is perceived as burdensome and perhaps even an inability to holistically integrate the body and self. Young people are identifying and exploring formerly unknown, or at least unlabeled, frontiers of sexuality and gender. And the fact that Minaj is in charge of her own objectification (describing her vagina with more words than I thought existed, and then amplifying its power by rhyming those words), as well as her own monetization (overt product placement in videos is a hallmark) has led most feminist voices to applaud her. But the writer Bell Hooks remains unimpressed, saying of ‘‘Anaconda’’ at a New School panel titled ‘‘Whose Booty Is This?’’: ‘‘This [expletive] is boring. What does it mean? Is there something that I’m missing that’s happening here?’’‘‘The frequency that Nicki works on is not the easiest frequency for us to wrestle with, because it’s about autonomy, and who has it, and whether we can actually tell the difference between self-objectification and self-gratification,’’ says Treva B. Lindsey, an assistant professor of women’s, gender and sexuality studies at the Ohio State University, continuing: ‘‘Do we even know what an autonomous female looks like in pop culture? What does control even mean in such a corporatized mass-media space?’’On hip-hop radio shows, the dominant journalistic genre for the art form, Minaj speaks with a Queens accent, sometimes injecting it with Caribbean flair. But there was no evidence of that at the hotel, where she spoke in a night-after whisper that sounded like the hiss of a record before a song begins to play. ‘‘I never was political or preachy, but I’d stop my show and do two minutes of talking to my girls, boosting them up,’’ Minaj said, sitting in a small, straight-backed chair upholstered in the light gray fabric ubiquitous in luxury hotels, Columbus Circle’s billboards pulsing in the background as dusk fell. ‘‘They’d go home feeling, ‘Can’t nobody tell me [expletive].’ ’’ And as her career went on, she realized she had more to say. ‘‘We got so many girls right now having children and don’t even know the first thing to say to a child, but you’re having a child because ‘I want to keep this dude,’ or it just happened,’’ she explains on her second album. ‘‘Why are we never in control? Why are we stuck with a baby? Why are we always stuck on the welfare line? Why are we always stuck having to beg, borrow and steal to provide for our children? Why do we think it’s something wrong for waiting to have a baby, waiting until you’re 35 or 36 to have children? Technology has changed — you can wait! Have something to offer them.’’Minaj has a shockingly beautiful and complex face, with a wide, high forehead, dark, almond-shaped eyes and deep dimples on both sides of her cheeks that materialize when she smiles. But when asked if she felt confident in her looks as a kid, she said, ‘‘Hell, no!’’ She paused. ‘‘Now, I want to take steps to become more aware of who I am, what I like or dislike about my body — why is that?’’ she said. She mentioned how insecure she felt on Instagram, ‘‘where everyone is freaking drop-dead gorgeous.’’ Don’t get her wrong, she said: Like most celebrities, she approves the pictures that appear on her Instagram and other social-media accounts. ‘‘I get that people put filters on their pictures — I definitely use filters — but I didn’t know people retouched,’’ she says, excitedly talking about being in a nightclub the other day, taking pictures with a friend, and how the friend ‘‘cleaned all the sweat off our face’’ before she posted the photo. ‘‘We’re in a club! We can have a moist, dewy-looking face.’’She laughs for the first time in our conversation, dimples popping everywhere, sun radiating through the room. ‘‘People’’ — famous people, she means — ‘‘are posting pictures of working out, and then there’s a change in their body” most likely from plastic surgery, “and they say it’s because they were working out! Ah-hahahaha.’’ Then she turns serious again. ‘‘Back in the day, in hip-hop, the thick girl was glorified. Now the rappers are dating skinny white women. So it’s almost like, ‘Wait a minute, who’s going to tell the thick black girls that they’re sexy and fly, too?’ ’’One of Minaj’s most fascinating stylistic tricks as a performer has been incorporating alter egos, not only the Barbie doll (which she calls Harajuku Barbie) but Roman, an outspoken gay boy who lives inside of her. These alter egos, which have extensively detailed identities, seem exemplary of the way that women are forced to assume different personae to get through the day. But when I asked why she hadn’t called on them much on her last album, she gave me a vague answer about how they were only ‘‘funny’’ and were still around somewhere. Early in her career, she also adopted Lady Gaga’s method of saturating the media with outrageous costumes, but now, when I asked if Gaga influenced her, she shot back, with a look of such intense disapproval my hair curled: ‘‘I don’t even want to discuss that. That’s so old to me.’’Minaj, tough in general, is known to be particularly tough with the press, like rappers tend to be. ‘‘You have to be like a beast — that’s the only way they respect you,’’ she said, in a soft-focus MTV documentary on her life, explaining that she walks out of photo shoots when there’s ‘‘a $50 clothes budget and some sliced pickles.’’ She’s also guarded about her past, and much of her present. Born Onika Maraj in Trinidad in 1982, she moved to the United States several years later (her parents spent two years in the States before she arrived, trying to get settled). Minaj has long emphasized her difficult upbringing — speaking openly about crack cocaine use in her home, in Jamaica, Queens, as well as domestic abuse and an episode when she says her father tried to burn down her house. But it’s difficult to reconcile those stories with the recent announcement that she’s developing a show about her youth for ABC Family. When I asked if her father abused her, she said: ‘‘No. He was just abusive.’’ She continued: ‘‘I would always hear him yelling and cursing, always. And it made me feel it was the way to interact, because that’s how I saw him interacting.’’ She said her parents’ marriage wasn’t a happy one. ‘‘When I was younger,’’ she explained, ‘‘I thought that the only reason my mother didn’t leave my father was for financial reasons.’’ She went on: ‘‘From early on in my life, I looked at a woman not having her money as the biggest curse,’’ and then added, ‘‘Now that I’m an adult, I realize that women stay whether a man’s rich or poor. It’s just a weakness.’’Like Lady Gaga, who starred in plays while attending the Upper East Side’s Convent of the Sacred Heart, Minaj has drama-school chops. She studied theater at the Upper West Side’s LaGuardia High School — the school from ‘‘Fame’’ — working on her freestyle rap skills in the lunchroom. After graduation, she waitressed at Red Lobster to make money and sang choruses on low-level rappers’ tracks. One day in a recording studio, she asked a local artist if she could write a rap. ‘‘I wrote eight bars while he was in the booth, and he asked to hear it, but I was too shy. I said, ‘Can I just go spit it?’ ’’ Minaj was in her neighborhood when she heard the song booming out of his car. ‘‘He was playing it proudly, and that was my first indication — maybe I’m good.’’ She began locking herself in her room for hours and hours with her beat CDs, she says. ‘‘Eventually my mother would come in to check if I was alive.’’Minaj’s darkest period may have started when she tried to make it in the men’s world of hip-hop, in about 2002. But when I asked for details, she said, ‘‘I’m not approving or confirming anything you said.’’ A sketch for this time, then, begins when producers placed her in a group called the Hoodstars with three men, including Safaree Samuels, who would become her boyfriend of a decade; failing to secure a recording contract, Minaj began to rebuild herself as a solo act. In 2006, another producer, Big Fendi, christened her Nicki Minaj (‘‘Fendi flipped [my name] when he met me because I had such a nasty flow! I eat bitches!’’ she said, in an early interview). He reimagined her as the new Lil’ Kim. Kim, the Biggie Smalls protégée, wore wigs, pretended to be a black Barbie and not only rapped about her genitalia but called attention to it in photo shoots that Minaj recreated. (At some point, Minaj also sold her mixtapes out of her white BMW 323i, a car she says she scrimped and saved to buy. I’m not sure when that was, because after I asked about it twice, she told me it was a dumb question.)Enticing big-name rappers to add a couple of bars to your tracks, or securing a guest spot on one of those rappers’ songs, is the way to build fame in hip-hop, and Minaj proved herself to be adept. She garnered guest verses from hip-hop royalty, including Lil Wayne. But her manager at the time, Debra Antney, who was born in Jamaica, Queens, before becoming an Atlanta hip-hop matriarch (and also the rapper Waka Flocka Flame’s mother), says, ‘‘Nicki was the timidest little girl you’d ever want to see in your life — she was so broken up, but she was so determined, all in one breath.’’ Timid? ‘‘I used to have to scream at her: ‘You’re not going to sit here and cry, you’re not going to let nobody shut you down, that’s what you’re not going to do,’ ’’ she says.Minaj knew with whom she preferred to be aligned, though he didn’t sign her until 2009: Lil Wayne, whose label, Young Money, is part of Cash Money, co-founded by Bryan Williams, known as Birdman. Wayne is ‘‘a master of psychology. This guy has studied words. This guy is a poet,’’ she told Dazed magazine. She was marketed as a multigenre artist from the beginning, writing her own raps but also using the assembly-line process of pop. ‘‘Nicki, with her theater background and ability to take on a range of accents, is extremely well suited to the way that pop music is made today, when the artist is a vocal actor not asked to say something that’s profound but rather play a role in a song that someone else has written,’’ says John Seabrook, author of ‘‘The Song Machine: Inside the Hit Factory.’’ But building her as a brand, long a part of the culture of hip-hop, was ‘‘the furthest thing from breezy,’’ says her manager, the Maverick management group co-founder Gee Roberson. Securing a fragrance deal, a Glu mobile game, an alcoholic drink — all of that requires entering executive suites ‘‘dominated by men.’’During her rise, Minaj didn’t publicly announce that she had a boyfriend — she introduced Samuels to the world only as a valued producer, continuing the long tradition of sex symbols appearing sexually available to their fans. She has since changed her attitude about that, and has not been shy about being in love with her current boyfriend, Meek Mill, pointing toward the bedroom whenever his name came up tonight. He recently had his own beef, with Drake, Minaj’s labelmate, during which — this is an abridged version — Meek attacked Drake for using a ghostwriter, and Drake struck back with what seemed like an endless series of dis tracks, one of which asks, ‘‘Is that a world tour or your girl’s tour?’’ That Minaj managed to stay above this is significant. ‘‘Historically in hip-hop, female rappers have always had to stand next to a male rapper in order to maintain relevance, or keep their spark,’’ says Charlamagne Tha God, the outspoken host of the radio station Power 105.1’s program ‘‘The Breakfast Club.’’ ‘‘What happened with Drake and Meek won’t have any effect on Nicki at all, and in fact I think Nicki is so strong that she’s one of the reasons people haven’t completely said Meek is done.’’Minaj talked a bit about dealing with men and work. ‘‘Since I was 15, I came out of one relationship and went into another relationship,’’ she told me. ‘‘In my relationships, I’ve been told, ‘You don’t have to work that much.’ But I can’t stop working, because it’s bigger than work to me. It’s having a purpose outside any man.’’Meek’s beef with Drake was different from Minaj’s beefs with the pop queens. It was an old fight, about authenticity — the oldest dust-up there is in hip-hop. Minaj is fighting newer battles. While discussing the state of women in the music business, I asked about the ethics of ‘‘Straight Outta Compton,’’ the N.W.A. biopic that does not include a reference to Dr. Dre’s history of abusing women. ‘‘I don’t know anything about that,’’ she said. Then I asked about the dramatic goings-on at her label: Wayne is suing Birdman for $51 million for withholding fees, and Wayne’s tour bus was riddled with bullets in Georgia earlier this year. A federal indictment claims that individuals connected to another Cash Money rapper, Young Thug, may be responsible.This was not the game Minaj was here to play — interviews in the social-media era are about being adored, not interrogated. It was getting dark outside when I asked about Drake, Meek, Wayne and Williams. Minaj hadn’t turned on lights, so she was in shadow. ‘‘They’re men, grown-ass men,’’ she said. ‘‘It’s between them.’’ How does it make you feel, I ask? ‘‘I hate it,’’ she said. ‘‘It doesn’t make me feel good. You don’t ever want to choose sides between people you love. It’s ridiculous. I just want it to be over.’’‘‘Is there a part of you that thrives on drama, or is it no, just pain and unpleasantness—’’The room went quiet, but only for an instant.‘‘That’s disrespectful,’’ Minaj said, drawing herself up in the chair. ‘‘Why would a grown-ass woman thrive off drama?’’As soon as I said the words, I wished I could dissolve them on my tongue. In pop-culture idiom, ‘‘drama’’ is the province of Real Housewives with nothing better to do than stick their noses where they don’t belong. I was more interested in a different kind of drama — the kind worthy of an HBO series, in which your labelmate is releasing endless dis tracks against your boyfriend and your mentor is suing your label president for a king’s ransom. But the phrase I used was offensive, and even as I tried to apologize, I only made matters worse.‘‘What do the four men you just named have to do with me thriving off drama?’’ she asked. ‘‘Why would you even say that? That’s so peculiar. Four grown-ass men are having issues between themselves, and you’re asking me do I thrive off drama?’’She pointed my way, her extended arm all I could see other than the diamonds glinting in her ears. This wasn’t over yet. ‘‘That’s the typical thing that women do. What did you putting me down right there do for you?’’ she asked. ‘‘Women blame women for things that have nothing to do with them. I really want to know why — as a matter of fact, I don’t. Can we move on, do you have anything else to ask?’’ she continued. ‘‘To put down a woman for something that men do, as if they’re children and I’m responsible, has nothing to do with you asking stupid questions, because you know that’s not just a stupid question. That’s a premeditated thing you just did.’’ She called me ‘‘rude’’ and ‘‘a troublemaker,’’ said ‘‘Do not speak to me like I’m stupid or beneath you in any way’’ and, at last, declared, ‘‘I don’t care to speak to you anymore.’’I found myself back in the lobby, with its Trumpian brass fixtures and huge chandeliers, with the black bikes stamped ‘‘Trump Hotel’’ tied up in front, and the men in their blue suits coming down the steps jingling change in their pockets, and the regular Upper West Side scene — bankers walking their dogs, tourists on Citibikes going the wrong way, the sound of an express train coming up through the subway grates. Minaj’s actions made sense, in some ways: Even though I had no intention of putting her down as a small-minded or silly woman, she was right to call me out. She had the mike and used it to her advantage, hitting the notes that we want stars like her to address right now, particularly those of misogyny and standing up for yourself, even if it involves standing up for yourself against another woman. I didn’t know how much of it Minaj really felt, and how much it was a convenient way of maintaining control. I only knew that, in that moment, she was a boss bitch.Weller Martin and Fonsia Dorsey, residents of a modest retirement home and the sole characters in D. L. Coburn’s 1976 play, “The Gin Game,” have withdrawn from the world, willingly or not, and await the inevitable end with minimal protest. By contrast, James Earl Jones and Cicely Tyson, who are playing these roles in the excellent Broadway revival of Mr. Coburn’s flinty comedy, still seem to be in their glowing prime, actors with long and distinguished careers behind them who nevertheless keep seeking further heights to scale.Scale them they do: Mr. Jones, 84, has appeared on Broadway a remarkable six times in the past decade. Ms. Tyson, 90, won a well-deserved Tony Award just two years ago for her luminous performance in “The Trip to Bountiful.”Although it won a Pulitzer Prize during a fairly lean period for American playwriting, Mr. Coburn’s play cannot exactly be called an Everest of contemporary drama. Still, it proves a sturdy, humming vehicle, its gentle comedy undergirded by dark emotional coloring. Onstage for virtually all of its two-hour running time, Mr. Jones and Ms. Tyson draw out all its nuances, as Weller and Fonsia bicker and make nice over a card table. These two superlative performers establish beyond doubt, if we needed any reminding, that great talent is ageless and ever-rewarding.On its surface, “The Gin Game,” which opened on Wednesday night at the John Golden Theater in a production cleanly directed by Leonard Foglia, could hardly be simpler: Set entirely on the porch of the home where Weller and Fonsia have none too happily come to rest (designed in gritty detail by Riccardo Hernandez), it depicts their sometimes friendly, sometimes testy relationship, which is stirred into life when the terminally bored Weller first spies in Fonsia the potential card partner he’s been pining for.She at first demurs, claiming little knowledge of gin rummy and requiring some rudimentary reminders. Soon, however, Fonsia is winning hand after hand, racking up points. Weller’s courtly surprise turns to frisky irritation and, ultimately, foul-mouthed fits of rage that send Fonsia stalking away.What is really taking place, of course, is a human connection, however flawed, that both desperately need. Fonsia and Weller were each divorced long ago, and have virtually been abandoned by their adult children; at one point Weller makes a mordant joke about their lack of visitors. As the cards are shuffled and dealt, layers of formality fall away, and we come to see these intimately drawn characters in microscopic detail, thanks to the vividly theatrical but admirably unfussy performances of Mr. Jones and Ms. Tyson.Mr. Jones’s gorgeous, burly baritone seems a complicated character in itself. It takes on honeyed cadences when he’s making up to Fonsia after one of his storms of pique, but becomes the threatening roar of a baited bear when, with dainty delicacy, Fonsia once again lays down a winning hand.Weller’s frustration doesn’t derive entirely from his bad luck at cards, of course; as Fonsia draws him out, we learn of his disappointing career and less than fulfilled personal life. But there remains in him a stiff orneriness that Mr. Jones captures with subtle comic flair; it constitutes his only rebuke to the misfortunes life has dealt, and he will carry it to his grave like a tarnished badge of honor.Fonsia clings to her own dignity as tightly as she does her ever-present purse. Although, when we first meet her, she is crying frustrated tears, Fonsia prides herself on her self-sufficiency as much as Weller does on his. Both are solitary characters who hold themselves apart from the other residents — the porch is their private realm, where some semblance of independence can be asserted.Small and slim though she is, particularly in comparison with Mr. Jones’s commanding presence, Ms. Tyson transmits Fonsia’s poise and rectitude, which reveal themselves in her firm upbraiding of Weller for his foul language. But she also brings a fragility and a warmth to Fonsia that are immensely touching, and when the play’s emotional climax arrives — the only moment when Fonsia turns to Weller for desperately needed solace — Ms. Tyson is utterly heart-rending.Mr. Coburn’s play was first produced on Broadway in 1977, with Jessica Tandy and Hume Cronyn, and revived in 1997 with Julie Harris and Charles Durning. It has also been produced widely at regional theaters and internationally. Having not seen it before, I confess that I was expecting a gauzy depiction of a late-life friendship, full of moist, twinkling moments inspiring “awwws” at the coming together of a pair of old folks in need of companionship.I was glad to discover that Mr. Coburn mostly resists any such patronizing sentimentality. Despite its comic overtones, “The Gin Game” presents a clarifying portrait of the loneliness that may come with age, and the difficulties of forging a relationship when our personalities have quite naturally become calcified by experience. As the moving performances of Mr. Jones and Ms. Tyson bear out, playing the hands we are dealt with equanimity is much easier when we are still sure that there will be many more hands to play.A little known art museum with luminous interiors, established on a struggling socialist kibbutz in the 1930s, has inspired some of the 20th century’s most iconic buildings.IN THE FALL OF 1921, a convoy of 74 young Jewish émigrés arrived in the Valley of Harod, the storied Biblical spring where Gideon, judge of the Israelites, was said to have received the divine counsel that inspired his triumph over the forces of Midian. Traveling in cars, wagons and on horseback, and fleeing the poverty and anti-Semitism of Eastern Europe, the convoy was motivated by the hope of achieving an ideal community, liberated from the pain of the past. For these newcomers, Harod would again be a source of triumph, albeit an artistic one.From the beginning, Ein Harod, one of the first permanent collective agricultural settlements in Palestine, was a socialistic vision meant to reinvent not just Jewish life but the structure of human society itself, recasting traditional gender roles and the distribution of labor. In keeping with the Bolshevism they had seen in the Pale of Settlement, the earliest émigrés called themselves a ‘‘labor battalion,’’ and were determined to realize their revolutionary dream of an equitable, safe and secular community with fierce intensity.The reality was less romantic. In the 1920s the fields of the Jezreel Valley were covered in bushes and rocks, and swarming with mosquitoes. Equally threatening to the community’s survival was its members’ growing disillusionment with the rules and demands of the collective, which many felt subsumed their individual needs. Having abandoned the Orthodox world of the shtetl, the members of Ein Harod were rootless, with nothing but philosophical abstractions to guide them. ‘‘Leaving God behind caused a terrible shock to us all,’’ one member recalled. ‘‘We had to start from scratch and build a civilization from the very foundation. Yet we had no foundation to build on. We had no Ultimate.’’In that void, the denizens of Ein Harod sought solace not in religion but in art. A place where productivity appeared to be the only metric, Ein Harod ultimately celebrated and came to be remembered for all that was subjective, emotional, aesthetic. In 1937, the kibbutz’s leaders established a museum in the heart of their community, first housed in a three-room wooden shed and later in a structure that quietly became a source of inspiration for some of the 20th century’s most prominent architects. From the tranquil exhibition spaces of Louis I. Kahn’s Yale Center for British Art and the careful curving roof of his Kimbell Art Museum in Fort Worth, completed in 1972, to the intimacy of Renzo Piano’s Menil Collection in Houston, traces of Mishkan Le’Omanut can be seen in the type of architecture that, as the self-taught Tadao Ando has put it, uses light to create ‘‘consciousness, an awareness of a larger universal rhythm and balance.’’Today, the use of natural light is a common feature of museum architecture; as the Finnish architect Alvar Aalto wrote, ‘‘what acoustics are for a concert hall, light is for a museum.’’ And yet Mishkan Le’Omanut, which was officially inaugurated in 1948, is one of the earliest examples of a museum that used indirect sunlight with sublime results. Decades later, in the early 1980s, Piano drove north from Jerusalem to the museum at the recommendation of Pontus Hultén, then-director of the Centre Pompidou in Paris, with Dominique de Menil, the Houston philanthropist who had hired him to create a museum to house her collection. As Piano recently told me, he was so moved by the museum’s manipulation of natural light, especially by the use of the cool and constant northern light so often favored by artists for their studios, that the impression of Mishkan Le’Omanut never left him. After completing the Menil Collection in 1987, Piano again focused his attentions on the glass roofing of the Fondation Beyeler near Basel, which he finished in 1997, and in the latticed glass colonnade of his 2013 extension of Kahn’s Kimbell Art Museum. Most recently, in his design for the new Whitney Museum, he created a multistory glass facade that looks north onto the Hudson.But as Piano knows, the appeal of the little kibbutz museum was never only its sunlit rooms. ‘‘Somebody believed that art, culture, knowledge, understanding — this was not secondary, but essential,’’ he said. Indeed, since its founding, the museum has become a kind of parable, a testament to art for art’s sake, and art against all odds. There are few historical precedents, after all, for a community with an oppressive political ideology embracing art for nonpolitical reasons. The unlikeliness of the existence of a homegrown museum on a hardscrabble Eastern European kibbutz makes it all the more poignant a reminder, according to the Israeli historian Anita Shapira, that ‘‘people even in dire straits have this feeling of need to have beauty around them.’’MISHKAN LE’OMANUT was the brainchild of an artist, Chaim Atar, who was also the kibbutz’s baker. Having been allowed to visit Paris twice by the kibbutz leaders in the 1930s, Atar became increasingly influenced by Chaim Soutine, whose expressionistic agitation is clearly discernible in Atar’s own portraiture. For Atar, portraits were essential to Ein Harod’s future museum as a way of restoring to community members their individuality. Unlike the modern New Horizons school of painting that portrayed the Zionist project with bright colors and depictions of the land, Atar’s portraits of the members of Ein Harod disregarded the self-styled heroism of the state of Israel (established in the same year as Mishkan Le’Omanut). When Atar painted the members of his kibbutz, he rendered faces not with Israeli futures but Jewish pasts, marked by trauma and loss — faces notably suspended in darkness, as if to foreground the self above all else.It was Atar’s idea to create in Mishkan Le’Omanut ‘‘an archival storehouse for treasures of the Jewish spirit,’’ from the menorahs he bought in local markets to the cherished family objects members had brought with them from Europe. When Israel’s leaders were urging a collective forgetting of the diaspora experience, the museum became the first venue in the newly established state to present a public exhibition devoted to the Holocaust, with a study of Polish Jewry’s liquidation. Atar’s vision clearly responded to a deep need: In the museum’s early years, Israeli citizens traveled from near and far to see vestiges of their histories shown without elision. A fledgling museum had become a site of memory for a fledgling nation.Driving through the sleepy region of Ein Harod today, it would be easy to miss the museum altogether. From the exterior, the building could be the kibbutz’s cafeteria or a storeroom. Inside, there is a bookshop that sells hardcover volumes from the 1970s, a dusty library with empty desks and a tiny cafe that resembles the kitchen of a studio apartment. And yet, entering the vestibule, you come upon the secular synagogue of Atar’s imagination, a vast sanctuary with steps leading not to the traditional Torah ark but to a set of vitrines showcasing the work of human hands. Today, Mishkan Le’Omanut is a respected exhibition space for local artists, but its true appeal is the ethereal communion of a deceptively simple structure with the white intensity of Israel’s Mediterranean sun.Its architect, Samuel Bickels, was a member of a neighboring kibbutz who had studied architecture in his native Poland, and whose vision — not unlike that of the Bauhaus architects then developing Tel Aviv — was of a ‘‘total work of art,’’ in which form would follow function. Bickels imagined the museum as a place where visitors could put aside the roles they were required to perform in the rigid social structure of the kibbutz — in much the same way that Atar’s portraits were intended to help fellow kibbutzniks remember who, rather than what, they were.But Bickels’s lasting legacy was more technical. Built with humble materials over a decade, the museum is a somewhat awkward string of 14 rooms. To conserve resources, the galleries were left unadorned and painted only in white, the ideal canvas to display both artworks and the sunlight in all its nuanced fluctuations. For those who care about spaces — like Hultén, Piano and countless other international visitors over the decades — the combination of intimate, varied rooms and light sources make for a kind of ur-museum, not grand but perfectly executed. In the central sanctuary, light enters laterally, through tall, opaque windows, but elsewhere it seeps in indirectly, almost invisibly, through intricate ridges in the ceiling that filter solar glare into steady streams that gently roll over the walls. There is no view outside, no organic connection with the immediate surroundings. What Mishkan Le’Omanut offers instead is a departure from context, a temporal escape.The writer Ari Shavit has written that Ein Harod is ‘‘imprinted on every Israeli’s psyche,’’ a microcosm of the Zionist project itself. ‘‘In a sense it is our Source,’’ he writes, ‘‘our point of departure.’’ And yet the often-overlooked museum at its heart is a different kind of symbol, at once more personal and more universal. God may have been banished from Ein Harod, but there, in a humble building on a kibbutz that has seen better days, you experience the Psalmic ideal of being ‘‘enveloped in light,’’ and with it, a reminder of history’s emotional inner life.John Berg, a Grammy-winning art director for Columbia Records who was midwife to some of the most emblematic album covers of the late 20th century — featuring images of Bob Dylan’s backlit corona of hair, the Chicago logo embossed in chocolate and Bruce Springsteen sharing a private joke with the saxophonist Clarence Clemons — died on Sunday in Southampton, N.Y. He was 83.The cause was pneumonia, his wife, Durell Godfrey, said.Mr. Berg, who had never worked on a record album when he joined Columbia in 1961, was responsible in his quarter-century there for more than 5,000 of them, by musicians as diverse as Blood, Sweat & Tears; the Byrds; Lead Belly; Thelonious Monk; Simon and Garfunkel; Bessie Smith; Barbra Streisand; and George Szell.He commissioned covers from some of the foremost artists of the period, including the designer Milton Glaser; the illustrators Paul Davis, Edward Sorel and Tomi Ungerer; and the photographers Richard Avedon, Jerry Schatzberg and W. Eugene Smith.Hallmarks of Mr. Berg’s work included stylistic ecumenicalism, cheeky wit, innovative typography and the frequent use of gatefold covers, in which the album opened like a book and yielded twice as big a canvas for artwork.One of the best-known covers produced under his direction was “Bob Dylan’s Greatest Hits” (1967), which features the backlit photograph, by Rowland Scherman, of Mr. Dylan in performance. In what was often described as the first marketing effort of its kind, the album was packaged with an accompanying poster, commissioned by Mr. Berg and memorably executed by Mr. Glaser, that depicted Mr. Dylan in profile, his hair a mass of brightly colored psychedelic whorls.The design of the album won Mr. Berg one of his four Grammy Awards.Mr. Berg had employed unorthodox packaging for another Dylan album, the two-LP “Blonde on Blonde,” released the year before. Its cover, featuring an immense photo of Mr. Dylan’s face by Mr. Schatzberg and no type, opened vertically to reveal a nearly full-length portrait.“The record would fall out on the floor when you opened it up,” Mr. Berg told The East Hampton Star in 2012. “That was a big selling point.” He added: “Everybody wanted one, because they’d never seen that before.”John Hendrickson Berg was born in Brooklyn on Jan. 12, 1932, and reared there in Flatbush. After graduating from Erasmus Hall High School, where he was a cartoonist for the student newspaper, he earned an undergraduate degree from Cooper Union in Manhattan.Mr. Berg worked for advertising agencies including Doyle Dane Bernbach, and for magazines including Esquire, before joining Columbia as an art director. He was later named creative director, and retired in 1985 as a vice president.At Columbia, Mr. Berg’s job drew not only on his flair for packaging but also on his esteemed eye for selection. Assigned to create a cover for “Born to Run,” he found himself contemplating with distaste the sober posed photograph that Mr. Springsteen had chosen.“Bruce showed me the picture he wanted, which I always describe as ‘John Updike,’ ” Mr. Berg recalled in The East Hampton Star interview. “He looked like an author, one of those back-cover-of-his-book pictures. I asked him to leave the stuff with me and I would go through the contacts.”Sifting the images, by Eric Meola, Mr. Berg came upon one of Mr. Springsteen in a moment of candid intimacy, his face dissolving in mirth as he leaned on Mr. Clemons’s shoulder.With that image, the album’s cover became one of the most totemic of all time. The design proved so widely recognizable that it was imitated, among other places, on the Sesame Street album “Born to Add,” with Muppets replacing men.Mr. Berg’s calling often entailed the discreet art of diplomacy. For “The Barbra Streisand Album,” released in 1963, he needed to persuade Ms. Streisand to approve a photo of her face in shadow. He prevailed, and won a Grammy.It equally entailed knowing when to use little or no photography at all — something he did in a series of albums by Chicago. Their design centered on the group’s cursive logo, which appeared variously carved in wood, worked  in leather, hidden in the loops of a fingerprint, printed on a sepia-toned map and, in “Chicago X” (1976), a Grammy-winning effort for Mr. Berg, molded in chocolate. He had also created the initial design of the logo itself, intended to evoke the script of Coca-Cola.A resident of East Hampton, on Long Island, Mr. Berg was divorced from his first wife, who is now known as Rosamond Bassett. Besides Ms. Godfrey, whom he married in 1982, his survivors include a daughter from his first marriage, Kristina Berg. Lars, a son from his first marriage, died before him.Other album covers created under his direction include Simon and Garfunkel’s “Bridge Over Troubled Water”; Santana’s “Greatest Hits,” featuring a Joel Baldwin photograph of a bare-chested black man holding a white dove; and “Underground,” by Thelonious Monk, for which Mr. Berg won a Grammy.Mr. Berg’s work was the subject of a 2012-13 retrospective at Guild Hall in East Hampton and can be seen in the book “360 Sound: The Columbia Records Story” (2012), by the historian Sean Wilentz.On one occasion, Mr. Berg used his impeccable eye to prepare a dish best served cold. One of Columbia’s artists was Mr. Szell, who in an early collaboration, Mr. Berg recalled, had treated him with the imperiousness for which globe-trotting symphony conductors were often famed.After Mr. Szell’s death in 1970, Columbia rereleased his Beethoven’s Fifth Symphony with the Cleveland Orchestra.“What you do when you are working on dead people is go through the files” in search of a suitable photograph, Mr. Berg explained in a 2013 interview on Cooper Union’s website.What he found, and used on the album’s cover, was a large photo of Mr. Szell, shot full-on. In the image, Mr. Szell’s left hand is raised — fingers spread as if indicating the number 5 — and almost completely obscures his face.LOS ANGELES —  “We got nobody backing us up here. Nothing.”If things go by the script, that line will soon be spoken by the actor John Krasinski in Michael Bay’s movie version of the Sept. 11, 2012, terrorist attack in Benghazi, Libya.But Hillary Rodham Clinton, who was secretary of state when the United States ambassador to Libya, J. Christopher Stevens, was killed in the assault, may be the one feeling exposed.Set for release by Paramount Pictures on Jan. 15, Mr. Bay’s film — called “13 Hours: The Secret Soldiers of Benghazi” — will land just two weeks before party caucuses in Iowa. For audiences across the country, it recalls the most controversial episode of Mrs. Clinton’s tenure as secretary of state, and one her campaign aides have been trying to put behind them, just before the most critical contest in the Democratic presidential contest.An unabashed action movie, “13 Hours” will focus on the heroics of real-life Central Intelligence Agency security contractors who defied orders, and two of whom died, in an attempt to defend a State Department compound and nearby C.I.A. annex in Benghazi.Republican critics of Mrs. Clinton have for years tried to tie what they say was her mismanagement at the State Department to the attack, but that argument has largely been relegated to conservative news media, not a mainstream Hollywood blockbuster.In the new film, Mr. Krasinski, best known for his role in “The Office” television series, plays the contractor Jack Silva, who survived the attack. James Badge Dale, from “World War Z,” plays Tyrone S. Woods, another contractor, who did not.Scenes in the film’s trailer align with a draft from late last year of a script by Chuck Hogan, based on a book by Mitchell Zuckoff. In it, Mr. Hogan does not mention Mrs. Clinton, President Obama or almost any other identifiable Washington official.The film, which is still being edited, is faithful to Mr. Zuckoff’s account and strains to avoid political tilt, said people briefed on its progress who spoke on condition of anonymity because of confidentiality strictures.“While the events have been the subject of continuous heated debate, few have heard or seen the story told from the perspective of these brave men because it has been largely lost amidst the political back and forth,” Erwin Stoff, a producer of the film, said in a statement.In any case, “13 Hours” promises to leave millions of viewers — with his “Transformers” series, Mr. Bay has become one of the world’s most popular filmmakers — pondering uncomfortable questions about Benghazi precisely when the Clinton campaign will be working to put the issue away.“We’re reminders of the sacrifice they’re not prepared to make,” says Mr. Dale’s character, Rone Woods. It is one of several biting lines about the gap between officialdom and those mired in ground truth, this one delivered in a military bull session just before the attack.The Republican-led congressional investigation into the attack in Benghazi led to Mrs. Clinton’s current headaches about her use of a private email server at the State Department, after the committee discovered she had conducted official business exclusively with a private email account. During Tuesday’s Democratic debate in Las Vegas, Senator Bernie Sanders of Vermont, Mrs. Clinton’s closest competitor for the party’s nomination, stood up for her by saying, “The American people are sick and tired about hearing about your damn emails.”Democrats are pushing to shut down the Select Committee on Benghazi, before which Mrs. Clinton is scheduled to testify Oct. 22. Last month, Representative Kevin McCarthy, Republican of California, implied that the purpose of diving into the 2012 attacks on the compound in Libya had been to damage Mrs. Clinton politically.“Everybody thought Hillary Clinton was unbeatable, right?” Mr. McCarthy said in a striking moment of candor the Clinton campaign promptly seized on. “We put together a Benghazi special committee, a select committee. What are her numbers today?”But in the coming months, at least some issues that have figured in the congressional investigation — particularly, whether the State Department provided insufficient protection for Mr. Stevens during a visit to the Benghazi diplomatic compound on the anniversary of the Sept. 11, 2001, attacks — will come alive in movie theaters.“Republicans have already made clear they will use this movie to revive theories discredited by their own party’s investigators to continue their admittedly partisan attacks against Hillary Clinton,” said David Brock, the author of “The Benghazi Hoax” and the founder of Correct the Record, an outside group that defends Mrs. Clinton.“Maybe Hollywood will have better luck creating a conservative fantasy” than congressional Republicans have, he added.A spokesman for the campaign did not respond to a request for comment.One stinging tag line at the end of the script points out that a C.I.A. base chief who tried to delay the security contractors from aiding Mr. Stevens was nonetheless awarded an agency medal. (American officials have said that the C.I.A. security team paused to try to get support from Libyan militia allies.) It fulfills a sarcastic soldierly prediction in the script, made at the height of the action, that the base chief would be rewarded for his poor decisions.Mr. Bay, whose films are known more for heat than enlightenment, has been publicly coy about his own political leanings. “I don’t feel the need to go out and tell people what to believe politically,” he once told an interviewer who tried to build a case in Mother Jones that Bay films like “Armageddon” and “Bad Boys II” carried conservative messaging.Whether “13 Hours” makes an impression will depend partly on whether it can “jump the theaters,” said Christopher Lehane, a political consultant who has worked with the Clintons and helped promote Michael Moore’s “Fahrenheit 9/11.” A political film with impact has to generate “questions from the press and public” and circulate information beyond theatrical viewers, Mr. Lehane said in an email last week.As for the January release of “13 Hours,” the date may have less to do with presidential politics than an attempt by Paramount to capitalize on a seasonal market that has been good to action films in recent years. This year, the big January hit was “Taken 3,” with Liam Neeson; last year, it was “Ride Along,” with Ice Cube and Kevin Hart.Though released in late December 2014, Clint Eastwood’s “American Sniper,” which took in $350 million at the domestic box office, similarly prospered through January with its action-oriented, patriotic message.Martin Luther King’s Birthday “has been a historically great date as evidence by the success of ‘American Sniper’ and ‘Lone Survivor,’ ” a Paramount spokeswoman said.According to one person briefed on the film’s scheduling, Paramount executives briefly considered bumping the release to a date after the Iowa caucuses, but concluded that any delay would simply push it closer to primaries and the general election.To date, Mrs. Clinton has managed to sidestep any damage from several potentially threatening Hollywood projects. An independent biopic about her youthful work on the Watergate investigation and love affair with Bill Clinton stalled, and two Clinton documentaries were put aside by HBO and CNN.David Gordon Green’s “Our Brand Is Crisis,” a Warner Bros. film loosely based on the antics of some old Clinton political consultants who went to work in (and on) Bolivia, changed all the names and airbrushed out the Clinton associations.That leaves “13 Hours,” a film whose heroes find themselves puzzling over what Mr. Stevens was doing in Benghazi, why his State Department protection was so thin\ and where American might was hiding when he, and they, were under fire.“Air support?” says the contractor Kris Paranto, played by Pablo Schreiber, who has appeared in shows like “The Brink” and “Orange Is the New Black.”“That’d be too easy.”Wolfgang Tillmans may be moving toward total transparency in his life and his photography. He is at least trying to get the most out of both.These are two of the big ideas to be extracted from Mr. Tillmans’s enveloping debut exhibition at David Zwirner’s gallery in Chelsea through Oct. 24. It is hardly his first gallery solo show in New York. That occurred in 1994 at the Andrea Rosen Gallery, where he had subsequent exhibitions.But this show is Mr. Tillmans’s first with Mr. Zwirner’s high-octane multinational gallery, and it brims with ambition. It takes advantage of the gallery’s big side-by-side spaces, without being overbearing, or making us wonder how much it cost. (Unlike, say, the Mike Kelley extravaganza one block away at Hauser & Wirth.) It is unusually personal, even for an autobiographical artist, and details what Mr. Tillmans’s work has always implied: Photography has no limits.The show is titled “PCR,” an abbreviation for “polymerase chain reaction,” in molecular biology the technique that finds and multiplies tiny fragments of DNA and is used by crime labs everywhere. This multitudinous metaphor reaffirms that today every photographic image can not only be dispersed everywhere, and be seen by anyone. It can also spur people to take more photographs, creating networks of experiences, feelings and ideas that connect people. This show is one such network.While his previous exhibitions have tended to feel like walk-in magazines, this one feels like an open book of his life during the last few years. Basically, if we walk in knowing nothing about the artist, we learn from looking that he has many friends and special relationships, travels widely, is openly gay and actively political on several fronts. We can infer from “17 Years’ Supply,” a photograph of a cardboard box with scores of prescription bottles, some bearing his name, that he is also living with H.I.V. (Through the gallery, the artist agreed that this inference could be made.)Yet Mr. Tillmans is also a connoisseur of beauty, who has a camera almost always at the ready, whether he is attending a protest in Berlin against the Nigerian extremists Boko Haram or reaching into the red gym shorts of a lover. (He takes us in close to the two men’s bodies — we see no one’s face — while printing the image nearly seven feet across.) He also makes abstractions in the darkroom; goes to the Faroe Islands to see a total eclipse of the sun; and visits his parents, photographing them individually in what seems to be a big studio or office.Mr. Tillmans’s photographs are both documentary and diaristic, romantic and realistic, widely aware yet focused, and always demonstrating the physical ways and means of the medium. The Zwirner show presents around 175 images, ranging in size from snapshot to mural. They are matte or shiny; framed or pinned directly to the wall; chromogenic, inkjet or laser prints.Each says what a photograph inevitably says: I was here. And here. And also here. I was flying over the Sea of Japan when the clouds formed a spiral, and also at lunch when a watermelon was eaten down to the rind. I was in Warszawa Bar in St. Petersburg when Klara put her hand on Anders’s head and they leaned back toward a wall covered in sagging brocade. I was here to take this large photograph of the beautiful rounded form of a reclining man’s naked posterior. It has already been compared to “The Origin of the World”: Gustave Courbet’s small 1866 painting of a reclining woman’s naked pelvis.Mr. Tillmans also visited the great Brazilian architect Oscar Niemeyer when Mr. Niemeyer was as old as the hills and slumped in a wheelchair but still looking fierce and alert. (The artist’s interest in architecture continues in “Book for Architects,” a two-screen slide show of buildings in 37 countries, at the Metropolitan Museum of Art through Nov. 1.)Mr. Tillmans’s attention to physical facts includes, on eight narrow tables, a display of 43 sheets of generic paper (letter-, legal- and ledger-size) that is a study in whites. But the larger fact of living is his chief concern, as suggested by a short double video projection titled “Instrument” that gives the show a coda at once unexpected and right.The instrument in question is Mr. Tillmans’s body. It is seen in one projection from the back, beautiful and fit but soft, wearing only underwear (tighty-whities). He bounces rapidly in place from one foot to the other, to percussive music he programmed from the sound of his footfalls. He’s like a boxer in training, or someone relentlessly determined to get the most out of every second. The second projection shows only his shadow engaged in the same exercise. Disconcertingly, this insubstantial body is slightly out of sync with the fleshly one. It is a ghost, a shade, the specter that drives us all.Lupita Nyong’o, the Oscar winner and radiant darling of red-carpet-watchers, is not really the star of “Eclipsed,” Danai Gurira’s shattering drama about women’s suffering during the Liberian civil wars. Although the character played by Ms. Nyong’o, called only “the Girl” in the program, occupies its dramatic center, Ms. Gurira’s play is not a star vehicle but an ensemble piece, with terrific roles for five women.Nevertheless, it was Ms. Nyong’o’s decision to appear in the play that helped usher it onto the stage of the Public Theater, where it opened on Wednesday night in a riveting, superbly acted production directed by Liesl Tommy.I hope Ms. Nyong’o’s starlight draws audiences to this detailed and painfully moving exploration of the brutality and dehumanization that seem to be endemic to African conflicts. The play illustrates how women and girls are usually the first and most horrifically abused victims of such warfare. Although the events that inspired it took place more than a decade ago, “Eclipsed” remains dispiritingly topical.Set during the waning days of the rebellions that ultimately ousted Charles Taylor, Liberia’s longtime strongman dictator, in 2003, the play takes place in and around the bullet-riddled, barely furnished single room where the “wives” of the commanding officer of a rebel faction are forced to live.They sleep on thin blankets, subsist on erratic arrivals of food and are regularly called to bed by the “C.O.,” as they refer to the rebel leader, who remains unseen. When he approaches the door of their dwelling, fear and anxiety leap into their eyes as they jump to attention, lined up like soldiers, awaiting his choice for sexual service.Helena (Saycon Sengbloh) is the oldest at 25, and has been held in sexual slavery for at least a decade. She’s denoted as “Wife No. 1,” or just “No. 1.” Throughout the play the four central characters refer to one another, and themselves, only by their captor’s designation, a powerful symbol of their dehumanization, and an indication of how deeply a sense of self-alienation has set in.When Rita (Akosua Busia), a member of a respected women’s council working to end the bloodletting, visits their compound, she asks them pointedly what their names are; they are hesitant to answer, perhaps unable to face the recollection of their former lives, now so impossibly distant.As the play begins, Helena and Bessie (Pascale Armand), the pregnant third “wife,” are attempting to keep secret the presence of a young girl, played by Ms. Nyong’o, who has wandered into the camp after fleeing violence in her village. She sleeps under a rubber tub, but when she steps outside she is discovered by the C.O. and immediately raped, becoming another piece of human chattel.Dark though its subject matter is, “Eclipsed” has moments of warmth and even humor, as the women try to buoy one another’s spirits and maintain some modicum of civilization. A running gag — though the term seems frivolous in this context — finds the new arrival reading from a biography of Bill Clinton. The women become engrossed in the scandal surrounding Monica Lewinsky, and naturally refer to her as “Wife No. 2.”The pragmatic Helena, played with graceful warmth and subversive strength by Ms. Sengbloh, is the den mother, who does much of the cooking and helps Bessie, whom Ms. Armand infuses with a frisky rebelliousness, with both her pregnancy and her recalcitrant hair.Helena watches in wary distrust when Maima (a fiercely good Zainab Jah), the second “wife,” arrives bearing a gift of rice. Maima has freed herself from the grasp of the C.O. through the only means possible, by joining the soldiers in battle. She bears herself with a menacing swagger, a machine gun perpetually slung over one shoulder.“Eclipsed” gains dramatic intensity as a moral tug of war takes place between Helena and Maima over Ms. N’Yong’o’s character. Maima encourages the impressionable young woman to follow the path she herself has chosen, thus escaping an endless future of sexual abuse; Helena implores her to resist, fearing both for her life and her conscience. But ultimately promises of escape from repeated rape force her to make a choice whose consequences for her psyche are made achingly clear in Ms. Nyong’o’s tremendously accomplished performance.In the early scenes she’s very much a girl, who speaks with bright eyes and the innocence of youth of someday achieving a career. But gradually she is transformed by her experience out in the field, fighting alongside Maima.In the play’s most searing scene, she admits to Maima with confusion and horror the role she played in the violent serial rape of a young woman after a battle. Ms. Nyong’o delivers this harrowing monologue with a disoriented sense of helplessness and shame that cuts to the bone. And with Maima’s violent, contemptuous reaction to her confession, “Eclipsed” reaches even deeper into the unrelenting darkness in which the women are forced to exist.The superlative performances from all five actors, under Ms. Tommy’s sensitive direction, draw us so deeply into the lives of the women that this darkness nevertheless flickers with glimmers of light, humanity and even hope. At its conclusion that last emotion finally breaks through forcefully, like a piercing shaft of sunlight breaking through a cloudburst.But Ms. Gurira, who is also an accomplished actress (some may know her from “The Walking Dead”) and who has clearly studied the experience of women like these characters thoroughly, knows better than to suggest that the path ahead will be easy. Immediate relief may be near, but the final image, which finds the Girl onstage alone, immobilized by the possibility of another life unfolding, leaves us with the unsettling sense that she cannot even envision a future that could erase the deep scars of the past.Breakin’ Convention It’s odd that New York, where hip-hop and break dancing took form in the 1970s, has had no regular festival of hip-hop dance, the form that gave rise to many of the innovations of our era (Memphis jookin, for example). By contrast, Sadler’s Wells Theater in London has for 13 years been presenting an annual Breakin’ Convention of hip-hop dance theater from across the world. The good news is that New York is now presenting a local edition of the Sadler’s Wells project: The Apollo in Harlem, after an initial season in 2013, has a second this weekend, from Oct. 16-18.José Limón International Dance Festival In the middle of the 20th century, the dancer-choreographer José Limón (1908-72) was in the forefront of American modern dance; his works were elegant pieces of architecture, full of fervor. While the repertories and companies of several of his contemporaries have vanished, his dances and company may still be seen. The Joyce Theater’s two-week Limón Festival is a rare achievement: an assembly of international troupes, each performing one or more of this master’s works. Eleven Limón pieces will be seen, with the Limón company and four other companies (guests, too) dancing them.HarlequinadeThe commedia dell’arte, with its colorful stock character types (Harlequin, Columbine, Pierrot, Pantaloon and others), exerted an influence that pervaded much of European drama, dance, painting and literature from the 16th to the 19th centuries. Yet how well-known was it in America? A friend tells me of a report of the performers John Bill Ricketts and John During playing Harlequin and Pantaloon in the “Harlequin in Philadelphia” around 1795-1800. There must have been others along similar lines, but research yields little evidence.In 1957, things changed when the Italian performer Carlo Mazzone came to the United States. The Dell’Arte school he founded in Blue Lake, Calif., continues today. And in 1965 George Balanchine made his two-act ballet “Harlequinade,” which returns to New York City Ballet repertory for four performances this week. Catch this endearingly innocent work while you can; this year’s revival was the first in 10 years.Silas RienerFew modern dancers inspire the kind of awe that the lithe and sharp Silas Riener does. Most dancers who joined the Merce Cunningham Dance Company worked their way through its Repertory Understudy Group, but Cunningham fast-forwarded Mr. Riener straight into his troupe in 2007 and made him a most remarkable solo in Cunningham’s final work, “Nearly Ninety” (2009), just three months before his death. A friend observed that Mr. Riener’s uncanny backbends suggested he had different vertebrae from other humans.In 2008, Cunningham also coached Mr. Riener in another extraordinary solo (originally made for Jonah Bokaer) in “Split Sides” (2003). Mr. Riener’s complex play of balance and movement made a sensation when, in the Cunningham company’s final month (December 2011), he danced it at the Brooklyn Academy of Music, and a further sensation when a live video was uploaded to YouTube.Next Tuesday, Mr. Riener will become the first dancer since Cunningham himself to perform Cunningham’s long-lost “Changeling” (1957), another singularly challenging solo. This occurs at the Institute of Contemporary Art in Boston as part of its Black Mountain College exhibition; Mr. Riener does a series of further performances of it there, from November to January.And this week Mr. Riener opens a season of his own solo dances, “Blue Name,” at the Chocolate Factory in Long Island City. It runs until Oct. 28.Ratings and running times are in parentheses; foreign films have English subtitles. Full reviews of all current releases: nytimes.com/movies.★ ‘Amy’ (R, 2:08) Asif Kapadia’s shattering biographical portrait of the British singer and songwriter Amy Winehouse traces the arc of her short, messy life from smoky-voiced jazz singer to global pop sensation to her death in 2011, at 27, from alcohol poisoning. This material makes for uneasy viewing, as do some of her agonizing self-portraits, though there’s a great deal more to this documentary than sad spectacle. (Manohla Dargis)‘Black Mass’ (R, 2:02) The story of Whitey Bulger — a notorious Boston crime boss and longtime FBI informant — gets the standard gangster-movie treatment, with a few pungent performances (Johnny Depp as Bulger; Jesse Plemons as one of his henchmen) and a lot of dropped Rs. (A.O. Scott)★ ‘The Black Panthers: Vanguard of the Revolution’ (No rating, 1:56) Stanley Nelson’s documentary traces the rise and fall of the Black Panthers, relying on a rich archive of images and interviews with rank-and-file members of the party. Like all good works of history, this film doesn’t insist on its contemporary relevance, but the echoes of the late 1960s to the time of the Black Lives Matter movement are unmistakable. (Scott)★ ‘A Brilliant Young Mind’ (No rating, 1:51) The film refuses to soft-pedal the infuriating arrogance and coldness of its protagonist (Asa Butterfield), a British math prodigy with autism. More than most films that address the condition, this one shows the amount of patience, understanding and commitment required from caring parents and friends who deal with someone who, however gifted, may appear selfish and unfeeling. (Stephen Holden)‘Coming Home’ (PG-13, 1:49) The director Zhang Yimou reunites with Gong Li, who starred in his great films of the 1980s and ’90s, in this gentle story of a family recovering from the disaster of the Cultural Revolution. It’s a slightly sentimental fable built around a core of almost unbearable pain. (Scott)‘The Creeping Garden’ (No rating, 1:21) Tim Grabham and Jasper Sharp’s uncanny documentary begins as an unhurried look at an outlandish organism that’s neither fish nor fowl nor fungus: the slime mold, which resembles an extraterrestrial colony of polyps and appears here in pulsating, wide-screen close-ups. By examining the mold’s unusual behavioral intelligence, the filmmakers ultimately cultivate a surprising investigation of perception, thought and life itself. (Nicolas Rapold)★ ‘Drunk Stoned Brilliant Dead: The Story of the National Lampoon’ (No rating, 1:32) The history of the satirical magazine looks longingly back at the 1970s, when a smart, tasteless joke could make you laugh out loud without worrying about hurting someone’s feelings or being attacked on social media. Hedonism was in full sway and suffocating political correctness in its infancy. (Holden)‘Everest’ (PG-13, 2:01) A somber 3-D action spectacle, directed by Baltasar Kormakur, about an ill-fated Everest expedition in May, 1996. With Jake Gyllenhaal and Jason Clarke as rival guides leading climbers through the chaos and crowds on top of the world’s tallest mountain. (Scott)‘Freeheld’ (PG-13, 1:36) Julianne Moore and Ellen Page can’t save this botched true story about two lesbians who must fight for their rights when one falls ill. (Dargis)★ ‘Goodnight Mommy’ (R, 1:40) Unspooling with virtually no music and a seriously unsettling sound design, this richly photographed and carefully controlled creep-out (from the Austrian directors Veronika Franz and Severin Fiala) centers on the escalating cruelty of twin boys who come to believe that their mother is an impostor. (Jeannette Catsoulis)★ ‘Grandma’ (R, 1:20) A small marvel. Lily Tomlin plays a cantankerous feminist poet whose pregnant granddaughter (Julia Garner) wants an abortion. Paul Weitz wrote and directed this intimate, heartfelt and extremely funny comedy. With Marcia Gay Harden, Sam Elliott and Judy Greer. (Scott)‘He Named Me Malala’ (PG-13, 1:27) Malala Yousafzai, the Pakistani teenager who was shot by the Taliban in 2012 but has continued to campaign for education for girls, is a familiar face now in the West, especially since winning the Nobel Peace Prize. This documentary about her by Davis Guggenheim, which feels as if it is made for a school-age audience, is content to propagate her message, only intermittently finding the unguarded moments beneath the media image. (Neil Genzlinger)‘Hotel Transylvania 2’ (PG, 1:29) Adam Sandler returns as the voice of Dracula, whose daughter and her human husband (voiced by Selena Gomez and Andy Samberg) have produced a son. While Drac yearns for him to show a vampirish side, the in-laws do not. Conflicts over parenting styles and tedious bits about out-of-touch oldsters ensue. Still, the whole thing is amiable and colorful. It may not kill you to take your kids. (Glenn Kenny)★ ‘Learning to Drive’ (R, 1:29) This small, smart dual portrait of the deepening friendship between a New York book critic (Patricia Clarkson) and her Indian-American driving instructor (Ben Kingsley) belongs to a school of grown-up, low-drama two-handers that doesn’t condescend to characters from different cultures and backgrounds. (Holden)‘Lost in Hong Kong’ (No rating, 1:35, in Mandarin, with English subtitles) A bra designer sustained by memories of his art-school sweetheart takes a bumbling step back into the past in this film directed by and starring Xu Zheng. (Helen Verongos)★ ‘The Martian’ (PG-13, 2:21) Matt Damon stars in Ridley Scott’s space western and blissed-out cosmic high about an American astronaut who, like a latter-day Robinson Crusoe, learns to survive on his own island of despair. Funny, loose and optimistic. (Dargis)‘Maze Runner: The Scorch Trials’ (PG-13, 2:11) The second in a series about a racially diverse but otherwise interchangeable set of teenagers adds nothing new to the unkillable dystopian genre, but it’s at least less ponderous than its predecessor. The many chases and ludicrous narrow escapes offer respectable doses of adrenaline. (John Williams)‘Meet the Patels’ (PG, 1:28) This tidy, easygoing documentary — about the efforts of Indian-born parents to marry off their prosperous son (the actor Ravi Patel) through assorted matchmaking means — is a fascinating, good-humored and sometimes dramatic examination of family dynamics. Though Mr. Patel is on camera most often (shot by his wry, understated foil, sister and co-director, Geeta), it’s his parents and the barely seen Geeta who prove most compelling. (Webster)★ ‘Meru’ (R, 1:30) An ultrasmooth blend of conventional documentary techniques and uncommon ambition, Jimmy Chin and Elizabeth Chai Vasarhelyi’s blindingly beautiful account of two terrifying climbing expeditions on Mount Meru in India pokes at the psychology of extremity and illuminates personalities for whom calculating risk is a way of life. (Catsoulis)‘Mission: Impossible — Rogue Nation’ (PG-13, 2:11) See Tom Cruise run. Run Tom, run — fast and entertainingly. (Dargis)★ ‘Mississippi Grind’ (R, 1:49) Ben Mendelsohn and Ryan Reynolds are delightful to watch as a pair of gamblers traveling from Iowa to New Orleans in search of the big score in this leisurely, sharply observed road picture, directed by Ryan Fleck and Anna Boden. (Scott)★ ‘Mistress America’ (R, 1:24) Noah Baumbach’s movie advertises itself as a screwball comedy, but it is not really the zany, lighter-than-air divertissement that the term usually conjures. It would be more accurate to describe the smart, fast-paced film (with a sensational lead performance by Greta Gerwig) as a movie that revises and subverts this most buoyant of genres with a steady undertow of anxiety, dread and anger. (Holden)★ ‘The New Girlfriend’ (R, 1:49) By turns mischievous, sentimental, subversive and silly, this seriocomic is an exploration of cross-dressing, gender fluidity and desire. Written and directed by the French filmmaker François Ozon, the movie suggests the career-opening salvo of a cheeky cinematic enfant terrible and not the work of an old hand with well over a dozen features behind him. But that’s one of Mr. Ozon’s trademarks; he makes everything old feel new and fresh. (Holden)★ ’99 Homes’ (R, 1:52) In this powerful parable of predatory capitalism, directed by Ramin Bahrani (“Chop Shop”), Michael Shannon is demonically charismatic as Rick Carver, a ruthless Florida real estate broker whose specialty is evictions and foreclosures. Andrew Garfield plays Dennis Nash, a construction worker who starts out as one of Rick’s victims and winds up his right-hand man. The movie is as fast-moving and tense as any thriller; it’s a crime story with a man’s soul at stake. (Scott)★ ‘Pawn Sacrifice’ (PG-13, 1:56) The director Edward Zwick serves up an absorbing dramatization of the 1972 chess match between Bobby Fischer and Boris Spassky, with Tobey Maguire playing the eccentric Fischer, who struggled with demons real and imagined as the world watched the Cold War proxy showdown. The film is only partly about Fischer; it’s also about our dismaying tendency to place too much importance on chess matches, sporting events and so on, regardless of the human cost. (Genzlinger)‘The Perfect Guy’ (PG-13, 1:40) Michael Ealy is the creep and Sanaa Lathan is the woman who can’t get rid of him in this generic stalker movie. Mr. Ealy developed a convincing vacant stare when he played a humanoid police officer on television in “Almost Human,” and he employs it to chilling effect here, but the story goes exactly where you expect. (Genzlinger)★ ‘Queen of Earth’ (No rating, 1:30) A sensational Elisabeth Moss plays a woman who visits her ostensible best friend (Katherine Waterston, very fine) in a teasing, sometimes brutalizing story that’s about friendship but is also about art film, crazy women and the male directors (like Alex Ross Perry) who love them. (Dargis)‘Shanghai’ (R, 1:45) The convoluted plot of this period espionage thriller from Mikael Hafstrom seems to promise an early death by exposition in the first 20 minutes, although the fact that the story begins in October 1941, and that John Cusack plays a naval intelligence operative ought to clue most viewers in on where it’s going. The spectacular international cast, including the Asian film legends Chow Yun-Fat and Gong Li, bring a lot of life to the movie’s uncooperative story material. (Kenny)‘Sicario’ (R, 2:01) Emily Blunt plays an FBI agent caught up in nefarious doings on the United States-Mexico border in this violent fable, directed by Denis Villeneuve. Brutal and suspenseful, the film almost lives up to its potential to transcend the usual genre machinery and reveal some of the deep moral ambiguities of the drug war. (Scott)‘Sleeping With Other People’ (R, 1:40) Jason Sudeikis and Alison Brie play romantically challenged friends whose hang-ups get in the way of their coupledom in Leslye Headland’s would-be screwball comedy, which lacks both jokes and emotional texture. (Dargis)‘Steve Jobs: The Man in the Machine’ (R, 2:07) Alex Gibney’s trenchant documentary evaluates the man behind the legend, charting Mr. Jobs’s extraordinary record of marketing and innovation, but also presenting a merciless anatomy of a complicated public character. Packed with details and incisive interviews, his film elucidates a cultural technological landscape that is too often taken for granted. (Rapold)‘Stonewall’ (R, 2:09) Roland Emmerich’s would-be epic film about the seminal flash point in the gay liberation movement in 1969, is far from the first historical movie to choke on its own noble intentions. (Holden)‘Straight Outta Compton’ (R, 2:22) F. Gary Gray’s exultant rap-to-riches story tracks the group N.W.A., who — with beats, smarts, corrosive poetry and powerful rhetoric — helped introduce gangster rap to an alternately freaked-out and receptive world. It’s a story of ultimate outsiders turned ultimate insiders, which makes it as blissfully American as apple pie, low riders and gangster rap itself. (Dargis)★ ‘Taxi’ (No rating, 1:22) Shot almost entirely with a dashboard-mounted video camera, Jafar Panahi’s latest film — his third since the Iranian government banned him from practicing his craft in 2010 — is a wry meditation on the slippery boundary between movies and reality and a pointed work of social criticism. What seems like a random series of encounters turns out to be an elegantly shaped and poignant parable of modern urban life. (Scott)‘This Changes Everything’ (No rating, 1:29) Sacrificing depth and political sophistication, Avi Lewis’s wide-ranging climate-change documentary (inspired by Naomi Klein’s 2014 book of the same name) presents a Panglossian view of approaching disaster by focusing on a bottom-up environmentalism of regular folks fighting irregular circumstances. (Catsoulis)★ ‘Time Out of Mind’ (No rating, 1:57) Oren Moverman’s film observes the drifting life of George Hammond, a middle-aged homeless man played with heartbreaking reserve by Richard Gere. There is a whisper of a story involving George’s attempt to re-establish contact with his daughter, but Mr. Moverman is more interested in the moods and rhythms of life on the margins. Ben Vereen, as George’s sometime friend, adds a necessary jolt of lively, impatient wit. (Scott)★ ‘Trainwreck’ (R, 2:04) Here, the comic Amy Schumer plays a more vanilla version of one of her comically flawed women, who aren’t as remotely together as they think. The movie was directed by Judd Apatow from Ms. Schumer’s script, and is often extremely funny, even if it never approaches the radicalness of her best work. (Dargis)‘The Visit’ (PG-13, 1:34) A “Hansel and Gretel” redo for Generation Selfie, M. Night Shyamalan’s latest tracks a brother and sister into the woods, except this time they’re holding camcorders. Squeaking doors, creaking floors and some nice boos ensue. (Dargis)★ ‘The Walk’ (PG, 2:03) Think of the sometimes irritating first hour as a vaudevillian warm-up act, with the song-and-dance man Joseph Gordon-Levitt doing his best to entertain you with circus tricks and a French accent. He’s playing Philippe Petit, whose high-wire walk between the towers of the World Trade Center in 1974 is the subject of Robert Zemeckis’s uneven but ultimately enthralling new film. Once Petit and his co-conspirators arrive in New York, the movie becomes a wondrous and charming daredevil act of its own, as Mr. Zemeckis uses his mastery of digital techniques to turn a fondly remembered stunt into a thrilling and touching caper. (Scott)‘A Walk in the Woods’ (R, 1:44) In this low-impact amble through hill, dale and cinematic nostalgia, two crusty trekkers (Robert Redford and Nick Nolte) are pushed by age and intimations of mortality. Though the movie largely refuses to tackle anything weightier than creaking bones and resilient libido, it is unexpectedly moving to spend time with these titans of cinema as they walk and sometimes wobble, delivering words that become meaningful because they’re lucky enough to be spoken by Mr. Redford and Mr. Nolte. (Dargis)Film SeriesConsequences (Fridays through Dec. 18) Truth be told, this overarching theme for the Rubin Museum of Art’s latest Cabaret Cinema series is fairly accommodating. With the occasional exception of the Coen brothers at their most fatalistic, what other filmmaker would claim that their onscreen actions have no reactions? Still, the museum (which has an accompanying series of public talks about karma) has assembled some fairly instructive examples, ranging from the obvious (“The Blue Angel,” “Le Jetée”) to the less so (“Night of the Living Dead”). This week’s offering is “Badlands” (1974), starring Martin Sheen, Sissy Spacek and Warren Oates. At 9:30 p.m., 150 West 17th Street, Chelsea, 212-620-5000, rubinmuseum.org. (Grode)‘Frederick Wiseman’s New York’ (Friday through Sunday, and through Nov. 7) Not every city is enamored of Mr. Wiseman and his small-bore investigations into the workings and nuances of modern society: The governor of Massachusetts tried to ban the release of “Titicut Follies” back in 1967, and Mr. Wiseman opted not to screen “High School” in Philadelphia, where he filmed it, for fear of being sued. But New York City has welcomed him and his discerning eye repeatedly over the last 45 years. Museum of the Moving Image will screen seven of the results, with subjects ranging from Metropolitan Hospital (“Hospital” on Saturday) to Central Park (“Central Park” on Oct. 25). Mr. Wiseman will appear on Oct. 28 to show clips from his ninth New York film, “In Jackson Heights,” which opens in theaters on Nov. 4. 35th Avenue at 37th Street, Astoria, Queens, 718-784-0077, movingimage.us. (Eric Grode)‘Local Color: The Short Films of Dustin Guy Defa’ (Wednesday through Oct. 20) Film Society of Lincoln Center shifts the short film status from amuse bouche to main course with this quintet of droll, unexpectedly moving snapshots. Mr. Defa’s harrowing “Family Nightmare” uses VHS-era home movies to turn both dysfunctional-family melodrama and found-footage cinema on their ears. Slightly longer narrative works like “Lydia Hoffman Lydia Hoffman” and the terrific “Person to Person” explore the destabilizing influences of house guests. And “Declaration of War” somehow turns George W. Bush’s post-9/11 appearance in front of Congress into one of those shaggy-dog jokes that starts out funny, then becomes less funny, then inexplicably becomes funny again. Elinor Bunin Munroe Film Center, Lincoln Center, 144 West 65th Street, 212-875-5600, filmlinc.com. (Grode)‘Rocco and His Brothers’ (Friday through Oct. 29) It’s impossible to imagine Italian Neo-Realists like Roberto Rossellini finding common cause with the freewheeling likes of Michelangelo Antonioni and Federico Fellini a generation later. But Luchino Visconti made the leap with this 1960 synthesis of everyone from Dostoyevsky to Thomas Mann to Arthur Miller. Giuseppe Rotunno’s cinematography turns practically every frame into a postcard of Milan in all its corrupting allure, but even with this 1960 film’s new restoration, there’s nothing arch or manicured about the displaced, roiling Parondi clan at its center. Darting up and down (but mostly down) the city’s social strata, Luchino Visconti created a textured, operatic masterpiece with “Rocco,” his personal favorite film and one whose volatile family dynamics are still evident in movies more than 50 years later. Film Forum, 209 West Houston Street, west of Avenue of the Americas, South Village, 212-727-8110, filmforum.org. (Grode)Stranger Than Fiction  (Tuesdays, through Nov. 24) This series has served for the last decade as a vital New York outpost for award-winning documentaries from such nonfiction heavyweights as D.A. Pennebaker and Albert Maysles. This week’s offering is Chad Gracia’s “The Russian Woodpecker,” winner of this year’s Grand Jury Prize for World Cinema at the Sundance Film Festival, about the Ukrainian artist Fedor Alexandrovich’s investigation of a mysterious radio antennas near the Chernobyl disaster site. At 8 p.m., 323 Avenue of the Americas, at Third Street, Greenwich Village; 212-924-7771, ifccenter.com. (Grode)‘Theater & Cinema’  (Tuesdays, through Oct. 27) When a film is referred to as “stagebound,” it’s usually not a compliment. The implication is a series of lengthy, moth-eaten interior scenes interspersed with equally forced attempts to “open up” the action. But French Institute Alliance Française’s latest CinéSalon series shifts the focus to the (mostly male) directors and (mostly female) performers who create theater pieces. It began on Sept. 22 with Roman Polanski’s racy “Venus in Fur” and continues with backstage glimpses from the likes of Francois Truffaut (“The Last Metro,” on Oct. 27) and Arnaud Desplechin (“Esther Kahn,” playing this Tuesday). At 4 and 7:30 p.m., Florence Gould Hall, 55 East 59th Street, Manhattan, 800-982-2787, fiaf.org. (Grode)‘What Lies Beneath: The Films of Robert Zemeckis’  (through Oct. 18) First things first: The Oct. 3 “Back to the Future” marathon came a full 18 days too early. (Marty McFly is transported all the way forward to Oct. 21, 2015, in the second film.) Other than that, though, the timing seems apt to pay tribute to Mr. Zemeckis, whose focus on motion-capture technologies on films like “The Polar Express” and “Beowulf” anticipated by years some of Hollywood’s best and worst tendencies. This retrospective goes way back to the decidedly nondigital comedies “I Wanna Hold Your Hand” and “Used Cars,” but coincides with the release of his latest work, “The Walk,” a recreation of Philippe Petit’s 1974 tightrope walk between the World Trade Center towers, starring Joseph Gordon-Levitt. Museum of Modern Art Roy and Niuta Titus Theaters, 212-708-9400, moma.org. (Grode)Susan Wagner is moving out. Frederick Douglass is moving in.A new art collection with ethnically varied roots is arriving this week at Gracie Mansion, the mayoral residence of New York City, in an effort to represent groups that have had little or no presence in the décor of the house over the years. The additions are the result of a collaboration between scholars and Mayor Bill de Blasio and his wife, Chirlane McCray, who are seeking to live among objects with powerful narratives.Evidence of past first families of New York and other elite New Yorkers is giving way to documents, paintings, textiles and ceramics from the late 1700s and early 1800s related to escaped slaves, Chinese artisans, women and Jewish, Italian and Irish immigrants.Kalia M. Brooks, the consulting curator for the Gracie Mansion Conservancy, chose about 50 pieces to borrow from local institutions in time for the house’s Oct. 25 reopening to the public. (The public areas have been closed for about 18 months, and the exterior has been engulfed in netting and scaffolding for restoration work during part of the first year of Mr. de Blasio’s tenancy.)“Mrs. Wagner is briefly going to meet Frederick Douglass,” Ms. Brooks said while giving a preview Tuesday. She was referring to a canvas portrait on the parlor wall of Susan Wagner, the delicate-looking blond wife of Robert F. Wagner, mayor from 1954 to 1965, that is to be removed, and the incoming print depicting the snowy-haired escaped slave. Alongside Douglass’s portrait will hang one of Henry Bibb, an abolitionist who, like Douglass, had a white father, fled a plantation and became an acclaimed author.Ms. Brooks said that she coordinated with Mr. de Blasio and Ms. McCray for the new installation, which includes a poster from 1809 protesting prejudice against Irish Catholics. A sampler from the 1840s was stitched by Sarah Ricks, a student at Colored Public School No. 3 in Brooklyn. Miniatures of the prosperous black Toussaint family (circa 1825), attributed to Anthony Meucci, an immigrant from Rome, are headed for a ground-floor corridor.The displays also include a Sephardic Jewish couple’s marriage certificate; Chinese export porcelain; food storage vessels by the black ceramist Thomas W. Commeraw; portraits of street peddlers; slave manumission papers; and Native American beads, pottery and a tomahawk.The transformation of Gracie Mansion is part of a nationwide trend at cultural institutions to focus on voices long unheard; numerous house museums, for instance, are restoring servant and slave quarters and bringing out related artifacts. In Manhattan, the Merchant’s House Museum has opened its top-floor former servants’ quarters to the public, and several Long Island estates are emphasizing the family slaves who made the owners’ luxurious lives possible.The freshly borrowed antiques at Gracie are distributed in formal rooms awash in floral upholstery, gilded mirrors, carved mantelpieces, wallpaper with scenes of aristocrats frolicking and crystal light fixtures. Portraits remain of the Gracie family, which built the house in the 1790s, and whose descendants eventually supported the Confederacy. Among the objects being returned to lending institutions or put into storage, in addition to Mrs. Wagner’s portrait, are a grayish Dutch armoire and paintings of landscapes, street scenes and smokestacks by artists as prominent as Maurice Prendergast.For one parlor, Ms. Brooks has brought in a Brooklyn scene, about eight feet wide, painted around 1820 by Louisa Ann Coleman. The audaciously large piece, Ms. Brooks said, suits a house with a strong personality.“There’s nothing subtle about this space,” she said.In a nearby room, recordings will play of actors reciting the chants of early New York street peddlers. “It’s going to add a level of audibility” to the installation’s tributes to the laborers who built the city’s economy, she said.Paul Gunther, the executive director of the Gracie Mansion Conservancy, said that the changes were appropriate to a residence that had changed with every administration. The new collection, he said, “fits seamlessly into a house that’s all about transition anyway.”The Philadelphia Orchestra, which made its first, electric Carnegie Hall appearance of the season on Tuesday under the dynamic leadership of Yannick Nézet-Séguin, currently presents a paradox.Financial issues continue to trouble the orchestra, as the lingering effects of bankruptcy, which it left in 2012, unravel themselves. The distant threat of a players’ strike was averted on Monday when they agreed to a one-year contract. The pact gives the instrumentalists a small pay increase and a slightly enlarged roster but offers scant security over the longer term.Yet it might be that no American orchestra sounds more alive. Mr. Nézet-Séguin, who recently signed a deal that lasts until 2022, has his players hanging on his every move — and his every balletic move counts.In Grieg’s Suite No. 1 from “Peer Gynt,” he had little to do but lacquer up an alluring sheen, with the brass craggy and ghoulish for “In the Hall of the Mountain King,” the strings shimmering, almost sensual in “The Death of Ase.” He worked harder and achieved his characteristic intensity of attack in Bartok’s Violin Concerto No. 2, in which Gil Shaham proved a controlled, eloquent soloist more than capable of balancing wistfulness and regret, anger and hope. Mr. Shaham’s encore, the “Gavotte en rondeau” from Bach’s E major Partita, rightly had an improvisatory, joyful feel.Mr. Nézet-Séguin approached Sibelius’s Symphony No. 5 as a colorist, one unusually concerned with warm yellows and reds. Other conductors more assertively draw out the composer’s disjunctive phrases and his piling up of rhythmic and harmonic tension, whether with the immaculate drive of Osmo Vanska or the deconstructive glee of Esa-Pekka Salonen. But this was no modernist reading, rather a brashly powerful one. A fluent, triumphant sweep didn’t hide insistent detailing, particularly in the woodwinds and the lower strings, but it did put smoothness, and a pristine cultivation of hue, first.That’s the worry: that this team is being seduced by its own sound, hiding a distinct lack of ideas behind fabled Philadelphia traditions. Rather than treating its Carnegie appearances as a platform for invention that might be thought risky on home turf, the orchestra’s four programs this season are so nostalgic they would make Leopold Stokowski blush: Just 12 minutes of those concerts will be devoted to music written after that magician left Philadelphia in 1941.Good thing the performances are, for the moment at least, inspirational.One of the better television series that you probably haven’t made time for is WGN’s “Manhattan,” a show about the Manhattan Project, which produced the atom bombs dropped on Japan to end World War II. It returns for its second season on Tuesday, Oct. 13, at 9 p.m., the bomb still a ways from completion but the intrigues and moral dilemmas thick in the air.The series focuses on the scientists cloistered at Los Alamos, N.M., and their families, a perfect laboratory for human drama. There is marital strife, there is spying, there are characters who aren’t what they seem. It’s as well acted and intriguingly plotted as any of TV’s period dramas, and in Season 2 it adds even more talent to the cast: Mamie Gummer turns up playing a member of the Women’s Army Corps, and Griffin Dunne appears as a newspaper reporter who somehow worms his way into Los Alamos.Hanging over all of the little dramas has been the Big Question, which came more sharply into focus as Season 1 progressed: the ethical implications for these characters of working on a project that could let a planet-jeopardizing genie out of its bottle.Season 2, Episode 1, “Chapter Twenty-Three”During the first season of “Jane the Virgin,” one of the show’s biggest strengths was its deftness in combining a warm, heartfelt tone with the occasionally silly melodrama of a telenovela.Any fears that the writers would mess with a winning formula were put to rest within the first seconds of Season 2 on Monday, in which our endearing narrator (Anthony Mendez) catches us up, in rapid-fire fashion, on everything that happened last season. The insemination, the breakups and rekindled romances, the plastic surgery ring and finally, the birth of Jane’s son — who immediately gets kidnapped.Taken in all at once, it’s almost overwhelming, and things got even more convoluted in the first half of the season premiere on Monday. But what made “Chapter Twenty-Three” successful is that, true to form, it used over-the-top theatricality and twists to explore more relatable emotional terrain: namely, the anxieties that come with being a new mother.Such sensitivity is the key to “Jane the Virgin”: Plots that could be fantastical train wrecks in the hands of lesser writers are actually strong, sensible and thoroughly entertaining here.Well “sensible” is perhaps not exactly accurate — there’s plenty of ridiculousness propelling the series. But it’s a charming, self-aware ridiculousness that also serves the broader narrative.Fortunately — and intelligently — the writers quickly deal with Mateo’s kidnapping instead of stretching it out over multiple episodes. It turns out he was kidnapped by Rose (Sin Rostro!) in a convoluted scheme to retrieve a special brooch that she thinks has been locked up in a police department evidence room.Of course it isn’t really in the evidence room, a revelation that inspired plenty of funny theatrics from Jane and friends. Rather, Luisa still has it — at least she does until Jordan, her “new squeeze,” throws it out the window toward the pool. A mad dash ensues, and Jane finally finds the brooch. Through Nadine (Michael’s ex-partner/lover and a current associate of Sin Rostro), Rose gets her pin back while Jane gets her son back.With the speedy resolution of the kidnapping, the writers avoided the overdone drama of a child-snatching subplot, instead using it to launch the next phase of the story. The brooch, we learn, is not a simple fashion accessory. It contains a drive that includes images of all the faces, new and old, of every criminal that Sin Rostro altered. For Michael, it represents a test of sorts — will he keep the brooch and use it to catch Sin Rostro, serving both his career prospects and his personal lust for revenge?The larger point of the kidnapping caper, however, was to set up a simpler, more sympathetic plot: Jane’s struggle to adjust to motherhood.Having your child kidnapped the day he’s born isn’t a common occurrence, of course, but what follows in the episode is. Jane is having a hard time getting Mateo to breast-feed, even with the help of everyone’s advice and a lactation class. She gets increasingly frustrated — the fact that Mateo lost weight doesn’t help — because she worries that his failure to latch means she might not be a good mother. Jane thinks her problem could be traumatic stress — you know, like the kind that comes from having your newborn kidnapped by a supervillain — and that her son will never be able to bond with her.We’re not worried — Jane, one of the sweetest characters on television, is going to be a terrific mother. But the breast-feeding issue leads her to fret more broadly about her maternal instincts: Does she have them? Can she somehow get them? In a great surprise, it’s Rafael who figures out the problem, and, in turn, figures out how to feel a bit more at home within the close-knit family.This being “Jane the Virgin,” the quieter story of domestic angst unfolded, in classic telenovela fashion, alongside a more garish one. “Chapter Twenty-Three” also saw the greater public, including the nuns who once fired her, finally discover Jane’s virgin birth, which leads them to put her on a holy pedestal. Jane is suddenly famous and thrust into the spotlight — spurring guilt in Rogelio, though he tries to use his expertise to help her — with people believing that she’s the second coming of the Virgin Mary. One woman claims Jane’s hug is the reason she herself was able to conceive eventually. (This was all bound to happen at some point, and I’m glad that the series is getting it out of the way now.)The religious spectacle and maternal woes were reconciled in a perfect “Jane the Virgin” fashion, with Jane confronting the nun and promptly beginning to lactate in front of everyone. It is a moment of triumph, rather than embarrassment. In a season premiere full of melodramatic twists, the most memorable moment came from a mother’s humble victory. (Well, either that or the fact that Petra used a turkey baster to try and impregnate herself with Rafael’s semen.)As the violinist Malcolm Goldstein played on Tuesday evening at Artists Space Books & Talks, silhouettes of his gyrating, swaying body provided a dramatic visual complement to his performance, a tribute to Ornette Coleman, the avant-garde jazz musician who died in June at 85.According to the critic Howard Mandel, “Ornette didn’t play free jazz, what he did was he freed jazz.” Coleman, who played violin, trumpet and alto saxophone, looked beyond traditional harmonic rules, chord patterns and the American Songbook repertoire. He was skeptical of standard Western harmony and believed that even if musicians in an ensemble were playing in different keys, the overall result could be harmonious. He also stretched boundaries while writing for players of other genres, exploring his ideas about harmony and structure outside the jazz sphere. In the 1980s he collaborated with Mr. Goldstein, who is 79 and was presented here by Issue Project Room.In his similarly unorthodox career, Mr. Goldstein has developed unusual techniques and worked extensively on improvisation. The program opened with one of his “Soundings” improvisations: Flutterings, whispers, squeaks, scrapes, trills and long brush strokes made for an intriguing aural collage, with sounds ranging from delicate and ethereal to harsh and grating.In “Gentle Rain Proceeding Mushrooms,” a homage to John Cage, Mr. Goldstein vocalized as he repeated a pattern on his instrument that evoked a gentle patter of raindrops, pointing out to the audience afterward that the C major and A minor chords spelled C-A-G-E. A more lyrical line emerged in “My feet is tired, but my soul is rested,” inspired by a Rosa Parks quotation. The highlight of the concert was “Trinity,” a suite of pieces that Coleman composed for Mr. Goldstein in 1985.Mr. Goldstein played it as a duo, partnering with a recording of himself performing the work. The lyrical lines of the recording were colorfully juxtaposed with his unpredictable live interjections, improvisatory flights and pitch-bending modulations, proving Coleman’s theory that seemingly conflicting keys and patterns can prove unexpectedly compatible.For news about comedy, including critical commentary: nytimes.com/arts. A searchable guide to these and other shows is at nytimes.com/events.★ ‘The Andy Kaufman Award’ (Sunday) This annual award celebrates quirky comedic talent “in the spirit” of Andy Kaufman; past winners include Reggie Watts and Kristen Schaal. This year, Elayne Boosler hosts, and the finalists are Alison Rich, Ana Fabrega, Ben Kronberg, Brett Davis, Jim Hickox, Jo Firestone, Julio Tores and Nathan Barnatt. At 7:30 p.m., Upright Citizens Brigade Theater East, 153 East Third Street, East Village, 212-366-9231, east.ucbtheatre.com; sold out, but there will be a standby line. (Elise Czajkowski)Kyle Dunnigan  (Friday) A writer for Comedy Central’s “Inside Amy Schumer,” Mr. Dunnigan recently won an Emmy for the song “Girl You Don’t Need Makeup” that appeared in one of the show’s sketches. On stage, his charismatic stand-up is a mix of storytelling, impressions and music. At 8 p.m., Highline Ballroom, 431 West 16th Street, Chelsea, 212-414-5994, highlineballroom.com. (Czajkowski)★ Cameron Esposito (Friday) Ms. Esposito is widely regarded as one of the rising stars on the stand-up scene for her politically progressive comedy and focus on modern LGBT issues — her 2014 album was titled “Same Sex Symbol.” She’ll be joined here by the comedian Rhea Butcher. At 8 p.m., Gramercy Theater, 127 East 23rd Street, Gramercy, 212-614-6932, venue.thegramercytheatre.com. (Czajkowski)Bobcat Goldthwait  (Friday and Saturday) Still known to many for the hyper-energetic stage persona he adopted in the 1980s, Mr. Goldthwait has re-emerged in recent years as a thoughtful, politically minded stand-up. Friday at 8:30 and 10:30 p.m., Saturday at 8, 10 and 11:45 p.m., Gotham Comedy Club, 208 West 23rd Street, Chelsea, gothamcomedyclub.com, 212-367-9000. (Czajkowski)‘Haunting Renditions: Live with Eliot Glazer’  (Wednesday) Mr. Glazer hosts this night of comically dark takes on sugary pop tunes. His guest is the comedian Michelle Collins, a co-host on “The View.” At 8:30 p.m., the Bell House, 149 Seventh Street, Gowanus, Brooklyn, 718-643-6510, thebellhouseny.com. (Czajkowski)‘Kapow-i GoGo Marathon!’  (Sunday) Madeleine Bundy stars as Kapow-i GoGo, a teenage girl on a cartoon-and-video-game-inspired adventure to save the world many times over. The three-part, nine-episode epic will be shown in one marathon session. At 1 p.m., Peoples Improv Theater, 123 East 24th Street, Manhattan, 212-563-7488, thepit-nyc.com. (Czajkowski)★ Josie Long: ‘Cara Josephine’  (Wednesday and Thursday, and through Oct. 25) A gem of the British comedy scene, Ms. Long is a stand-up and storyteller who dwells in earnestness and optimism. “Cara Josephine,” the best-reviewed comedy show at last year’s Edinburgh Fringe Festival, is a sweet and very funny hour about relationships, love and family. Wednesday and Thursday at 9 p.m., SoHo Playhouse, 15 Vandam Street, South Village, 212-691-1555, sohoplayhouse.com. (Czajkowski)★ New York Musical Improv Festival  (Thursday through Oct. 18) Now in its seventh year, this annual festival celebrates the comedic tightrope walk that is musical improv. Troupes from around the country, including Chicago’s much-loved Baby Wants Candy, perform over four nights. Shows begin at 7 p.m. on Thursday and next Friday, and at 5 p.m. on Oct. 17-18, Magnet Theater, 254 West 29th Street, Chelsea, 212-244-8824, nymif.com. (Czajkowski)‘The Talent Show’  (Tuesday) Elna Baker and Kevin Townley host this ever-changing variety show, with each edition based on a different idea. This month’s theme is “Mysteries of the Unknown,” and performers include Jon Ronson, Hanna Cheek, Maeve Higgins, Jason Kane, Georgia Stitt, Dave Hill, Joel Kim Booster and MC Frontalot. At 9:30 p.m., Joe’s Pub, 425 Lafayette Street, Astor Place, 212-539-8778, joespub.com. (Czajkowski)Matt Mitchell“Vista Accumulation” (Pi Recordings)The final track on the pianist Matt Mitchell’s rigorous, exhausting-but-worth-it new album, “Vista Accumulation,” sprawls to an eventful 12½ minutes, and feels at times as if it might never run out of steam. Its title is “The Damaged Center,” which could be a jab at the idea of a recognizable jazz mainstream — or a nod to its own destabilized core.What it conveys about Mr. Mitchell is his fondness for pressurized tensions, especially the one between intricate form and extemporaneous license. Over the last five or six years, he has been a crucial partner for composer-bandleaders in this vein: He appears on four excellent jazz albums this year, by Tim Berne, Rudresh Mahanthappa, Dave Douglas and Darius Jones. (One of these, Mr. Mahanthappa’s “Bird Calls,” was named best album in the DownBeat Critic’s Poll.)But Mr. Mitchell’s advanced vocabulary as a pianist seems almost like an afterthought on “Vista Accumulation,” which plays out across two discs, and might best be experienced with a brief intermission. The album features a superacute quartet with Chris Speed on tenor saxophone and clarinet, Chris Tordini on bass and Dan Weiss on drums, and Mr. Mitchell’s writing puts them through their paces. Even in its quieter stretches, like most of “Hyper Pathos” and the album’s opener, “Select Your Existence,” the music simmers with deep intensity.With an average length of 12 minutes, these tracks resemble miniature epics, conforming to no clear standard of repetition. Instead, Mr. Mitchell’s playbook leans on long thematic arcs, slithery polytonality, rhythmic caginess and a chamber-like internal logic that carries over to the practice of group improvisation. Even when the action gets prickly, it doesn’t feel arbitrary.Mr. Speed is key to this equilibrium: His output is expressive and hale, with a breathy blur that nicely offsets the weblike precision of Mr. Mitchell’s lines. “Wearing the Wig of Atrophy” begins as a splintered-funk confrontation featuring Mr. Speed on tenor saxophone; by song’s end, he has switched to clarinet, joining the rest of the band in a balladic section that evokes the sensation of walking slowly into a darkened room, waiting for the eyes to adjust.Full reviews of recent dance performances: nytimes.com/dance. A searchable guide to these and other performances is at nytimes.com/events. A.O. Movement Collective  (through Saturday) For the past three years, Sarah A. O. Rosner has created a kind of gay feminist sci-fi utopia with the help of more than 60 collaborators. Together they have produced a graphic novel, a concept album, a fashion show and more. This week adds another dimension (the 10th) to their universe. In “Etle and the Anders,” a cast of 10 conjures a future based on Ms. Rosner’s “Infinite Theory of the Plural History of Everything,” which she recites. Don’t expect to be passive observers. Friday at 7:30 at 10 p.m., Saturday at 7:30 p.m., Loft 172, 172 Classon Avenue, between Park and Myrtle Avenues, Clinton Hill, Brooklyn, 347-915-4790, etle.info. (Brian Schaefer)★ ‘A Ballerina’s Tale’ (in conversation Monday, in theaters Wednesday) In the past year, Misty Copeland has graced the cover of Time magazine, became a popular face of the athletic brand Under Armour and, most significantly, became the first African-American woman to be named a principal dancer at American Ballet Theater. The new documentary, “A Ballerina’s Tale,” recounts her remarkable journey. On Monday, Ms. Copeland and the film’s director, Nelson George, chat with Gayle King at the 92nd Street Y after a screening; on Wednesday, the film hits select theaters and video-on-demand. At 7:30 p.m., 1395 Lexington Avenue, 212-415-5500, 92y.org. (Schaefer)Monica Bill Barnes  (Wednesdays through Dec. 16) Karaoke night meets office party in “Happy Hour,” the latest concoction from Ms. Barnes and Anna Bass, best known these days as the dancers — alongside the radio personality Ira Glass — in the touring revue “Three Acts, Two Dancers, One Radio Host.” Their new weekly gig, in a Lower Manhattan dance studio, features the cheeky duo playing two guys playing their everyday selves, as Ms. Barnes continues her love affair with awkwardness, failure and physical comedy. The audience gets drinks, prizes and the chance to sing. At 6:30 p.m., Studio G, Gibney Dance: Agnes Varis Performing Arts Center, 280 Broadway, near Chambers Street, 646-837-6809, monicabillbarnes.com. (Siobhan Burke)Bolshoi Ballet (Sunday) This company’s performance of the Romantic classic “Giselle” will be broadcast live from Moscow to more than 500 theaters, including several in Manhattan. The performance features the prima ballerina Svetlana Zakharova in the title role of the peasant girl deceived by the nobleman-in-disguise, Albrecht, danced here by Sergei Polunin (also known for his recent rendition of “Take Me to Church,” which went viral on YouTube). Ms. Zakharova’s tragic elegance and Mr. Polunin’ propulsive power will be all the more potent in close up. At 12:55 p.m., more information and participating theaters are at bolshoiballetincinema.com. (Schaefer)H.T. Chen and Dancers  (Thursday through Oct. 18) The wife-and-husband team of Dian Dong and H.T. Chen spent three years researching and interviewing Chinese immigrants and their descendants for “South of Gold Mountain.” Performed by a multigenerational cast, the work sheds light on the racism and discrimination faced by 19th- and early 20th-century Chinese immigrants who settled in the American South, and celebrates their contribution to building the country’s infrastructure. Thursday, Friday and Saturday at 7:30 p.m., Sunday at 3 p.m., New York Live Arts, 219 West 19th Street, Chelsea, 212-924-0077, newyorklivearts.org. (Schaefer)★ Company XIV  (through Nov. 15) This flirtatious company, which combines ballet and contemporary dance with elements of baroque and burlesque, specializes in sexy, spicy, opulent interpretations of fairy-tale classics. This fall, the director and choreographer Austin McCormick introduces his take on “Cinderella,” which comes with a dash of opera and vaudeville. Because of titillating costumes and scenarios, and free-flowing libations, performances are for adults only. Tuesdays through Saturdays at 8 p.m., Sundays at 5 p.m., Minetta Lane Theater, 18 Minetta Lane, Greenwich Village, 800-745-3000, companyxiv.com. (Schaefer)Seán Curran Company and Ustatshakirt Plus  (through Saturday) As part of the cultural exchange program DanceMotion USA, led by the United States Department of State and the Brooklyn Academy of Music, Mr. Curran and his New York-based modern dance company recently toured Central Asia. While in Kyrgyzstan, they met the traditional Kyrgyz music ensemble Ustatshakirt Plus. “Dream’d in a Dream,” which has its premiere at BAM’s Harvey Theater, is a collaboration between that group (playing live) and nine dancers, inspired by Kyrgyz culture and the Walt Whitman poem of the title. At 7:30 p.m., Harvey Theater, BAM, 651 Fulton Street, Fort Greene, 718-636-4100, bam.org. (Burke)★ Dance Heginbotham  (Saturday and Sunday) After 14 years as a dancer with the Mark Morris Dance Group, John Heginbotham founded his own company in 2011 and quickly collected fans for his wit, refreshing physical strangeness and canny musical collaborations. The company’s Joyce debut, performed to live music, includes “Angels’ Share,” originally set on the Atlanta Ballet, the solo “Diamond” and “Easy Win,” in which Mr. Heginbotham and the jazz pianist Ethan Iverson honor and skewer the rituals of ballet class. Saturday at 8 p.m., Sunday at 2 and 7:30 p.m., Joyce Theater, 175 Eighth Avenue, at 19th Street, Chelsea, 212-242-0800, joyce.org. (Schaefer)Moriah Evans  (Thursday through Oct. 17) In the previous iteration of her “Social Dance” project, Moriah Evans cleverly utilized a black-and-white checkered floor as a grid to dictate the structure of her work. She describes the sequel, “Social Dance 9-12: Encounter,” performed this weekend at Danspace, as its “obverse mirror.” In this version, she zeros in on the act of looking as a fundamental component both of social dance and the relationship between audience and performer. At 8 p.m., St. Mark’s Church, 131 East 10th Street, East Village, 866-811-4111, danspaceproject.org. (Schaefer)★ Fall for Dance  (through Sunday) This popular, packed-to-the-gills festival concludes this weekend, but not before introducing a new program. The remaining performance of Program 4 (Friday) features Stephen Petronio’s “Locomotor,” San Francisco Ballet, the classical Indian elegance of Nrityagram and the tap artists of Dorrance Dance. Program 5 (Saturday and Sunday) welcomes the ballet superstar Tiler Peck with an unlikely partner — the actor and clown Bill Irwin; the Boston Ballet with a Bellini-inspired work by Leonid Yakobson; a United States premiere by the young Flamenco dancer and choreographer Jesús Carmona; and a New York premiere by the enigmatic Israeli troupe L-E-V. Friday and Saturday 8 p.m., Sunday at 7 p.m., City Center, 131 West 55th Street, Manhattan, 212-581-1212, nycitycenter.org. (Schaefer)General Mischief Dance Theater  (Sunday) The modus operandi of General Mischief Dance Theater is dance as play — the company’s shows have been fondly compared to children’s birthday parties. The title of its new work, “Up and Away,” refers to a large mobile, designed by the actor and sculptor Kevin Reese, which the company’s performers assemble and launch by the dance’s end. At 1 and 6 p.m., JCC in Manhattan, Sonnenfeldt Family Auditorium, 334 Amsterdam Avenue, at 76th Street, 212-714-4694, generalmischief.com. (Schaefer)★ José Limón Dance Company  (Tuesday through Oct. 25) José Limón is a pillar of American modern dance, though perhaps the most unassuming of them. The work of the Mexican-born choreographer is celebrated for its proud nobility, palpable spirituality and high drama. Marking its 70th anniversary, the company that bears his name presents 15 works spanning three decades, from 1942 until Limón’s death in 1972. The works will be performed by companies and academies from around the United States, as well as South America, Europe and Asia. Tuesday and Wednesday at 7:30 p.m., Thursday and Friday at 8 p.m., Saturday at 2 and 8 p.m., Sunday at 2 and 7:30 p.m., Joyce Theater, 175 Eighth Avenue, at 19th Street, Chelsea, 212-242-0800, joyce.org. (Schaefer)★ New York City Ballet  (through Oct. 18) Already this season, City Ballet has given the world five new ballets by five men, all with something to admire. They receive another encore on Friday, then the rest of the week is a Balanchine love-fest, featuring a collection of his famous “Black and White” ballets (Saturday matinee and evening), a taste of his Romantic side in “Tschaikovsky Suite No. 3” and “Liebeslieder Walzer” (Sunday) and a nod to commedia dell’arte in “Harlequinade,” which is paired with Jerome Robbins’s streetwise rumble, “N.Y. Export: Opus Jazz.” Friday at 8 p.m., Saturday at 2 and 8 p.m., Sunday at 3 p.m., Tuesday through Thursday at 7:30 p.m., David H. Koch Theater, Lincoln Center, 212-496-0600, nycballet.com. (Schaefer)Ponydance  (through Saturday) This boisterous Irish dance-theater troupe returns to New York as part of Travelogues, a series assembled by Laurie Uprichard, who brings the best of what she’s seen in her curatorial travels to Abrons Arts Center. The characters of “Anybody Waitin’?” find themselves at loose ends; as the news release puts it, “Leonie is waiting for Paula, Paula is waiting for a man and Bryan is waiting to be included.” Together they wrest humor from prolonged anticipation. Friday at 7:30 p.m., Saturday at 6 and 9 p.m., 466 Grand Street, at Pitt Street, Lower East Side, 866-811-4111, abronsartscenter.org. (Burke)★ Silas Riener  (Wednesday through next Friday, and through Oct. 28) The solo is a special strand of dance DNA, and Silas Riener, a celebrated former member of the Merce Cunningham Dance Company, knows how to command a big space. His new solo performance, though, takes pace in more intimate environs, offering a welcome opportunity to observe his calm intensity and physical precision up close. The show, called “Blue Name,” is a compilation of short works made over the course of a year and a half. At 8 p.m., Chocolate Factory Theater, 5-49 49th Avenue, Long Island City, 718-482-7069, chocolatefactorytheater.org. (Schaefer)‘Swango: The Theatrical Dance Experience’ (Thursday through Oct. 17) This production is a revival of an Off Broadway show from 2005 in which the playwright Rupert Holmes, the tango choreographer Mariela Franganillo and the swing dance champion Robert Royston collaborated on a story of star-crossed lovers who represent their respective dance styles — a meet-cute between swing and tango. At 7:30 p.m., Schimmel Center for the Arts, Pace University, 3 Spruce Street, Lower Manhattan, 866-811-4111, schimmel.pace.edu. (Schaefer)‘Where Sculpture and Dance Meet: Minimalism from 1961 to 1979’  (through Oct. 31) This exhibition at Loretta Howard Gallery examines the interchange of ideas among choreographers and sculptors in the 1960s and ’70s. Sculptures by Ronald Bladen, Donald Judd, Robert Morris, Andy Warhol and Sol LeWitt share the space with videos of performances by Trisha Brown, Lucinda Childs, Merce Cunningham, Simone Forti and Yvonne Rainer. Tuesdays through Fridays from 10 a.m. to 6 p.m. and Saturdays from 11 a.m. to 6 p.m., 525-531 West 26th Street, Chelsea, 212-695-0164, lorettahoward.com. (Burke)For their first primary debate, the Democrats went to Las Vegas. But they were not there to put on a show.Cable news had been spoiled by the first two Republican primary debates of this cycle, with a feisty, oversize field led by a professional reality-TV performer. The Democratic race, on the other hand, is led by two candidates who’ve seen political benefit in not attacking each other. Hillary Rodham Clinton, as front-runner, has avoided punching down. Mrs. Clinton’s chief rival, Senator Bernie Sanders of Vermont, has refused to go negative, even when interviewers have all but offered to hold his coat for him.The walk-up coverage of the debate on CNN had held out hope that there would be drama. Maybe Vice President Joseph R. Biden Jr. would show up! Maybe one of the lesser-known candidates would create a viral moment!“This time, what happens in Vegas,” a booming CNN ad promised hopefully, “definitely won’t stay in Vegas!” (Though what did this mean exactly? Would the candidates Martin O’Malley and Lincoln Chafee wake up the next morning to find a tiger in their bathroom?)The moderator, Anderson Cooper of CNN, to his credit, said before the debate, “It’s not my job to force somebody to fight.” Instead, he came with a few jabs of his own ready, spending much of the night with his head cocked down at his note cards, rattling off questions like America’s toughest quiz show host. He hit candidates early at their vulnerabilities, asking Mrs. Clinton, “Will you say anything to get elected?” and asking Mr. Sanders if he could hope to get elected as a self-described Democratic socialist.Mr. Cooper was hyper-prepared — at one point, he dashed off the population of Denmark, as though his chunky spectacles were Google Glass. And he was not shy about interrupting candidates, or policing them. When Jim Webb complained about not getting enough time to speak, Mr. Cooper curtly answered, “You agreed to these rules.”In the early going, it seemed as if the debate might become more contentious, as Mrs. Clinton took an opportunity to criticize Mr. Sanders as too soft on gun regulations. But Mr. Sanders, while holding forth with his trademark Larry David-like ire against Wall Street, mostly chose not to spar with her.Just the opposite: The most-replayed moment of the entire debate may have come when Mr. Sanders took Mrs. Clinton’s side on the investigation of the private email server she had used while secretary of state. “The American people are sick and tired of hearing about your damn emails!” he said, prompting cheers from the Democratic audience and a hearty laugh and handshake from his opponent.If the Republican candidates went to their debates to deliver smackdowns, the Democrats showed up for a singalong. The heat from the stage was mostly directed outward, especially at the opposition party, and most especially at Donald J. Trump, whom Mr. O’Malley called “that carnival barker.” Mr. Trump is an unavoidable presence even at the other party’s debate, which he decided to crash via second-screen by reviewing it live on Twitter. (“Wow, I am giving a speech on OAN,” he wrote, referencing the One America News Network. “Much more exciting than debate!”)One can’t blame CNN if the candidates didn’t deliver the thrills Mr. Trump or others sought; beyond a point, whatever the format, candidates will have the kind of debate they want to have. There weren’t many innovations in CNN’s presentation — the anchor Don Lemon presented questions from Facebook, a device we’ve seen before — and the event ran a solid two hours, despite having fewer candidates than the Republican main-stage debates.In the end, the five Democrats mostly used the debate less to argue with one another than to present the versions of themselves — and their party — that they wanted voters to see. The tone was maybe best summed up toward the end, when Mr. Cooper asked the candidates which enemies they were proudest of making, and they gave a range of favorite progressive targets: Wall Street, the coal lobby, the Republicans in general. Mr. Webb did give a more colorful answer: the enemy soldier who wounded him with a grenade in battle — “but he’s not around right now.”If you were looking for combat on stage, sorry; what happened in Vegas was mostly staid in Vegas.MINSK, BELARUS — The tidy and anonymous room, which is entered through a fenced courtyard in a sleepy residential neighborhood of this Eastern European city, is not large. It was once a garage, just big enough to accommodate a few sedans or, in this case, the closely clustered group of about 50 that has assembled on a full-moon night in late August.But the distances of space and time being crossed in this small room are great. It feels appropriate that the audience members have been advised to bring their passports. Never mind that this is on the off chance — as has happened to other audiences — they might be arrested by the Belarussian K.G.B., which still operates under that name in this former Soviet republic. What is being celebrated is the license to travel, if only through a defiant imagination.The occasion is the opening night of the 11th season of the Belarus Free Theater, a troupe that has never been authorized by the national government and is thus officially not allowed to perform in its homeland, which has been a dictatorship in all but name since Aleksandr Lukashenko became its president in 1994. As usual, its three exiled founders and artistic directors — Nikolai Khalezin, Natalia Koliada and Vladimir Shcherban — are on hand to welcome theatergoers, live though not in person.“We are so glad to see you!” said Ms. Koliada (in Russian), who is seated next to Mr. Khalezin, her husband. The couple — who have been living in London since they fled Belarus in 2011, after Ms. Koliada’s arrest for protesting Mr. Lukashenko’s re-election — is appearing via Skype on a red-framed, standard-size computer tablet.The device is held by a member of the company, Victoria Biran, who stands in profile with a wryly respectful expression that acknowledges and absorbs the everyday surrealism in which this troupe exists. The doll-size, two-dimensional forms of Ms. Koliada and Mr. Khalezin wave to the audience; the audience waves back.Ironies, funny and sad, are elemental to this company, a troupe for which theater is as much an act of political engagement as an art, filled with risks that Western performers rarely face. The show being staged tonight — as always, free of charge to the audience — is the same play with which the company began its life 10 years ago. That was in 2005 in a bar called Graffiti, where the show had moved after being shut down during rehearsals at the state-subsidized theater where Mr. Shcherban was then working.Sarah Kane’s “4:48 Psychosis” is a harrowing portrait of an outlaw artist who kills herself (as Ms. Kane did shortly after completing it), and its depiction of depression and suicide was deemed unsuitable for Belarussian audiences by state censors. Mr. Shcherban, its director then and now, who is seen on Skype after Ms. Koliada and Mr. Khalezin sign off, tells the audience in the garage that this play — as a study in the pain experienced by outsiders — has reverberated like “a tuning fork” in his life and work.Yet the outlaw troupe he helped create has not only improbably survived but also grown into the world’s most visible and lionized underground theater. The company has toured extensively in Europe, Australia and the United States. (These trips are subsidized by foreign individuals and institutional grants.) It has been the subject of an HBO documentary and championed by the likes of the former Czech president and dramatist Vaclav Havel, and the Czech-born British playwright Tom Stoppard; and by Mick Jagger and Jude Law.In London, in particular, the troupe seems wreathed in an intoxicating perfume of radical chic. Ms. Koliada is a master at promoting her company via social media and persuasive direct engagement with the culturally influential, and she and Mr. Khalezin tend to drop names that echo. (Mr. Stoppard is always “Tom.”) But there is no denying that the company they lead has a visceral power, a thrilling necessity-born inventiveness and an urgent topicality that is rare in theater today.The 10th anniversary of the Belarus Free Theater is being celebrated this fall in London with a series of performances under the title “Staging a Revolution.” First comes a concert in Camden, “I’m With the Banned,” on Sunday, Oct. 18, with performances by blacklisted music groups from Belarus, Ukraine and Russia (including Pussy Riot).Starting Nov. 2, the Free Theater will present 10 plays in London that encompass its 10 years of existence. Several of these will be staged at the Young Vic Theater, where the troupe has been a resident company for four years. Others will be performed in undisclosed locations, to be revealed at the last minute. The idea is to replicate the conditions under which the Belarus Free Theater performs in Minsk. Of course, seeing the company in London won’t be quite the same as seeing it in its hometown, where theatergoing is a potentially imprisonable offense.Ms. Koliada, a small and infectiously alert woman whose habitual expression combines anxiety with amusement, recently recalled a night in 2007, in a shabby house in a Minsk suburb that was at that time the group’s base theater. Officially, what was happening there was a wedding celebration (a ruse Ms. Koliada says they had borrowed from Mr. Havel, from his days as an underground theater creator), and there was Champagne in the refrigerator to prove it.But it was really just another night at the theater, Free Theater style. The play was Edward Bond’s “Eleven Vests,” a portrait of rebellion against institutional authority, and the audience assumed it was just part of the show when an unknown, unsmiling figure stepped into view, joined by a squad of men in uniform. Then the announcement came: “You are all under arrest.” And performers and audience were herded into vans and driven to a government detention center, to be held for about six hours.Ms. Koliada related this story one afternoon in London, the day before I left for my first visit to Minsk, a city I was scarcely aware of before I started seeing the Belarus Free Theater’s work at New York City in 2011 (with a knockout production called “Being Harold Pinter,” which combined depictions of violence from that playwright’s work with documentary accounts of Belarussian lives warped by state and domestic brutality). I now had my visa, which to all our surprise, had been acquired with no complications beyond the usual red tape.Ms. Koliada was accompanied by Mr. Shcherban and her uncannily self-possessed 16-year-old daughter (and our translator), Daniella. They had just returned from a residency in Falmouth, England, where the theater, which now comprises about 50 people, was rehearsing the plays for its new seasons. Mr. Khalezin had stayed home, Ms. Koliada said, because he was suffering from one of the panic attacks that sporadically descend upon him since his two-week incarceration for political dissidence in 2002.It was an auspicious moment for me to visit Minsk, I was told. Presidential elections were being held in October. There was little doubt that Mr. Lukashenko would once again be victorious, as he indeed turned out to be. Still, it was a time when the government would be anxious not to receive the sort of unfavorable publicity that might result from its cracking down once again on a small, internationally celebrated renegade theater company.Central Minsk — where I stayed, on Karl Marx Street (home, I was amused to note, to an upscale Canali boutique) — offers stately views of open squares, colonnaded buildings and wide boulevards that stretch past the vanishing point of the flat horizon. Nearly all of it was rebuilt after World War II, when it was reduced to rubble, and its architecture is in the ceremonial Stalinist style of the mid-20th century. The K.G.B. headquarters, as grand and opaque as a royal mausoleum, looms centrally over Minsk’s main artery, Independence Avenue.It is not a cozy city, but it is an uncommonly clean and uniform one. Though there are casinos along the streets, catering largely to rich tourists from Moscow, after sundown Minsk retreats behind thick walls and closed doors, and you can walk for blocks without encountering another person. This is not a place to wear your private face in public. I was told that I could immediately be identified as a nonresident because I smiled too much.“Just because it’s clean outside doesn’t mean that people don’t live with garbage,” said Svetlana Sugako, a laconic young woman with a vigilant air and a slow, warming grin. Ms. Sugako has been with the theater almost since its inception, since she saw an early performance of “Psychosis” at Graffiti and knew immediately, despite never having cared much about theater, that she wanted to work with the people who had put on this play.Ms. Sugako and Nadia Brodskaya, her live-in partner, oversee the company’s operations in Minsk. I spent much of my time in Minsk with them and Ms. Biran, along with a dashing, gender-straddling London-based Belarussian translator, Sasha Padziarei, and several students from the Fortinbras Studio, the theater’s training program for prospective members. (Many of them hold down second jobs, though finding work as a member of the troupe is tricky in a country where a majority of jobs are state subsidized.)They are a drolly serious, industrious, multifunctional team, collectively serving as the box office, press office, security and technical crew. They spend much of the day on cellphones, confirming reservations for performances (which are made through social media) and picking up or exchanging the small brown paper parcels that contain props and costumes for the next shows.I was having lunch with the puckish, blunt-spoken Ms. Biran (she told me I wasn’t “as boring as I expected”) in a popular, immense cafeteria that looked like a hunting lodge when her phone rang. “Well,” she said, as she hung up, “there are no fresh strawberries.” I assumed she meant for dinner; it turned out I was mistaken.Getting to see a production from the Belarus Free Theater is high drama in itself. To arrive at the garage where “Psychosis” was staged, Ms. Biran and I took a subway, changing trains once, and then a bus. We walked to a mini-supermarket, before which a crowd had assembled, trying not to look like a crowd. Its members — who resembled the kind of spiffily dressed-down types you might find at a Brooklyn art opening — were escorted in groups of three or four up another street and into a courtyard.The show that awaited us was, to put it mildly, intense. Despite being in Russian, which I do not speak, this “Psychosis” was the most disturbingly raw and implicating of the several versions I have seen. Two actresses, Jana Rusakevich and Maryia Sazonava, performed Ms. Kane’s elliptical text as a doomed dialogue between conflicted aspects of a single self that hasn’t quite yet given up.Another, faintly flickering incarnation of that self was on display in a film that was being projected onto the walls behind the actresses. There you could see a younger Ms. Rusakevich performing in the company’s original “Psychosis” 10 years earlier at the Graffiti bar. These past and present versions of the actress echoed each other’s movements, as if in some eternal fugue of struggle and defeat.But ah, the vitality in the struggle. Ms. Rusakevich and Ms. Sazonava wrestled, waltzed and cuddled with each other, breaking off to stagger, howling, into the front rows of the tightly packed audience. A comfortable spectator distance was not an option.Props — cigarettes, candles, a Thermos of coffee — materialized out of nowhere, to be used as sources of pleasure and pain. At one point, the women smeared and fed each other with fruit from a giant glass goblet. (Yes, the strawberries had been found, after all.) The smell of smashed berries, grapes and bananas saturated the tiny garage, redolent of fecundity and decay. It lingered after the candles had been extinguished in the play’s final scene, leaving us in a noiseless darkness.The audience filed out quietly. The theater’s crew began the cleanup process immediately — mopping floors, packing lights, disassembling shelves and benches. Within minutes, there was scant evidence that a show had taken place.The next afternoon, I was back at the garage to see a workshop production of “The Ugly One,” a dark satirical parable by the contemporary German dramatist Marius von Mayenburg about the pursuit of cosmetic perfection, performed by the students of the Fortinbras Studio. The name refers to the Norwegian prince, who is essentially the last character standing amid the pile of corpses that concludes “Hamlet,” the one who lives to tell the tale. Roughly 100 students have passed through Fortinbras since it was founded eight years ago.Much of their training takes place in the apartment of Andrei Koliada, Ms. Koliada’s father, a large, leonine man who speaks in professorial paragraphs with the emphatic resonance of the actor he was in his youth. For decades, Mr. Koliada worked as a high-ranking official at the Belarussian Academy of Arts but was dismissed because of his association with the Belarus Free Theater.Sitting in his small, book-lined lair of a den, Mr. Koliada said he doesn’t like to talk about the events in his life after Ms. Koliada and Mr. Khalezin were smuggled out of the country, just before midnight, on the last day of 2010. “It hurts to remember,” he said, “and my nerves are not so good now.” He paused. “I just want to say one thing: After all that, I lost my voice and I was deaf for some time.”On this afternoon, he was taking four of the five current Fortinbras students (all women) through a series of Stanislavski-style vocal and breathing exercises. Mr. Koliada said that many Free Theater productions — especially Mr. Khalezin’s documentary works, which are rooted in recent and often personal histories — begin not with text but physical improvisation. “The pain has to be felt,” he said.At the garage the next day, the class members performed “The Ugly One,” which they had prepared under Mr. Shcherban’s direction earlier in the month in Falmouth (with subsequent rehearsals conducted via Skype). As in “Psychosis,” fresh produce figured prominently.In this case, the fruit of choice was tomatoes, which were fed with increasing frenzy into a blender for the many scenes involving plastic surgery operations. And, oh yes, one of the actresses — playing a cosmetically reconstituted older woman — was wearing grotesque taped-on lips, made of apple skin. (Originally, she told me afterward, they had used pepper strips, which were far less comfortable.)It was a spirited, strangely haunting performance. And what you might call the salad effect added a sensory dimension to the play that was both funny and disturbing. “It’s not pretty,” a middle-aged woman, attending her first Free Theater production, said to me after the show. “But it’s real.”The title characters in Mr. Khalezin and Ms. Koliada’s “Time of Women,” the third Belarus Free Theater play I saw in Minsk, might well have figured in the work of Svetlana Alexievich, the Belarussian journalist  awarded the Nobel Prize in Literature last week, who specializes in accounts of lives under siege in the former Soviet states.Like the company’s earlier “Zone of Silence” and, in part, “Being Harold Pinter,” “Time of Women” is a documentary work, rooted in interviews, that portrays political persecution in Minsk.The theater, in this case, was the connected living room, vestibule and kitchen of a private apartment. This felt appropriate for a drama about the intersection of domestic and political lives, in which three women gather at the home of one to recall the time they shared in a detention center.I arrived with the last installment of the audience, which was led up several stories through an unlighted back staircase. There were about 30 of us, all in our stocking feet. (It is the Belarussian custom to take off your shoes when you enter a home.)We were mostly seated thigh-to-thigh on a long sofa, and on the windowsill and floor above and below it. The longtime company actress Marinya Yurevich was in the kitchen, preparing an apple cake that would figure in the play’s last scene.She was portraying Natalia Radina, the (real) Belarussian journalist who now edits an opposition website out of Warsaw. Ms. Sazonava played Irina Khalip, also a journalist and the wife of Andrei Sannikov, a Belarussian presidential candidate in 2010, whose subsequent imprisonment became an international cause célèbre; Ms. Rusakevich was Nastia Dashkevich, a youth leader. The women were all arrested after protesting the outcome of the elections in December 2010.The apartment where the play was staged had been furnished with an iron-frame bunk bed (for the prison scenes), a tiny collapsible Christmas tree (for the scenes at home) and, in the vestibule, a desk with a glaring lamp.That was the province of the cast’s single male member, Kiryl Kanstantsinau, who played the K.G.B. agent who interviews each woman with the object of breaking her spirit. His interrogation techniques include noisily slurping ramen noodles throughout. The inventive use of food for emotional ends, it seems, can be used for political as well as theatrical effect.Earlier that day, I had received a message from Ms. Koliada asking me to make allowances for the lack of a proper set in this production. But that private, cramped apartment seemed to me the ideal stage for a work about the persistence of invasive memories of political abuse.At one point, Ms. Yurevich’s Natalia talked about the noises of prison: “The clank of the dishes and doors, creaking stairs, screaming guards, cracking batons, the crunching sound of the electric shocks — when our friends were driven downstairs to be tortured.” She went on: “If I hear a similar sound now, my entire body contracts.”Afterward, most of those associated with the production stayed on in the apartment for dinner, seated on the floor of what had been the playing area.There was a lot of wine, and, yes, fresh fruit and vegetables. Conversation subjects included the difficulties of surviving the weeks during the summer when the hot water in your neighborhood is turned off (for repairs, an annual occurrence in Minsk), and a recent, much-mocked television ad for Mr. Lukashenko’s re-election, in which he was seen harvesting potatoes in a pristine white T-shirt.It was reassuring to see Mr. Kanstantsinau, who had been terrifying as the K.G.B. interrogator, turn back into the sweet, soft-spoken young man who the day before I had visited in his new apartment, where pictures of Cher and Frank Zappa watch over the bed. Still, I found myself occasionally glancing nervously toward the vestibule, where his grim alter-ego had systematically bullied and humiliated three women. The festive brightness of the dinner party had not entirely erased his shadow.I remembered what Mr. Shcherban had said to me in London a few days earlier: “Wherever we go, we always carry our nightmares with us. For us, the theater is the only way to get rid of them.” Museums and SitesAmerican Museum of Natural History: ‘Countdown to Zero’ (continuing) Smallpox is the only human disease to have been eradicated, but what about Guinea worm, polio, malaria and others? This exhibition, presented in collaboration with the Carter Center, examines international efforts to control and wipe out infection. Daily from 10 a.m. to 5:45 p.m., Central Park West and 79th Street, 212-769-5200, amnh.org.Center for Jewish History: ‘Allied in the Fight: Jews, Blacks and the Struggle for Civil Rights’ (Friday) Told through photos, letters, archival materials and film, this exhibition looks at the complicated role that Jewish people played in the American civil rights movement, with a focus on the shared projects and joint organizational efforts of black and Jewish people in the fight against injustice. 15 West 16th Street, Flatiron district, 212-294-8301, cjh.org.‘Global Citizen: The Architecture of Moshe Safdie’ (through Jan. 10) This touring exhibition, a retrospective of Mr. Safdie’s career of more than 50 years, makes its way to New York with new material based on the architect’s recent work related to dense urbanism in Asia. Donald Albrecht from the Museum of the City of New York organized the material in this show, which also explores Mr. Safdie’s design philosophy that buildings should be extensions of their physical, historical and cultural contexts. National Academy Museum, 1083 Fifth Avenue, at 89th Street, 212-369-4880, nationalacademy.org.Morgan Library and Museum: ‘Alice: 150 Years of Wonderland’ (closes on Monday) The centerpiece of this exhibition is the original manuscript of Lewis Carroll’s “Alice’s Adventures in Wonderland,” traveling from the British Library in London. Joining the book are letters, drawings, photographs and more that shed light on how the beloved book came to be, and why it still holds our attention after 150 years. 225 Madison Avenue, at 36th Street, 212-685-0008, themorgan.org.Museum of Chinese in America: ‘Sub Urbanisms: Casino Urbanization, Chinatowns and the Contested American Landscape’ (through January) Stephen Fan, an architecture professor and curator, examines the trend of Chinese casino workers in Connecticut converting suburban homes into multifamily communities. This exhibition is both creative and historical; it takes the present to imagine the future of housing design while looking back on the events that created the trend of suburban migration. 215 Centre Street, between Howard and Grand Streets, Lower Manhattan, 212-619-4785, mocanyc.org.Museum of the Moving Image: ‘How Cats Took Over the Internet’ (through January) Even people who hate cats can’t easily get through an hour of browsing online without coming across some kind of feline clickbait. This exhibition takes a critical look at and tells the story of how we, as a society, got to this point. Yes, there are cat GIFs. 35th Avenue at 37th Street, Astoria, Queens, 718-784-0077, movingimage.us.National Museum of the American Indian: ‘Meryl McMaster: Second Self’ (through Dec. 11) Meryl McMaster, an artist from Canada and a Plains Cree member of the Siksika Nation, shows her “Second Self” photography series, which uses portraiture to explore the complex ways in which identity is constructed. 1 Bowling Green, Lower Manhattan, 212-514-3700, nmai.si.edu; free.New-York Historical Society: ‘Superheroes in Gotham’ (through Feb. 21) New York is safe as long as its long roster of comic-book heroes stick around. It’s been this way for nearly a century as these characters have defended the city in books, TV shows, movies, video games — even the Broadway stage. New-York Historical Society’s latest exhibition tells the story of how super heroes became a cultural staple for all ages and media. 170 Central Park West, at 77th Street, 212-873-3400, nyhistory.org.New York Transit Museum: ‘Bringing Back the City’ (ongoing) This new exhibition comes three years after Hurricane Sandy took a swipe at the city’s infrastructure. But what of the people who put the pieces back together? “Bringing Back the City” tells the stories of everyday services — like electricity and mass transit — that become extraordinary in times of crisis. Boerum Place, at Schermerhorn Street, Downtown Brooklyn, 718-694-1600, bringingbackthecity.com.New York Transit Museum Grand Central Terminal Gallery Annex: ‘New York’s Transportation Landmarks’ (through Nov. 1) It’s been 50 years since New York passed its Landmarks Law, which covers over 30,000 buildings and structures around the city. To celebrate the anniversary, the New York Transit Museum has created an exhibition that explores the history of development, use and even rescue of these landmarks. More information: 212-878-0106, web.mta.info/mta/museum.New York Transit Museum: ‘Spanning the Narrows: The Verrazano Bridge at 50’ (through Oct. 18) Photographs, maps, drawings, models and other archival materials related to the construction of the bridge (including correspondence from Robert Moses, who oversaw the project) are part of this exhibition commemorating its 50th anniversary. Boerum Place and Schermerhorn Street, Brooklyn Heights, 718-694-1600, mta.info/mta/museum.New-York Historical Society: ‘The Hirschfeld Century: The Art of Al Hirschfeld’ (closes on Monday) This exhibition includes over 100 original drawings by the illustrator Al Hirschfeld (1903-2003), who was known in particular for his drawings of celebrities. The show has a special emphasis on his work for The New York Times, where he was a contributor for more than 70 years. Tickets are available at the museum or in advance online. 170 Central Park West, at 77th Street, 212-873-3400, nyhistory.org.Old Stone House: ‘In Search of One City: Sensing (in)equality’ (Friday and Saturday) This exhibition, with a variety of works gathered by the artist Katherine Gressel, explores the role of artists in investigating, making sense of and possibly even reconciling problems of income inequality in New York. Art from the show includes, for example, posters that advise poor people on how to suffer politely, as well a jukebox that plays interviews with low-wage workers. On view Friday from 3 to 6 p.m. and by appointment, 336 Third Street, between Fourth and Fifth Avenues, Park Slope, Brooklyn, 718-768-3195, theoldstonehouse.org.‘Sea Level: Five Boroughs at Water’s Edge’ (through Dec. 31) In its first pop-up exhibition for the Seaport Culture District, the American Institute of Architects presents a water’s eye view of the city through photos by Elizabeth Felicella and accompanying essays by Robert Sullivan. The panoramic view of New York starts at New York Harbor and makes its way along the East River, showing the shore of each borough along the way. Center @ the Seaport, 181 Front Street, South Street Seaport, Lower Manhattan, 212-683-0023, cfa.aiany.org.‘Webtoon’ (through Oct. 29) This exhibition highlights the culture of Korean webtoons — comics specifically made for the Internet. In addition to displaying the comics, this show will also take a look at the media and commercial products that have been inspired by popular webtoons. Korean Cultural Service New York, Gallery Korea, 460 Park Avenue, at 57th Street, Manhattan, 212-759-9550, koreanculture.org.Gardens‘Beyond the Scenic Hudson: Plein Air Painting’ (Sunday) Wave Hill’s Glyndor Gallery is currently showing a Hudson River-inspired installation by the artist Matthew Friday. For this workshop, visitors will meet the artist Matthew Friday to see his work and join him outdoors to paint the Hudson’s autumn landscape. Registration is required. From 1 to 4 p.m., West 249th Street and Independence Avenue, Riverdale, the Bronx, 718-549-3200, wavehill.org.EventsArchitecture and Design Film Festival (Tuesday through Oct. 18) The lineup for this festival may seem niche, but the subject matter affects out daily lives: housing, preservation, the environment. Highlights include a virtual reality lounge, a Rizzoli pop-up bookstore and the screening of “The Infinite Happiness” (Tuesday at 8 p.m.), about the “8 House” building in Copenhagen by the Danish architect Bjarke Ingels. At various times, Bow Tie Chelsea Cinemas 9, 260 West 23rd Street, Chelsea; more information is at adfilmfest.com.Autumn Crafts Festival (Saturday and Sunday) Handcrafted treasures from makers around the country — about 250 of them — are on display in this event that takes over Lincoln Center for two weekends. There will be craft demonstrations, as well as live entertainment. From 11 a.m. to 8:30 p.m. on Saturdays; from 10 a.m. to 6:30 p.m. on Sundays, West 64th Street, at Columbus Avenue, Upper West Side, 973-746-0091, craftsatlincoln.org.‘Back to the Future’ in Concert (Thursday and next Friday) In celebration of the 30th anniversary of “Back to the Future,” Doc himself, Christopher Lloyd, will be in attendance of this screening with live musical accompaniment by the New Jersey Symphony Orchestra. At 8 p.m., Radio City Music Hall, 866-858-0008, radiocity.com.Chelsea Film Festival (Thursday through Oct. 18) Risk-takers and emerging storytellers are given a chance to screen their documentaries and fiction films at this little festival, back for its third year, with a theme of “global issues.” The screenings, talks and parties will be held at multiple venues and times of day; more information is at chelseafilm.org.Halloween Harvest (Saturday and Sunday, through Nov. 1) For the next six weekends, Halloween is taking over Luna Park’s activities, games and rides. For example, Jack’s Pumpkin Shack will give visitors a chance to guess the weight of a giant pumpkin, and Camp Luna will be a s’mores-making station. More information is at lunaparknyc.com. 1000 Surf Avenue, Coney Island, Brooklyn, 718-373-5862.New York Comic Con (through Sunday) You may have noticed the parade of costumed superfans making their way to the Jacob K. Javits Convention Center. No, Halloween didn’t come early; it’s time for New York’s annual take on this massive pop culture convention, complete with panel discussions, exhibitions and screenings. The full lineup is at newyorkcomiccon.com. Tickets are sold out, but New York has no shortage of super hero festivities this weekend. For example, New York Super Week has programming around the city lined up for Friday and Saturday. Multiple venues have become a playground for super heroes, vampires and zombies, offering a broad range of events, like comedy shows, concerts and food tastings. More information is at newyorksuperweek.com. And on Friday, the exhibition “Superheroes in Gotham” opens at New-York Historical Society. The museum tells the story of New York’s long relationship with comic book heroes and how they became a cultural staple across all ages and media — even worthy of an event like Comic Con. 170 Central Park West, at 77th Street, 212-873-3400, nyhistory.org.New York Super Week (Friday and Saturday) This festival is a sort of partner for New York Comic Con, which began on Thursday. For a week, various places around the city become a playground for fans of super heroes, vampires, zombies — typical Comic Con fare. There are dozens of events, from comedy shows and concerts to food tastings and lectures, planned covering a broad range of locations and topics. The lineup is at newyorksuperweek.com.Videology Presents Movie Trivia (Tuesday) Videology, the Brooklyn bar and cinema, hosts a free film-themed trivia contest every week. The game varies; you will want to know theme songs, facts, quotations (especially ones from Nicolas Cage) and more. The winning team receives a free round of drinks, and there are chances to win drinks each round. At 8:30 p.m., 308 Bedford Avenue, at South First Street, Williamsburg, Brooklyn, 718-782-3468, videologybarandcinema.com.Zum Schneider (Friday through Sunday) Oktoberfest officially ended on Sunday, but that isn’t stopping the bierhaus Zum Schneider from extending the party for an extra weekend. It has set up a sort of Munich on the East River, complete with Lederhosen-clad staff, strongman competitions, live music and liter steins. The beer tent opens Friday at 4 p.m. and Saturday and Sunday at noon, 24-20 F.D.R. Drive Service Road East, near 23rd Street, Stuyvesant Town, 212-598-1098, nyc.zumschneider.com.Spoken WordSasha Abramsky (Wednesday) Samuel G. Freedman, The New York Times’s On Religion columnist, joins Mr. Abramsky in discussing “The House of Twenty Thousand Books,” the story of his grandfather, Chimen Abramsky, whose home in London was a hot spot for some of his generation’s greatest thinkers and a vast library of socialist literature and Jewish history. At 7 p.m., Book Culture Columbus, 450 Columbus Avenue, near West 82nd Streets, Upper West Side, 212-595-1962, bookculture.com.‘By the Water’ (Friday) As the anniversary of Hurricane Sandy approaches, the New York Society for Ethical Culture presents a reading of Sharyn Rothstein’s 2014 play “By the Water.” The story follows Marty and Mary Murphy as they and their neighbors return to their Staten Island homes and attempt to rebuild their lives. A discussion about the plot’s ethical issues will follow. At 7 p.m., 2 West 64th Street, Manhattan, 212-307-7171, nysec.org.Richard Dawkins (Wednesday) The New York Public Library’s Books at Noon series brings in Mr. Dawkins to discuss his latest work, “A Brief Candle in the Dark,” a sequel to his 2013 memoir “An Appetite for Wonder.” In his new books, the science-minded author takes an “intellectual victory lap,” wrote Dwight Garner in a review for The New York Times. At noon, Stephen A. Schwarzman Building, New York Public Library, 917-275-6975, nypl.org/locations/schwarzman; free.Intelligence Squared Debates: ‘China and the U.S. Are Long-Term Enemies’ (Wednesday) John Donvan, the author and journalist, moderates this debate in which Peter Brookes from the Heritage Foundation and John Mearsheimer, a political-science professor from the University of Chicago, argue that China’s growing economic and military powers are in some ways a threat to the United States. Kevin Rudd, the former Australian prime minister, and Robert Daly, director of the Kissinger Institute on China and the U.S., provide a counterpoint. At 6:45 p.m. (reception at 5:45 p.m.), Kaufman Music Center, 129 West 67th Street, Manhattan, 212-303-4322, intelligencesquaredus.org.Colum McCann (Thursday) Before Joseph Gordon-Levitt was making his way across the World Trade Center towers on a wire in the new movie “The Walk,” Mr. McCann was fictionalizing Philippe Petit’s crossing in the National Book Award-winning novel “Let the Great World Spin.” Now, he’s back with a collection of short stories, “Thirteen Ways of Looking,” which he’ll discuss with the writer Lila Azam Zanganeh. At 7:30 p.m., Symphony Space, 2537 Broadway, at 95th Street, 212-864-5400, symphonyspace.org.Muldoon’s Picnic (Monday) Paul Muldoon, The New Yorker’s poetry editor, assembles his latest collection of writers and musicians for a night of Irish entertainment. Guests include the novelist Column McCann, the poet Michael Dickman, the musical duo Damsel (Beth Meyers and Monica Mugan), the singer Iarla Ó Lionáird and the fiddler Caoimhín Ó Raghallaigh. At 7:30 p.m., Irish Arts Center, 553 West 51st Street, Clinton, 212-757-3318, irishartscenter.org.Out by 10 (Friday) This salon-style evening is back for a new season, starting with music and performances by three winners of the Moth’s StorySlam. The lineup includes: Ophira Eisenberg, host of NPR’s “Ask Me Another”; the 20-time StorySlam champion Adam Wade; and Wendy Suzuki, a neural science professor at New York University. At 8 p.m., John Strasberg Studios, 555 Eighth Avenue, a West 38th Street, Manhattan, outbyten.com.Artist Talk: Arlene Shechet (Thursday) The Brooklyn Museum’s Elizabeth A. Sackler Center for Feminist Art hosts this talk with the sculptor Arlene Shechet, who will speak with the curator Catherine Morris. Ms. Shechet’s art works in contradictions, like elegance and ugliness, to subvert traditions in arts and crafts. At 7 p.m., 200 Eastern Parkway, at Prospect Park, Brooklyn, 718-638-5000, brooklynmuseum.org.Walking ToursAmerica’s Museum: Art and History of the Metropolitan (Saturday) Art history doctoral candidates lead this tour of one of the country’s most popular, prestigious museums. Highlights include classic artworks, as well as anecdotes from New York’s cultural history — and the story of the museum’s only benefactor to have been eaten by cannibals. At 11 a.m., meeting in front of the Duke Semans Mansion, 1009 Fifth Avenue, at East 82nd Street, Upper East Side, 888-606-9255, bigonion.com.Bryant Park Public Tours (Wednesday) Bryant Park hasn’t always been the clean, open space it is today. This tour provides some insights on its history, including its darker days as a “needle park” in the 1970s, as well as its award-winning design and maintenance efforts. The tour meets at the fountain at 41st Street at Avenue of the Americas. Registration is required. At 11 a.m., Bryant Park, 212-768-4242, bryantpark.org.Central Park (Sunday) Central Park’s green-leafed days are numbered. This walking tour — which stops at places like the Bethesda Terrace, Belvedere Castle and the Ramble — could be a good chance to explore the park before its welcoming lawns like Sheep Meadow say goodbye until the spring. History will also figure heavily into discussions; the park is more than 150 years old, after all. The tour meets at 11 a.m. at Central Park West between 66th and 67th Streets, Upper West Side, 888-606-9255, bigonion.com.Flatiron District Walking Tour (Sunday) This free tour meets at 11 a.m. on the southwest corner of Madison Square Park, at 23rd Street and Broadway, in front of the William Seward statue. Sponsored by the Flatiron/23rd Street Partnership; discoverflatiron.org.History of Wall Street Tour (weekdays) Stops on this tour, led by Wall Street Walks, include the New York Stock Exchange, Trinity Church, the Wall Street Bull, and ground zero and the Sept. 11 memorial. The tours last 90 minutes and begin at 11 a.m. and 1:30 p.m. (Also at 3 p.m. on Tuesdays and Fridays.) More details: wallstreetwalks.com.‘Revolutionary New York: Celebrating American History’ (Monday) This tour is a close look New York’s Revolutionary War-era history hidden amid Manhattan’s cityscape. Highlights include the graves of the war’s key players, the site of George Washington’s inaugural address and Fraunces Tavern. At 1 p.m.; beginning at Broadway and Murray Street (at the gate of City Hall Park), Financial District, 888-606-9255, bigonion.com.Save the Village (Saturday, Sunday and Tuesday) Last year the Steven Kasher Gallery in Chelsea put on an exhibition with the photography of Fred W. McDarrah, who documented the changing scene of Greenwich Village since the 1960s. Now, the spirit of that show has taken the form of this walking tour, which includes stops at the places McDarrah captured on film: locales like Washington Square Park and the Stonewall Inn. At 10 a.m.; the tour meets at Christopher Park, Stonewall Place, at Seventh Avenue, West Village, savethevillagetours.com.Shuls of Grandeur (Monday) This three-hour walk on the Lower East Side stops at two of the neighborhood’s grand synagogues: Bialystoker and Beth Hamedrash Hagodol. Along the way, participants learn about the historic importance of places like the Henry Street Settlement and Seward Park. The last stop is the Museum at Eldridge Street, a landmark and tribute to immigrant faith. The tour meets at 10:45 a.m. in front of Abrons Arts Center, 466 Grand Street, 212-374-4100, nycjewishtours.org.A Taste of Jewish New York: Borough Park Tour (Sunday) Participants in this tour will get an insider’s look at the customs of the Hasidic residents of Borough Park, Brooklyn. Highlights include a stop at a lively shopping area and the chance to try a variety of traditional foods. Modest attire is requested — no shorts, low necklines or sleeveless clothing. The tour meets at 9:45 a.m. at Fort Hamilton Parkway and 44th Street; 718-339-2302, timelinetouring.com.Union Square: Crossroads of New York (Saturday) Sponsored by the Union Square Partnership, this free year-round tour focuses on the area’s political and social histories. The walk, led by guides from Big Onion Walking Tours, meets at 2 p.m. by the statue of Lincoln in Union Square Park, near the 16th Street transverse. 212-517-1826, unionsquarenyc.org.A few weeks ago, I sat in a movie theater and grinned. Anne Hathaway was in ‘‘The Intern,’’ perched on a hotel bed in a hotel robe, eating from a can of overpriced nuts, having tea and freaking out. What would happen if she divorced her sweet, selfless stay-at-home dad of a husband? Would she ever meet anybody else? And if she didn’t, she would have no one to be buried next to — she’d be single for all eternity. And weren’t the problems in her marriage a direct result of her being a successful businesswoman — she was there but never quite present? ‘‘The Intern’’ is a Nancy Meyers movie, and these sorts of cute career-woman meltdowns are the Eddie Van Halen guitar solos of her romantic comedies.But what’s funny about that scene — what had me grinning — is the response of the person across the bed from Hathaway. After listening to her tearful rant, this person has had enough: Don’t you dare blame yourself or your career! Actually, the interruption begins, ‘‘I hate to be the feminist, of the two of us. … ’’ Hate to be because the person on the other side of the bed isn’t Judy Greer or Brie Larson. It’s not Meryl Streep or Susan Sarandon. It’s someone not far from the last person who comes to mind when you think ‘‘soul-baring bestie.’’ It’s Robert freaking De Niro, portrayer of psychos, savages and grouches no more.On that bed with Hathaway, as her 70-year-old intern, he’s not Travis Bickle or the human wall of intolerance from those Focker movies. He’s Lena Dunham. The attentiveness and stern feminism coming out of his mouth are where the comedy is. And while it’s perfectly obvious what Meyers is doing to De Niro — girlfriending him — that doesn’t make the overhaul any less effective. The whole movie is about the subtle and obvious ways in which men have been overly sensitized and women made self-estranged through breadwinning. It’s both a plaint against the present and a pining for the past, but also an acceptance that we are where we are.And where are we? On one hand: in another of Nancy Meyers’s bourgeois pornographies. On the other: in the midst of a great cultural identity migration. Gender roles are merging. Races are being shed. In the last six years or so, but especially in 2015, we’ve been made to see how trans and bi and poly-ambi-omni- we are. If Meyers is clued into this confusion, then you know it really has gone far, wide and middlebrow. We can see it in the instantly beloved hit ‘‘Transparent,’’ about a family whose patriarch becomes a trans woman whose kids call her Moppa, or in the time we’ve spent this year in televised proximity to Caitlyn Jenner, or in the browning of America’s white founding fathers in the Broadway musical ‘‘Hamilton,’’ or in the proliferating clones that Tatiana Maslany plays on ‘‘Orphan Black,’’ which mock the idea of a true or even original self, or in Amy Schumer's comedic feminism, which reconsiders gender confusion: Do uncouthness, detachment and promiscuity make her a slut, or a man?We can see it in the recently departed half-hour sketch comedy ‘‘Key & Peele,’’ which took race as a construct that could be reshuffled and remixed until it seemed to lose its meaning. The sitcom ‘‘Black-ish’’ likewise makes weekly farcical discourse out of how much black identity has warped — and how much it hasn’t — over 50 years and across three generations. ‘‘Unbreakable Kimmy Schmidt’’ turns selfhood into a circus, introducing us to a lower-middle-class Native American teenager who eventually succeeds at becoming a rich white lady, and to other characters who try out new selves every 10 minutes, as if they’re auditioning for ‘‘Snapchat: The Musical.’’ Last month, Ryan Adams released a remake of Taylor Swift’s album ‘‘1989,’’ song for song, as a rock record that combines a male voice with a perspective that still sounds like a woman’s, like Lindsey Buckingham trying on Stevie Nicks’s clothes. Dancing on the fringes of mainstream pop are androgynous black men like Le1f, Stromae and Shamir.What started this flux? For more than a decade, we’ve lived with personal technologies — video games and social-media platforms — that have helped us create alternate or auxiliary personae. We’ve also spent a dozen years in the daily grip of makeover shows, in which a team of experts transforms your personal style, your home, your body, your spouse. There are TV competitions for the best fashion design, body painting, drag queen. Some forms of cosmetic alteration have become perfectly normal, and there are shows for that, too. Our reinventions feel gleeful and liberating — and tied to an essentially American optimism. After centuries of women living alongside men, and of the races living adjacent to one another, even if only notionally, our rigidly enforced gender and racial lines are finally breaking down. There’s a sense of fluidity and permissiveness and a smashing of binaries. We’re all becoming one another. Well, we are. And we’re not.In June, the story of a woman named Rachel Dolezal began its viral spread through the news. She had recently been appointed president of the local chapter of the N.A.A.C.P. in Spokane, Wash. She had been married to a black man, had two black sons and was, by most accounts, a black woman. Her white biological parents begged to differ. The ensuing scandal resurrected questions about the nature of identity — what compelled Dolezal to darken her skin, perm her hair and pass in reverse? She might not have been biologically black, but she seemed well past feeling spiritually white.Some people called her ‘‘transracial.’’ Others found insult in her masquerade, particularly when the country’s attention was being drawn, day after day, to how dangerous it can be to have black skin. The identities of the black men and women killed by white police officers and civilians, under an assortment of violent circumstances, remain fixed.But there was something oddly compelling about Dolezal, too. She represented — dementedly but also earnestly — a longing to transcend our historical past and racialized present. This is a country founded on independence and yet comfortable with racial domination, a country that has forever been trying to legislate the lines between whiteness and nonwhiteness, between borrowing and genocidal theft. We’ve wanted to think we’re better than a history we can’t seem to stop repeating. Dolezal’s unwavering certainty that she was black was a measure of how seriously she believed in integration: It was as if she had arrived in a future that hadn’t yet caught up to her.It wasn’t so long ago that many Americans felt they were living in that future. Barack Obama’s election was the dynamite that broke open the country. It was a moment. It was the moment. Obama was biological proof of some kind of progress — the product of an interracial relationship, the kind that was outlawed in some states as recently as 1967 but was normalized. He seemed to absolve us of original sin and take us past this stupid, dangerous race stuff. What if suddenly anything was possible? What if we could be and do whatever and whoever we wanted? In that moment, the country was changing. We were changing.Before Obama ran for president, when we tended to talk about racial identity, we did so as the defense of a settlement. Black was understood to be black, nontransferably. Negro intellectuals — Ralph Ellison and Albert Murray and James Baldwin, for starters — debated strategies for equality and tolerance. Some of them asserted that to be black was also to be American, even if America begged to differ. For most of those many decades, blackness stood in opposition to whiteness, which folded its arms and said that was black people’s problem. But Obama became everybody’s problem. He was black. He was white. He was hope. He was apocalypse. And he brought a lot of anxiety into weird relief. We had never really had a white president until we had a black one.This radical hope, triggered by Obama, ushered in a period of bi- and transracial art — art that probed the possibility that we really had transcended race, but also ridiculed this hope with an acid humor. During Obama's past year in office, those works of art have taken on an even darker, more troubled tone as we keep looking around and seeing how little has really changed.When the Dolezal story broke, I was partway through Nell Zink’s ‘‘Mislaid,’’ one of the four new satirical novels of race I read this year — Jess Row’s ‘‘Your Face in Mine,’’ Paul Beatty’s ‘‘The Sellout’’ and Mat Johnson’s ‘‘Loving Day’’ were the others. (I also read Fran Ross’s long-lost, recently reissued ‘‘Oreo.’’) But Zink’s was the only one that felt like an energy reading of Dolezal. Zink’s white heroine, Peggy, has run off with her daughter, Mireille, and decided to take the birth certificate of a dead black girl named Karen Brown and use it for Mireille, while changing her own name to Meg.Zink’s marveling description of what blackness looks like implies that it could welcome anyone. She draws a phenotypic loophole through which a sympathetic impostor or a straight-up cynic can pass.Each of these books wrestles with the fact of race while trying to present it as mutable, constructed, obscuring. In Beatty’s novel, a young black farmer in modern Los Angeles reluctantly takes on a vulgar former TV minstrel star as his slave. Blackness, according to this book, is as much a scam as it is a cultural identity; the undercurrents of tragedy keep lapping at the harbor of farce. Row’s novel is also a satire, but an eerily calm one in which a white man has ‘‘racial reassignment’’ surgery and becomes black. Row, who like Zink is white, takes guilt to an astounding allegorical extreme: The surest cure for white oppression is to eliminate whiteness. Whatever else is going on with Dolezal psychologically, you can read into her proud reassignment a sense of shame.But racial transgression works the other way too. ‘‘Hamilton’’ is a musical biography about the very white, very dead Alexander Hamilton, in which most of the cast is ‘‘other,’’ including Lin-Manuel Miranda, the show’s Nuyorican creator and star. Some of its audacity stems from the baldness of its political project: In changing the races of the founding fathers from white to brown, it pushes back against the currents of racial appropriation. It also infuses the traditional melodies of the American musical with so many genres of hip-hop and R & B, sometimes in a single number, that the songs themselves become something new. Political debates are staged as rap battles. Daveed Diggs’s Thomas Jefferson becomes the best good thing that never happened at the Source Awards. Artistically, Miranda has created a great night out. Racially, the show tags the entertainment industry status quo with color. It’s obviously musical theater. But damn if it’s not graffiti too.Naturally, this new era has also agitated a segment of the populace that is determined to scrub the walls. That, presumably, is where Donald Trump comes in: as the presidential candidate for anyone freaked out by the idea of a show like ‘‘Hamilton.’’ Trump is the pathogenic version of Obama, filling his supporters with hope based on a promise to rid the country of change. This incarnation of Trump appeared not long after Obama’s election, determined to disprove the new president’s American citizenship. On Trump’s behalf, an entire wing of conservatism — the so-called birthers — devoted itself to the removal of a mask that Obama was never wearing. Part of Trump’s appeal is his illusion of authenticity. His blustering candor has currency in a landscape of android candidates. Yet his magnetism resides in paranoia, the fear that since Obama’s election ushered in this shifting, unstable climate of identity, the country has been falling apart.It’s a paranoia that pop culture captured first: In the last six years, Hollywood has provided a glut of disaster spectacles, armageddon scenarios and White House sackings. But the USA Network’s ‘‘Mr. Robot,’’ which ended its first season last month, might have gotten at that sense of social collapse best. Created by Sam Esmail, an Egyptian-American, the show pits technology against the economy and its unstable protagonist against himself. The plot concerns a group of anarchist hackers conspiring to topple a corporation; with it go the stability of world markets and everybody’s financial debt. But it’s also a mystery about the identity of its protagonist, a mentally ill, morphine-addicted hacker named Elliot. We think he’s obeying the commands of the show’s title character, the head of a hacktivist outfit, but it turns out that he has been commanding himself all along. Significant parts of this world are figments of his delusion. Elliot is at least two people. Some of the dark excitement of this show is that he might be even more.‘‘Mr. Robot’’ is worst-of-times TV, reflecting a mood of menacing instability. Over the course of its 10 episodes, almost no one was who they appeared to be. A straight married man seemed to think nothing of his sleeping with a gay work underling (and neither did his wife). A character who seemed, to my eyes at least, to be a transgender woman at some point appeared as a conventional man. Was that a coming out? A going in? Both? This isn’t a show I watched for what was going to happen but for who people were going to turn into, or who they wanted to turn out to be. It’s a show about the way your online profile can diverge from your real-life identity, yes, but also the way you can choose a self or a self can choose you.There’s also the choice to ignore the matter of identity — until, of course, it starts to aggravate your complacency. Not far into the flap over Dolezal, another alarming story took over the news, a story that challenged the myths white America tells itself about progress. This story was about Atticus Finch, the protagonist of Harper Lee’s 1960 classic, ‘‘To Kill a Mockingbird.’’ Atticus single-handedly fought racism in the fictitious Alabama town of Maycomb, and he became a window through which we could see a version of tolerance, someone holy enough to put on stained glass or money. But in ‘‘Go Set a Watchman,’’ the sequel to ‘‘To Kill a Mockingbird,’’ published in July, Atticus was given a scandalous status update: He had been aged into a racist.I can’t recall the last time the attitudes of a single fictional character led the national news. But there was bigoted old Atticus, on the front pages, being discussed on cable. One of the most iconic white antiracists had grown fond of white supremacy. It raised an uncomfortable question: If you had identified with the original Atticus Finch, did his Archie Bunkerization make a racist out of you too? The public hand-wringing was a perverse refreshment because, even if only for a few days, it left white people dwelling on race as intensely as nonwhite people. This new Atticus was a betrayal of white liberal idealism, feeding a suspicion that that idealism was less than absolute — that it could suddenly, randomly turn against the people it purported to help.It was almost as if Lee knew, in 1957, about the mood of the country in 2015 — about the way a series of dead black men and women would further cleave apart the country; about the massacre of nine black churchgoers by a young white supremacist in a South Carolina church, and the ensuing debate over the Confederate flag; about the fear of inevitable, inexorable racial, gender and sexual evolution; about the perceived threats to straight-white-male primacy by Latino immigrants, proliferating Spanish, same-sex marriage, female bosses and a black president.The yearning to transcend race keeps coming up against the bedrock cultural matter of separateness. But the tectonic plates of the culture keep pushing against one another with greater, earthquaking force. The best show in our era about that quake — about the instability of identity and the choosing of a self — has been ‘‘Key & Peele.’’ For five seasons, in scores of sketches, two biracial men, Keegan-Michael Key and Jordan Peele, became different women and different men of different ethnicities, personalities and body types. They were two of the best actors on television, hailing from somewhere between the lawlessness of improv comedy and the high-impact emotionalism of Anna Deavere Smith’s one-woman, zillion-character plays. ‘‘Key & Peele’’ granted nearly every caricature a soul.The show started as a commentary on the hilarious absurdity of race, but it never fully escaped the pernicious reality of racism. The longer it ran, the more melancholy it became, the more it seethed. In the final episode, its anger caught up with its fancifulness and cheek, exploding in an old-timey musical number called ‘‘Negrotown,’’ which opens with a black man (Key) being arrested by a white cop one night while walking down a dark alleyway. He says he’s innocent of any wrongdoing and asks why he’s being arrested, intensifying the cop’s anger. Entering the police cruiser, he hits his head on the car door. Suddenly, a homeless man (Peele) arrives on the scene and offers to take the black guy off the cop’s hands. The cop gratefully acquiesces.Taking the disoriented man by the hand, the homeless guy leads him through an alley door. They find themselves on the threshold of a sunny neighborhood. The homeless guy is now dressed in a three-piece suit the color of pink grapefruit meat, and he begins to sing in a camped-up, zero-calorie Paul Robeson baritone about this new place, ‘‘where there ain’t no pain, ain’t no sorrow.’’ Black people in bright clothes are dancing in the streets, singing in giddy verse about the special virtues of their town: You can get a cab to pick you up, have a loan application approved, even wear a hoodie without getting shot. Plus: ‘‘There’s no stupid-ass white folks touching your hair or stealing your culture, claiming it’s theirs.’’But it’s clear from the start that the ‘‘neighborhood’’ is a studio backlot, and the dancers are costumed in the colors of Skittles, and their dancing involves a lot of grinning and spinning and stretching out their arms — shuffling. Black freedom looks like a white 1940s Hollywood director’s idea of it. At the end of the number, the dancers stand frozen with their arms raised in a black-power salute, as if waiting for someone to yell ‘‘cut.’’ No one does.The dream melts away, and we’re back with the guy being arrested, passed out on the ground. The cop starts shoving him into the cruiser. ‘‘I thought I was going to Negrotown,’’ he says.‘‘Oh, you are,’’ the cop replies, as the piano riff from the song starts to play and the car drives off.The show left us with a dream of Edenic self-containment as the key to black contentment — a stunning contradiction of all its previous sketches. It was a rebuke to both racial integration and ghettoization. It split me open. I cried with laughter at the joke of this obviously fake place as a kind of heaven. I cried with sadness, because if you’re in Negrotown, you’re also in a special ring of hell.The bitterness of the sketch made me wonder if being black in America is the one identity that won’t ever mutate. I’m someone who believes himself to have complete individual autonomy, someone who feels free. But I also know some of that autonomy is limited, illusory, conditional. I live knowing that whatever my blackness means to me can be at odds with what it means to certain white observers, at any moment. So I live with two identities: mine and others’ perceptions of it. So much of blackness evolving has been limited to whiteness allowing it to evolve, without white people accepting that they are in the position of granting permission. Allowing. If that symbiotic dynamic is going to change, white people will need to become more conscious that they, too, can be perceived.It could be that living with recycled conflict is part of the national DNA. Yet it’s also in our natures to keep trying to change, to discover ourselves. In ‘‘Far From the Tree,’’ Andrew Solomon’s landmark 2012 book about parenting and how children differentiate themselves, he makes a distinction between vertical and horizontal identity. The former is defined by traits you share with your parents, through genes and norms; the latter is defined by traits and values you don’t share with them, sometimes because of genetic mutation, sometimes through the choice of a different social world. The emotional tension in the book’s scores of stories arises from the absence of love for or empathy toward someone with a pronounced or extreme horizontal identity — homosexuality or autism or severe disability. Solomon is writing about the struggle to overcome intolerance and estrangement, and to better understand disgust; about our comfort with fixed, established identity and our distress over its unfixed or unstable counterpart.His insights about families apply to us as a country. We’re a vertical nation moving horizontally. We’re daring to erase the segregating boundaries, to obliterate oppressive institutions, to get over ourselves. Nancy Meyers knows it. Sam Esmail knows it. So, in his way, does Donald Trump. The transition should make us stronger — if it doesn’t kill us first.Ennis Esmer might not be the next Rafael Nadal, but he gives it a good shot. In the new Amazon series “Red Oaks,” set at a country club in the summer of 1985, Mr. Esmer plays Nash, a flirtatious tennis pro and questionable role model to his protégé, David (Craig Roberts), an assistant tennis coach struggling to figure out his postgrad life.“I worked with a friend who trained me to look like I knew what I was doing,” Mr. Esmer said of his tennis game. “There’s no way I was going to become pro-level good.” (He does claim to have a decent serve.)Mr. Esmer, 36, is a Canadian actor and comedian also seen on FXX’s “Man Seeking Woman.” For the role in “Red Oaks,” he read with the director David Gordon Green (“Pineapple Express”), in both his regular voice and an invented accent he calls “Indo Middle Eastern British.” (Mr. Esmer was born in Turkey and moved to Canada when he was a toddler.) “I spent 45 minutes just trying to make him laugh,” he said.With Steven Soderbergh as an executive producer, “Red Oaks” features actors from classic ’80s movies, like Jennifer Grey from “Dirty Dancing” and Paul Reiser of “Diner.” By phone from Toronto, Mr. Esmer discussed baseball and researching hangover remedies. These are excerpts from the conversation.Q. How would you describe Nash?A. After seeing the pilot, it’s easy to conceive that he’s just a philandering troublemaker with no positive attributes. But the more you go on in the season, the more you find out there’s more to him than just that. He definitely cares about his new protégé, as misguided as some of his advice may be. He’s such a preposterous person, but yet they found a way to ground him.In one scene, David is hung over before a crucial match, and Nash hands him a mixture of Gatorade and Absolut vodka. Does that actually work?I did a lot of clinical trials before the show to be thorough. It depends on what you drink the night before.What kind of tennis player are you?There’s a real disconnect between how much I like playing tennis and how good I am. You know what I’m really good at? If I think it’s in and the linesman says it’s out, I’m really good at going, “Ugh, what? Are you kidding me?”So you’re John McEnroe.Yeah.You’ve said that working with Richard Kind and Paul Reiser was like a comedy internship. How so?These are some of the finest comedic actors in the world, and it’s incredibly influential to watch them at work. You step outside of yourself at certain points and think, I just spent 30 minutes improvising with Paul Reiser. It gets a little surreal. David Gordon Green would throw lines out and say, “If you don’t like it, just build on it.”How does it feel being on a streaming show instead of a network?There’s one episode where I think if I was watching the show at a certain time every week, it wouldn’t work. It’s one of the craziest half-hours of television. So the fact that you can watch the next episode at your own pace is good.You’re a huge Blue Jays fan. Are they going to the World Series?I’m just going to say I think they have an excellent shot. I’ve put a deposit on tickets, so I’m very hopeful that it ends up happening.The actress Jennifer Lawrence spoke out against gender pay inequality in an essay on Tuesday, describing how she felt when leaked documents exposed by the Sony Pictures hack showed that she had been paid less than her male colleagues on the film “American Hustle.”In the essay, published in Lena Dunham’s newsletter Lenny, Ms. Lawrence acknowledged that her experience was not exactly relatable — she is the world’s highest-paid actress, according to Forbes — but said that her decision to do nothing was at odds with negotiating tactics used by her male colleagues.“When the Sony hack happened,” she wrote, “I didn’t get mad at Sony. I got mad at myself. I failed as a negotiator because I gave up early.“Jeremy Renner, Christian Bale, and Bradley Cooper all fought and succeeded in negotiating powerful deals for themselves,” she wrote of her co-stars. “If anything, I’m sure they were commended for being fierce and tactical, while I was busy worrying about coming across as a brat and not getting my fair share.”Lenny has been in publication for only a couple of weeks, but it has already recruited some of the most visible women in politics and entertainment to grapple with issues related to feminism, sexuality and sexism.Women in the United States make 78 cents for every dollar a man makes. The ratio of women’s to men’s median weekly full-time earnings is 82.5 percent. (That ratio, when compared with white men, is lower for black women, and lower still for Hispanic women.) And it doesn’t matter if a woman eventually makes it to a C-Suite office (or, in Ms. Lawrence’s case, the Oscar suite) — the wage gap persists at every level of the career ladder.Much of the literature centered on helping women close this gap places the burden squarely on a woman to improve her skills as a negotiator. Tips for women that were published in The New York Times last year suggest that women role-play with a friend, and advise women to communicate in a way that puts the needs of the organization ahead of their own.This sort of behavior “helps women in the likability department. And that’s important,” that article advised.Ms. Lawrence touched on this double standard in her essay:“I’m over trying to find the ‘adorable’ way to state my opinion and still be likable!”Kenya Barris answered the questions here. Kenya Barris, the show runner of ABC’s “black-ish,” which returns for its second season on Wednesday, is taking questions from Times readers.“Black-ish,” debuted last fall with a unique premise: a successful African American advertising executive, played by Anthony Anderson, worries that his children are losing touch with their heritage, thanks to their suburban California upbringing.But from there the show expanded into an inventive family sitcom that played with structure and form — the season finale was set during the Harlem Renaissance and presented partially in black-and-white — as it continued to find comedy in the occasional awkwardness of cultural assimilation. The blend worked — “black-ish” was the highest-rated new comedy among adults 18-49, the key demo for advertisers.“Black-ish” shows no signs of softening its approach this season. The premiere revolves around one of the kids’ use of a racial slur during a school talent show.Mr. Barris has said he based “black-ish” loosely on his own experiences. Prior to “black-ish,” Mr. Barris developed “America’s Next Top Model” with Tyra Banks and was a writer for “The Game,” among other shows.Please leave questions for Mr. Barris in the comments. We will post his responses to some of them soon.Now here’s something different to help kick off the fall season: a flurry of works by Georg Philipp Telemann, seemingly out of the blue. (Telemann’s 335th birthday, unlikely to excite even an anniversary-mad classical music world, comes next year; the 250th anniversary of his death, in 2017.)Not that Telemann — a longer-lived German contemporary of Bach and Handel’s who may have committed more music to paper than any other composer — is at all a stranger. His often undistinctive instrumental works, which will fill a program by Juilliard Baroque on Nov. 2, are a staple of classical radio.But Thomas Crawford and the American Classical Orchestra and Chorus struck first on Tuesday with a late, great masterpiece rarely heard, the oratorio “Der Tag des Gerichts” (“The Day of Judgment,” 1762), at the Church of St. Ignatius of Antioch on the Upper West Side. And Nicholas McGegan and Juilliard415 will follow on Nov. 16 with Telemann’s cantata “Die Tageszeiten” (“The Times of Day,” 1757).Mr. Crawford’s performance was quite simply splendid. “Der Tag” is populated by a variety of characters, two named (Jesus and John), the rest allegorical (Faith, the Archangel, the Blessed and the like). Mr. Crawford divided them among his 16 choristers, who were almost uniformly excellent, both individually and as a body.To single out a few is to slight many. But some demand mention: Jonathan Woody (Disbelief), Helen Karloski (Reason), Brian Giebler (Mocker), Enrico Lagasca (Devotion) and Steven Eddy (Jesus).The period-instrument orchestra was superb, but for a viola da gamba. Trumpets have a special role in any account of the last judgment, and John Thiessen and Carl Albach handled their intractable early instruments deftly. The French horns were also strong.In a preconcert lecture, Mr. Crawford showed how advanced (in time and technique, not necessarily quality) Telemann’s idiom, with scant polyphony, was in relation to Bach’s, showing similarities to Handel and Mozart, and even citing Schumann. He could have gone further, to the finale of Mahler’s Fourth Symphony, where the composer, uncannily echoed the melody of Reason’s aria, “Des Sturmes Donnerstimmen” (“The Thundering Voices of the Storm”).“Not that you’ll ever hear this piece again in your life,” Mr. Crawford said at one point. Well, he holds the power to remedy that. A revival of “Der Tag” in two or three years, ideally accompanied by a recording, would surely be in order.Everything is awhirl in Panda Bear’s music. His concert on Tuesday evening at the Bowery Ballroom, starting a three-night stand there at the beginning of the 35th annual CMJ Music Marathon, was dizzying, with eyes open or eyes closed.Panda Bear — a member of Animal Collective whose real name is Noah Lennox — performed solo behind an electronic setup with prominently dangling patch cords to show off analog components. He actually started during intermission following the opening band, nonchalantly stepping onstage to activate a sustained, droning chord with perpetual-motion inner parts, reminiscent of Lou Reed’s “Metal Machine Music,” as the sold-out crowd continued its conversations.Once the lights went down, and Panda Bear reappeared, the video screen behind him began flashing brightly colored images in constant motion, augmented by strobe lights. The images metamorphosed from sweet to grotesque, from abstractions to human figures that were multiplied again into Busby Berkeley patterns.And the music offered loop after loop and loop within loop: often merry major-key tootles and tinkles and squeaks, like a carousel in overdrive or a wind chime in a gale. In a voice that merged the most ebullient moments of Brian Wilson with the nervy insistence of David Byrne, Panda Bear sustained and repeated melodies that could be bubble gum choruses or something like mantras — a show of stamina that was equally determined and joyful.What he was singing, in repeated lines amid the loops, were memos to himself, paradoxical thoughts and existential admonitions: “It don’t mean I’ll do it like you want me to/But it do mean I’ll do it like you need me to,” he sang in “Crossroads,” from his latest album, “Panda Bear Meets the Grim Reaper” (Domino).Though the songs were built on instrumental and vocal repetition, the set was diverse, pivoting from 1960s pop to hip-hop to a ballad accompanied by harp arpeggios. Pushing elements of pop to a conceptual extreme, Panda Bear makes the kind of music that once relied largely on college radio to find an audience, making him an apt booking for the start of the CMJ Music Marathon, a showcase of more than 1,000 artists at clubs across Manhattan and Brooklyn. CMJ, which started in 1978 as a newsletter called College Media Journal, has been outflanked — like college radio — by the Internet, and the marathon has long been overshadowed by the spring behemoth in Austin, Tex., South by Southwest.The pleasures of Panda Bear’s music were only heightened in a club that he could fill with sound and overload with strobes. “Surfer’s Hymn,” in which every flashing light seemed to coordinate with some madly plinking virtual percussion, left the audience dazed, blinking and happy.Full reviews of recent jazz performances: nytimes.com/jazz. A searchable guide to these and other shows is at nytimes.com/events.★ AACM 50th Anniversary Festival  (Fridays through Oct. 30) The Association for the Advancement of Creative Musicians, a groundbreaking institution for American experimental music, has been celebrating its golden anniversary this year with events in and beyond Chicago, its city of origin. This concert series, presented by the association’s New York chapter on four consecutive Fridays in October, will feature avant-garde titans like the pianist Muhal Richard Abrams and the saxophonist Roscoe Mitchell, who appear as an improvising duo on Friday at 8 p.m. A preceding panel discussion, at 6 p.m., will feature those and other association members, including the saxophonist Henry Threadgill. At the Community Church of New York, 40 East 35th Street, Manhattan, 800-838-3006, aacmnyc50th.bpt.me. (Nate Chinen)★ Karrin Allyson  (Friday and Saturday) The title of “Many a New Day: Karrin Allyson Sings Rodgers & Hammerstein” tells you the first thing you need to know about Ms. Allyson’s new album, her first nonholiday release in four years. Drawing from the album this weekend, she works with musicians including Miro Sprague on piano and Ed Howard on bass. At 8:30 and 11 p.m., Birdland, 315 West 44th Street, Clinton, 212-581-3080, birdlandjazz.com. (Chinen)★ BRIC JazzFest  (Sunday through next Friday) The centerpiece of the newly formed BRIC JazzFest, happening at the BRIC House complex in Brooklyn, is a two-day marathon on Thursday and next Friday, featuring music ranging from the vaulting ambitions of the tenor saxophonist Kamasi Washington to the clockwork intricacies of Dawn of Midi. A separate kickoff concert, this Sunday, will feature the august bassist Ron Carter with his Golden Striker Trio, in collaboration with the painter and poet Danny Simmons. Jaime Woods, an emerging singer-songwriter with a foothold in gospel and soul, will play a free concert on Tuesday; Battle Trance, an ensemble of four tenor saxophones led by Travis LaPlante, will appear on Wednesday. A full schedule is at bricartsmedia.org. BRIC House, 647 Fulton Street, at Rockwell Place, Fort Greene, 866-811-4111. (Chinen)Brian Charette Trio  (Tuesday) Mr. Charette has carved out a strong niche as a Hammond B-3 organ ace with a taste for modernizing classic soul-jazz. As on his new album, “Alphabet City,” he leads a trio propelled by the excellent drummer Rudy Royston; on guitar here is Peter Bernstein, a bop stalwart whose organ-trio credentials are unimpeachable. At 7:30 and 9:30 p.m., Jazz Standard, 116 E 27th Street, 212-576-2232, jazzstandard.net. (Chinen)Stephan Crump’s Rhombal  (Saturday) Mr. Crump is a bassist with a broad stylistic frame, at home in both the avant-garde and a more traditional framework. His promising new band, Rhombal, has a front line of Adam O’Farrill on trumpet and Ellery Eskelin on saxophone, with Tyshawn Sorey, a smartly combustible drummer. At 9 and 10:30 p.m., Cornelia Street Café, 29 Cornelia Street, Greenwich Village, 212-989-9319, corneliastreetcafe.com. (Chinen)★ Jack DeJohnette, Ravi Coltrane, Matthew Garrison  (Saturday) Mr. DeJohnette, 73, is an elder statesman and a moving target: a National Endowment for the Arts Jazz Master who has been working both within his peer group and with a wealth of younger talent. He’ll be the driving force but not necessarily the leader of this all-star trio with Mr. Coltrane, the saxophonist, and Mr. Garrison, the bassist. The group has worked here before, and will soon be recording an album for ECM. At 8 and 9:30 p.m., ShapeShifter Lab, 18 Whitwell Place, Park Slope, Brooklyn, shapeshifterlab.com. (Chinen)★ Kurt Elling  (Tuesday through Oct. 17) “Passion World,” the new album by the singer Kurt Elling, puts a high-concept gloss on the love song, drawing broadly from a pop repertory and enlisting a global assortment of guests. For his debut engagement at the Café Carlyle, titled “Elling Swings Sinatra,” Mr. Elling offers a centennial salute to a master of the form, with a sharp band that includes Troy Roberts on tenor saxophone, John McLean on guitar and Gary Versace on piano. At 8:45 p.m., with an additional 10:45 p.m. show on Oct. 17, 35 East 76th Street, Manhattan, 212-744-1600, thecarlyle.com. (Chinen)John Ellis and Double-Wide  (Friday and Saturday) A saxophonist and clarinetist fond of blending modern-jazz erudition with street-level grooves, Mr. Ellis has long had a strong outlet in Double-Wide, featuring the New Orleans drummer Jason Marsalis, in a lineup with trombone and sousaphone. “Charm,” Mr. Ellis’s new album, also greatly benefits from the organ, accordion and piano playing of Gary Versace, who rejoins the group here. At 7:30 and 9:30 p.m., the Jazz Gallery, 1160 Broadway, at West 27th Street, 646-494-3625, jazzgallery.org. (Chinen)Tomas Fujiwara Trio  (Monday) “Variable Bets,” the new album by the drummer Tomas Fujiwara, places him at the fulcrum of two strong and distinctive improvisers: the strategically unruly guitarist-banjoist Brandon Seabrook and the surgically precise trumpeter Ralph Alessi. At 8:30 p.m., IBeam, 168 Seventh Street, Gowanus, Brooklyn, ibeambrooklyn.com. (Chinen)★ Tom Harrell  (through Oct. 18) Mr. Harrell, a trumpeter and fluegelhorn player of prominence since the 1970s, has also been a beacon of small-group bandleading in recent years, working with a regular stable of sidemen. A few of them — the saxophonist Wayne Escoffery, the bassist Ugonna Okegwo and the pianist Danny Grissett — join him at the Village Vanguard. At 8:30 and 10:30 p.m., 178 Seventh Avenue South, at 11th Street, West Village, 212-255-4037, villagevanguard.com. (Chinen)Donald Harrison Quintet  (Thursday through Oct. 18) A veteran alto saxophonist working at the convergence of acoustic post-bop, funk and New Orleans second line, Mr. Harrison leads a band whose front line features an accomplished peer, the Brazilian trumpeter Claudio Roditi. (Mr. Roditi appears Thursday and next Friday; for the rest of the run, the trumpeter will be Terell Stafford.) At 7:30 and 9:30 p.m., Jazz Standard, 116 East 27th Street, Manhattan, 212-576-2232, jazzstandard.net. (Chinen)Freddie Hendrix Quintet  (Wednesday and Thursday) A hard-bop trumpeter with a strong tone and an alert style, Mr. Hendrix spearheads a group with Brandon McCune on piano, Chris Berger on bass and Chris Beck on drums. At 7, 9 and 10:30 p.m., Smoke, 2751 Broadway, at 106th Street, 212-864-6662, smokejazz.com. (Chinen)The Horns Band  (Friday) The Horns Band, which released its self-titled debut album last year, is the chief expressive outlet for Matt Pavolka, a bassist and composer. As on the album, its lineup features Kirk Knuffke on cornet, Loren Stillman on alto saxophone, Jacob Garchik on trombone and Mark Ferber on drums. At 9 and 10:30 p.m., Cornelia Street Café, 29 Cornelia Street, Greenwich Village, 212-989-9319, corneliastreetcafe.com. (Chinen)Willie Jones III Quintet  (Thursday) The astute hard-bop drummer Willie Jones III celebrates the release of a new album, “Groundwork,” with a group featuring Eddie Henderson on trumpet, Stacy Dillard on saxophones, Jeremy Manasia on piano and Gerald Cannon on bass. At 7:30 and 9:30 p.m., Ginny’s Supper Club, 310 Lennox Avenue, Harlem, 212-421-3821, ginnyssupperclub.com. (Chinen)★ Jane Monheit  (Tuesday through Oct. 17) When she arrived on the scene 15 years ago, Ms. Monheit was praised and criticized for her fealty to the style of Ella Fitzgerald, her chief jazz-vocal influence. A lot has happened for Ms. Monheit since, as an artist and a person, and it seems likely she’ll bring an unforced maturity, along with a deep reserve of affection, to this tribute, titled “The Songbook Sessions: The Music of Ella Fitzgerald.” At 8:30 and 11 p.m., Birdland, 315 West 44th Street, Clinton, 212-581-3080, birdlandjazz.com. (Chinen)Noah Preminger Group  (Wednesday) On his often ecstatic new album, “Pivot: Live at the 55 Bar,” the tenor saxophonist Noah Preminger leads his new band in a pair of incantatory half-hour extemporizations on classic blues by Bukka White. For this outing, he leads the same personnel — Jason Palmer on trumpet, Kim Cass on bass, Ian Froman on drums — in a different West Village room. From 7:30 to 10 p.m., Smalls Jazz Club, 183 West 10th Street, West Village, smallsjazzclub.com. (Chinen).Kenneth Salters  (Monday) Mr. Salters is a drummer and composer who has worked in a wide range of settings since setting up shop in New York about a decade ago. His debut album, “Haven,” reflects that breadth, and features all of the musicians found here, including the trumpeter Matt Holman, the alto saxophonist Tivon Pennicott and the pianist Brad Whiteley. From 7:30 to 10 p.m., Smalls Jazz Club, 183 West 10th Street, West Village, smallsjazzclub.com. (Chinen).★ John Scofield-Joe Lovano Quartet  (Tuesday through Oct. 18) “Past Present,” the excellent new album by the guitarist John Scofield, documents a welcome reunion of his quartet of the early-to-mid 1990s: an elastic, swinging group featuring Joe Lovano on tenor saxophone and Bill Stewart on drums. Larry Grenadier is the bassist on the album, replaced by Ben Street here. At 8 and 10:30 p.m., Blue Note, 131 West Third Street, Greenwich Village, 212-475-8592, bluenote.net. (Chinen)Kendra Shank Quartet  (Thursday) An assertive and open-minded jazz singer, Ms. Shank prizes group interplay, and she has worked for more than 15 years with the partners who join her here: the pianist Frank Kimbrough, the bassist Dean Johnson and the drummer Tony Moreno. At 8 and 10 p.m., Jazz at Kitano, 66 Park Avenue, at 38th Street, 212-885-7119, kitano.com. (Chinen)‘Spherical’: A Thelonious Monk Birthday Celebration  (Friday through Sunday) “Spherical,” a new album by the tenor saxophonist Tim Warfield, pays homage to Thelonious Sphere Monk, the pianist-composer of peerless stature in jazz’s modernist canon. As on the album, Mr. Warfield appears here — on what would have been Monk’s 98th birthday weekend — with a band featuring Victor Gould on piano, Eddie Henderson on trumpet and Ben Wolfe on bass. At 7, 9 and 10:30 p.m., Smoke, 2751 Broadway, at 106th Street, 212-864-6662, smokejazz.com. (Chinen)Yosvany Terry-Baptiste Trotignon Quartet  (through Sunday) Mr. Terry, an Afro-Cuban saxophonist and percussionist, and Mr. Trotignon, a French pianist, have a new album, “Ancestral Memories,” that addresses themes of Caribbean cultural displacement. (It’s a suite created with support from the French-American Jazz Exchange Program.) They work here with Yunior Terry, Mr. Terry’s brother, on bass and Jeff (Tain) Watts on drums. (Ludwig Alfonso fills in for Mr. Watts on Sunday.) At 7:30 and 9:30 p.m., Jazz Standard, 116 E 27th Street, 212-576-2232, jazzstandard.net. (Chinen)★ Kenny Werner Trio  (Wednesday) “The Melody,” a sparkling new album by Mr. Werner, serves on one hand to underscore his composure at the piano, which rarely falters even when he’s stretching. At the same time, it’s a showcase for the agile dynamism of this longtime trio, with Johannes Weidenmüller on bass and Ari Hoenig on drums. At 7:30 and 9:30 p.m., Jazz Standard, 116 East 27th Street, Manhattan, 212-576-2232, jazzstandard.net. (Chinen)Steve Wilson-Lewis Nash Duo  (Friday and Saturday) Mr. Wilson, an alto and soprano saxophonist, and Mr. Nash, a drummer, have been sharing bandstands for decades, most often as first-call sidemen. “Duologue,” an album from last year, puts them on equal footing, cutting to the heart of their musical kinship: brisk fluency, crisp flexibility and a capacity for coming up with magic on the spot. At 8 and 10 p.m., Jazz at Kitano, 66 Park Avenue, at East 38th Street, 212-885-7000, kitano.com. (Chinen)Twyla Tharp is writing about rehearsing, touring and creating new work, 50 years after her first dance concert.SANTA BARBARA, Calif. — O.K., you want the fountain of youth, here it is: Travel with a modern dance troupe.Our group moves mostly by bus and by air. Our home is two pieces of carry-on luggage. We do not fly first class, let alone in private planes. Our accommodations are not luxurious. Good food can be extremely hard to locate. Our crunchy bodies (tired, cranky, pulled into themselves from jumping on hard floors) search out truly scary gyms and pools just off hotel lobbies. On the road, these are shared problems — tedious, exhausting and real for the economics of dance on the road. Jack Kerouac and John Steinbeck are classic road warriors who take it as it comes. But regularity in the face of change is the touring performer’s mission, and the road is the performer’s laboratory. Our big question is, “Do we play as well in Peoria as in St. Paul?”I started touring in 1966. We were an all-girl troop. We booked the tour and arranged accommodations, living in sponsors’ basements. We set up the folding chairs for the performances and we did the press. We did it all because it was worth it for us to challenge ourselves as dancers and to learn how audiences were reading the work we did. We were building a career, and we were also in control of our lives. Except when we weren’t. (Who can forget the time the train to Stuttgart split in two and half went north with one of our dancers, Margie Jenkins, and the other half went south with Sara Rudner and me?)But once I began a company a few years later, there was a more institutionalized structure and that sense of dancers controlling their destiny eroded. The us/them (management/dancers) split materialized, and that is no fun. This time round, while I am a good bit older than I was in 1966, I wanted to return to a group with a stronger sense of unity. For the dancers, this means they can be heard directly, and many problems that might emerge — how to schedule tech time for example — can be resolved democratically. As for me, asking myself to keep up with the dancers, offstage at least, is good for the anti-aging factor. It is also a time for doing business.Working with dancers in the studio, creating new work, there is a line I do not cross. I try to know them only by what we all can see — outside the studio is their affair. But there is very little privacy on a tour bus. I ride up front and try to maintain a forcefield of care. Who these dancers are is none of my business; how they are is. I meet with them individually while we travel to learn how they are doing physically beyond what I see. I am particularly concerned with the pacing of their shows. Having given this much thought I want to be kept abreast of how their stamina is being maintained, how the wear and tear of travel is affecting their morale, if there is any way to improve our regimen.It’s our fourth week on the road, a Thursday. Having bused from Davis back to Sacramento, we catch an 11 a.m. flight to LAX, where we get on a bus for the two-hour ride to Santa Barbara. Our driver opts for the scenic route, and we are taking Highway 1 north along the coast. I am particularly cranky because getting to Davis from Los Angeles earlier in the week had been arduous, and I am still working to recover three days later. I had stayed behind in Los Angeles to do a talk show, and afterward the driver got lost on the freeway in a driving Southern California rain (believe it), the flight was two hours late and I did not eat all day. I arrived at the Davis hotel around midnight; Brady had dry chicken waiting. Next day breakfast at Hyatt was trans fat piled on trans fat; gym: scary, dirty, small, air recycled. Windows in room did not open. Light popped on when you used the bathroom — no way to silence it. Loud glare. I did not cry. I am the leader of the group.Friday is our show in Santa Barbara. After practically every performance I do what is known as a Q&A.; A guaranteed question is, “How do you pick your dancers?” And the guaranteed answer is, “They must be gorgeous, amazingly well trained, really smart, willing to forget everything they ever knew, great sense of humor,” and I mean it. Worth every bit of road distress. In our group we have mended ankles, hips and knees from injuries that have taken many many months of surgeries and setbacks to get past. This business is grueling and damaging, and every professional dancer knows it and is due boundless respect. There is psychic damage as well. Many have left their families and countries to dance. My empathy is deep. The details are gossip but the empathy is love.Saturday we do “The One Hundreds.” An early varitey of communuity outreach, “The One Hundreds” is an event that is always given free to the public and that allows 100 people to participate in our show. One hundred phrases, each with a beginning, middle and end, will be seen three times. First, two dancers show them sequentially with a four-second pause separating them and requiring about 18 minutes. Then five of our dancers do 20 phrases simultaneously, accomplishing all 100 in one-fifth the time. Finally our 100 volunteers, who have been taught earlier in the day, each do a different phrase, and you see the entire set in 11 seconds. These 100 can be trained performers but mostly are folks of all descriptions who want to spend a bit of time dancing with us (the youngest person to date on this tour was 5, the oldest 86). For company members, “The One Hundreds” is an opportunity to connect personally to their audiences and also to hone their own techniques and focus. Once dancers remember and present 100 11-second entities in public without music, their performance chops will be seriously expanded. This is a promise, and for a Tharp dancer, “The One Hundreds” is both an opportunity and a rite of passage.For me, it is a pledge to the future. In Santa Barbara, we presented “The One Hundreds” in Alameda Park. I centered the performing space around two large pines. Picking up a few needles, I clearly recalled the pine forest in which I had originally made the 100 phrases in 1969. Artists like to believe their work can survive their lifetimes: If a tree can make it, why not a dance? Viewed as an experience, dance is ephemeral, but as a tangible entity, it can become a commodity. Each of the 100 phrases has a number, a name, a clear description, a history, pictures and videos documenting its existence. Some have been auctioned at galas. Passed from generation to generation of performers, experienced by thousands of participants, they have made it this far. Seeing them given away free of charge one more time is yet another reason to go out on the road.